Mississippi, session 2026, SB2771.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 73-77-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-77-1.  This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Fresh Start Act * * * of 2019." SECTION 2.  Section 73-77-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-77-3.  As used in this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings as defined in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Criminal record" * * * shall mean means any type of felony or misdemeanor conviction. (b) "Licensing" * * * shall mean means any required training, education * * *, or fee to work in a specific * * * profession occupation. (c)  "Licensing authority" * * * shall mean means an agency, examining board, credentialing board * * *, or other * * * office entity with the authority to impose occupational fees or licensing requirements on * * * any profession an occupation. (d) "Disqualifying crime" means a crime that directly relates to the duties and responsibilities of an occupation for which a licensing authority has jurisdiction.  A crime is not a "disqualifying crime" if a licensing authority has considered the factors of the crime and granted approval of a license under Section 73-77-7(2) and (3). SECTION 3.  Section 73-77-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-77-5. * * *  Absent applicable state law  (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no person shall be disqualified from pursuing, practicing * * *, or engaging in any occupation for which a license is required solely or in part because of a prior conviction of a crime, unless the crime for which * * * an applicant the person was convicted directly relates to the duties and responsibilities for the licensed occupation.  The provisions of this section shall not apply to the admission or reinstatement of any person to The Mississippi Bar as an attorney in good standing authorized to practice law in accordance with Section 73-3-2 et seq. (2)  The provisions of this act shall not supersede the provisions of the Nurse Licensure Compact in Section 73-15-201 or any other interstate compact of which Mississippi is a member state. (3)  The provisions of this act shall not apply to persons or entities receiving licensure or certification under Section 73-34-1 et seq., Section 73-35-1 et seq., or Section 73-60-1 et seq. SECTION 4.  Section 73-77-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-77-7.  (1) * * *  Absent applicable state law  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, licensing authorities shall not * * * have in any rulemaking for their qualifications for licensure use vague or generic terms including, but not limited to, "moral turpitude," "any felony * * *," and "good character * * *." * * *  Absent applicable state law when promulgating rules and regulations related to the qualifications for licensure.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, when promulgating rules and regulations related to the qualifications for licensure, licensing authorities * * * may shall only consider criminal records that are specific and directly related to the duties and responsibilities * * * for of the licensed occupation * * * when evaluating applicants.  Anywhere the terms "felony," "moral turpitude" or other such terms are used to provide for the qualification or disqualification of a person for licensure, they shall mean a "disqualifying crime," as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (2)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the licensing authority shall * * * use apply the clear and convincing standard of proof * * * in when examining the following factors to determine whether * * * an applicant a person with a * * * disqualifying criminal conviction will be denied a license.  Absent applicable state law, the licensing authority shall make its determination based on the following factors criminal record will be disqualified from receiving a license: (a)  The nature and seriousness of the crime for which the * * * individual person was convicted; (b)  The passage of time since the * * * commission of the crime was committed; (c)  The relationship of the crime to the ability, capacity * * *, and fitness required to perform the duties and discharge the responsibilities of the licensed occupation; and (d)  Any evidence of rehabilitation or treatment undertaken by the individual that might mitigate against a direct relation. (3)  Nothing in this section shall preclude any board, commission or other licensing entity from granting licenses to individuals convicted of disqualifying crimes, after considering the factors listed under subsection (2) of this section. ( * * *34)  All licensing authorities shall meet the requirements listed in subsection (1) * * * by one hundred twenty (120) days after July 1, * * * 2019 2025. ( * * *45) * * *  For licensing authorities,  The requirements listed in subsections (1) and (2) shall also apply to any new occupational licenses created after July 1, * * * 2019 2025. * * * (5)  The licensing authority shall adopt necessary rules for the implementation of this section. (6)  The provisions of this section shall not apply to the admission or reinstatement of any person to The Mississippi Bar as an attorney in good standing authorized to practice law. (7)  The provisions of this act shall not supersede the provisions of the Nurse Licensure Compact in Section 73-15-201 or any other interstate compact of which Mississippi is a member state. (8)  The provisions of this act shall not apply to persons or entities receiving licensure or certification under Section 73-34-1 et seq., Section 73-35-1 et seq., or Section 73-60-1 et seq. (9)  For any board, commission or other licensing entity with an existing procedure for hearings and appeals concerning issuance or denial of a license codified in rules or statute on January 1, 2025, those existing procedures for hearings and appeals shall supersede the provisions of this section. SECTION 5.  Section 73-77-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-77-9.  (1) * * *  Absent applicable state law  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, * * * an individual a person with a criminal record may petition a licensing authority at any time for a determination of whether the * * * individual's person's criminal record will disqualify * * * the individual that person from obtaining a license.  This petition shall include details on the * * * individual's person's criminal record. The licensing authority shall inform the individual of his or her standing within thirty (30) days of receiving the petition from the * * * applicant person.  The licensing authority may charge a fee * * * to recoup its costs not to exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) for each petition. (2)  If a licensing authority * * * denies an individual disqualifies a person from receiving a license solely or in part because of the * * * individual's prior conviction of a crime person's criminal record, the licensing authority shall notify the * * * individual person in writing of the following: (a)  The grounds and reasons for * * * the denial or disqualification; (b)  That the * * * individual person has the right to a hearing to challenge the licensing authority's decision; (c)  The earliest date the person may reapply for a license; and (d)  That evidence of rehabilitation may be considered upon reapplication. (3)  If * * * an applicant's a person's criminal * * * history does not require a denial of a license under applicable state law, any written determination by the licensing authority that an applicant's criminal conviction is directly related to the duties and responsibilities for the licensed occupation must be documented in written findings for each of the preceding factors under subsection (2) by clear and convincing evidence sufficient for a reviewing court record disqualifies a person from receiving a license and the licensing authority determines that the criminal record is directly related to the duties and responsibilities of the licensed occupation, the licensing authority must document its findings in writing sufficient for a reviewing court. (4)  In any administrative hearing or civil litigation authorized under this section, the licensing authority shall carry the burden of proof on the question of whether the * * * applicant's person's criminal * * * conviction record directly relates to the * * * occupation for which the license is sought duties and responsibilities of the licensed occupation. (5)  The licensing authority shall * * * adopt promulgate the necessary rules * * * for the implementation and regulations to implement the provisions of this section. (6)  The provisions of this section shall not apply to the admission or reinstatement of any person to The Mississippi Bar as an attorney in good standing authorized to practice law, in accordance with Section 73-3-2 et seq. (7)  The provisions of this act shall not supersede the provisions of the Nurse Licensure Compact in Section 73-15-201 or any other interstate compact of which Mississippi is a member state. SECTION 6.  Section 19-5-353, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 19-5-353.  (1)  The initial minimum standard of training for local public safety and 911 telecommunicators shall be determined by the Board of Emergency Telecommunications Standards and Training.  All courses approved for minimum standards shall be taught by instructors certified by the course originator as instructors for such courses. (2)  The minimum standards may be changed at any time by the Board of Emergency Telecommunications Standards and Training, but shall always include at least two (2) hours of training related to handling complaints and/or calls of human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation of children as defined in Section 43-21-105, communicating with such victims and requiring the local public safety and 911 telecommunicators to contact the Department of Child Protection Services when human trafficking or commercial sexual exploitation is suspected. (3)  Changes in the minimum standards may be made upon request from any bona fide public safety, emergency medical or fire organization operating within the State of Mississippi. Requests for change shall be in writing submitted to either the State Law Enforcement Training Academy; the State Fire Academy; the Mississippi Chapter of the Associated Public Safety Communications Officers, Incorporated; the Mississippi Chapter of the National Emergency Number Association; the Mississippi State Board of Health, Emergency Medical Services Division; the Mississippi Justice Information Center; the Mississippi Sheriff's Association; the Mississippi Fire Chief's Association; the Mississippi Association of Chiefs of Police; or Mississippians for Emergency Medical Services. (4)  The minimum standards in no way are intended to restrict or limit any additional training which any department or agency may wish to employ, or any state or federal required training, but to serve as a basis or foundation for basic training. (5)  Persons in the employment of any public safety, fire, 911 PSAP or emergency medical agency as a telecommunicator on July 1, 1993, shall have three (3) years to be certified in the minimum standards courses provided they have been employed by such agency for a period of more than one (1) year prior to July 1, 1993. (6)  Persons having been employed by any public safety, fire, 911 PSAP or emergency medical agency as a telecommunicator for less than one (1) year prior to July 1, 1993, shall be required to have completed all the requirements for minimum training standards, as set forth in Sections 19-5-351 through 19-5-361, within one (1) year from July 1, 1993.  Persons certified on or before July 1, 1993, in any course or courses chosen shall be given credit for these courses, provided the courses are still current and such persons can provide a course completion certificate. (7)  Any person hired to perform the duties of a telecommunicator in any public safety, fire, 911 PSAP or emergency medical agency after July 1, 1993, shall complete the minimum training standards as set forth in Sections 19-5-351 through 19-5-361 within twelve (12) months of their employment or within twelve (12) months from the date that the Board of Emergency Telecommunications Standards and Training shall become operational. (8)  Professional certificates remain the property of the board, and the board reserves the right to either reprimand the holder of a certificate, suspend a certificate upon conditions imposed by the board, or cancel and recall any certificate when: (a)  The certificate was issued by administrative error; (b)  The certificate was obtained through misrepresentation or fraud; * * *  (c)  The holder has been convicted of any crime involving moral turpitude; ( * * *dc)  The holder has been convicted of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; or ( * * *ed)  Other due cause as determined by the board. When the board believes there is a reasonable basis for either the reprimand, suspension, cancellation of, or recalling the certification of a telecommunicator, notice and opportunity for a hearing shall be provided.  Any telecommunicator aggrieved by the findings and order of the board may file an appeal with the chancery court of the county in which such person is employed from the final order of the board.  Any telecommunicator whose certification has been cancelled pursuant to Sections 19-5-351 through 19-5-361 may reapply for certification but not sooner than two (2) years after the date on which the order of the board canceling such certification became final. (9)  Any state agency, political subdivision or "for-profit" ambulance, security or fire service company that employs a person as a telecommunicator who does not meet the requirements of Sections 19-5-351 through 19-5-361, or that employs a person whose certificate has been suspended or revoked under provisions of Sections 19-5-351 through 19-5-361, is prohibited from paying the salary of such person, and any person violating this subsection shall be personally liable for making such payment. (10)  These minimum standards and time limitations shall in no way conflict with other state and federal training as may be required to comply with established laws or regulations. SECTION 7.  Section 45-4-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-4-9.  (1)  (a)  After January 1, 2000, no person shall be appointed or employed as a jail officer or a part-time jail officer unless that person has been certified as being qualified under subsection (3) of this section. (b)  No person who is required to be certified shall be appointed or employed as a jail officer by any sheriff or police department for a period to exceed two (2) years without being certified.  The prohibition against the appointment or employment of a jail officer for a period not to exceed two (2) years may not be nullified by terminating the appointment or employment of such a person before the expiration of the time period and then rehiring the person for another period. Any person who, due to illness or other events beyond his control, as may be determined by the Board on Jail Officer Standards and Training, does not attend the required school or training as scheduled, may serve with full pay and benefits in such a capacity until he can attend the required school or training. (c)  No person shall serve as a jail officer in any full-, part-time, reserve or auxiliary capacity during a period when that person's certification has been suspended, cancelled or recalled pursuant to this chapter. (2)  Jail officers serving under permanent appointment on January 1, 2000, shall not be required to meet certification requirements of this section as a condition of continued employment; nor shall failure of any such jail officer to fulfill such requirements make that person ineligible for any promotional examination for which that person is otherwise eligible.  If any jail officer certified under this chapter leaves his employment and does not become employed as a jail officer within two (2) years from the date of termination of his prior employment, he shall be required to comply with board policy as to rehiring standards in order to be employed as a jail officer. (3)  In addition to the other requirements of this section, the Board on Jail Officer Standards and Training, by rules and regulations consistent with other provisions of law, shall fix other qualifications for the employment of jail officers, including education, physical and mental standards, citizenship, * * * good moral character, experience and such other matters as relate to the competence and reliability of persons to assume and discharge the responsibilities of jail officers, and the board shall prescribe the means for presenting evidence of fulfillment of these requirements.  Additionally, the board shall fix qualifications for the appointment or employment of part-time jail officers to essentially the same standards and requirements as jail officers.  The board shall develop and implement a part-time jail officer training program that meets the same performance objectives and has essentially the same or similar content as the programs approved by the board for full-time jail officers. (4)  (a)  The Board on Jail Officer Standards and Training shall issue a certificate evidencing satisfaction of the requirements of subsections (1) and (3) of this section to any applicant who presents such evidence as may be required by its rules and regulations of satisfactory completion of a program or course of instruction in another jurisdiction equivalent in content and quality to that required by the board for approved jail officer education and training programs in this state. (b)  The Board on Jail Officer Standards and Training shall issue a certificate to any person who successfully completes the Mississippi Department of Corrections' training program for correctional officers of regional jails. (c)  The Board on Jail Officer Standards and Training shall develop and train persons seeking certification as a correctional officer in the prevention of racial profiling. The provisions of this paragraph shall apply to all recruits who begin training on or after January 1, 2005. (5)  Professional certificates remain the property of the board, and the board reserves the right to either reprimand the holder of a certificate, suspend a certificate upon conditions imposed by the board, or cancel and recall any certificate when: (a)  The certificate was issued by administrative error; (b)  The certificate was obtained through misrepresentation or fraud; * * *  (c)  The holder has been convicted of any crime involving moral turpitude; ( * * *dc)  The holder has been convicted of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; or ( * * *ed)  Other due cause as determined by the board. (6)  When the board believes there is a reasonable basis for either the reprimand, suspension, cancellation of, or recalling the certification of a jail officer, notice and opportunity for a hearing shall be provided in accordance with law prior to such reprimand, suspension or revocation. (7)  Any jail officer aggrieved by the final findings and order of the board may file an appeal with the chancery court of the county in which the person is employed.  The appeal must be filed within thirty (30) days of the final order. (8)  Any jail officer whose certification has been cancelled may reapply for certification, but not sooner than two (2) years after the date on which the order canceling the certification becomes final. SECTION 8.  Section 45-6-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-6-11.  (1)  Law enforcement officers already serving under permanent appointment on July 1, 1981, and personnel of the Division of Community Services under Section 47-7-9 serving on July 1, 1994, shall not be required to meet any requirement of subsections (3) and (4) of this section as a condition of continued employment; nor shall failure of any such law enforcement officer to fulfill such requirements make that person ineligible for any promotional examination for which that person is otherwise eligible.  Provided, however, if any law enforcement officer certified under the provisions of this chapter leaves his or her employment as such and does not become employed as a law enforcement officer within two (2) years from the date of termination of his or her prior employment, he or she shall be required to comply with board policy as to rehiring standards in order to be employed as a law enforcement officer; except, that, if any law enforcement officer certified under this chapter leaves his or her employment as such to serve as a sheriff, he or she may be employed as a law enforcement officer after he or she has completed his or her service as a sheriff without being required to comply with board policy as to rehiring standards.  Part-time law enforcement officers serving on or before July 1, 1998, shall have until July 1, 2001, to obtain certification as a part-time officer. (2)  (a)  Any person who has twenty (20) years of law enforcement experience and who is eligible to be certified under this section shall be eligible for recertification after leaving law enforcement on the same basis as someone who has taken the basic training course.  Application to the board to qualify under this paragraph shall be made no later than June 30, 1993. (b)  Any person who has twenty-five (25) years of law enforcement experience, whether as a part-time, full-time, reserve or auxiliary officer, and who has received certification as a part-time officer, may be certified as a law enforcement officer as defined in Section 45-6-3(c) without having to meet further requirements.  Application to the board to qualify under this paragraph shall be made no later than June 30, 2009. (3)  (a)  No person shall be appointed or employed as a law enforcement officer or a part-time law enforcement officer unless that person has been certified as being qualified under the provisions of subsection (4) of this section. (b)  No person shall be appointed or employed as a law enforcement trainee in a full-time capacity by any law enforcement unit for a period to exceed one (1) year.  No person shall be appointed or employed as a law enforcement trainee in a part-time, reserve or auxiliary capacity by any law enforcement unit for a period to exceed two (2) years.  The prohibition against the appointment or employment of a law enforcement trainee in a full-time capacity for a period not to exceed one (1) year or a part-time, reserve or auxiliary capacity for a period not to exceed two (2) years may not be nullified by terminating the appointment or employment of such a person before the expiration of the time period and then rehiring the person for another period.  Any person, who, due to illness or other events beyond his control, could not attend the required school or training as scheduled, may serve with full pay and benefits in such a capacity until he can attend the required school or training. (c)  No person shall serve as a law enforcement officer in any full-time, part-time, reserve or auxiliary capacity during a period when that person's certification has been suspended, cancelled or recalled pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. (4)  In addition to the requirements of subsections (3), (7) and (8) of this section, the board, by rules and regulations consistent with other provisions of law, shall fix other qualifications for the employment of law enforcement officers, including minimum age, education, physical and mental standards, citizenship, * * * good moral character, experience and such other matters as relate to the competence and reliability of persons to assume and discharge the responsibilities of law enforcement officers, and the board shall prescribe the means for presenting evidence of fulfillment of these requirements.  Additionally, the board shall fix qualifications for the appointment or employment of part-time law enforcement officers to essentially the same standards and requirements as law enforcement officers.  The board shall develop and implement a part-time law enforcement officer training program that meets the same performance objectives and has essentially the same or similar content as the programs approved by the board for full-time law enforcement officers and the board shall provide that such training shall be available locally and held at times convenient to the persons required to receive such training. (5)  Any elected sheriff, constable, deputy or chief of police may apply for certification.  Such certification shall be granted at the request of the elected official after providing evidence of satisfaction of the requirements of subsections (3) and (4) of this section.  Certification granted to such elected officials shall be granted under the same standards and conditions as established by law enforcement officers and shall be subject to recall as in subsection (7) of this section. (6)  The board shall issue a certificate evidencing satisfaction of the requirements of subsections (3) and (4) of this section to any applicant who presents such evidence as may be required by its rules and regulations of satisfactory completion of a program or course of instruction in another jurisdiction or military training equivalent in content and quality to that required by the board for approved law enforcement officer education and training programs in this state, and has satisfactorily passed any and all diagnostic testing and evaluation as required by the board to ensure competency. (7)  Professional certificates remain the property of the board, and the board reserves the right to either reprimand the holder of a certificate, suspend a certificate upon conditions imposed by the board, or cancel and recall any certificate when: (a)  The certificate was issued by administrative error; (b)  The certificate was obtained through misrepresentation or fraud; * * *  (c)  The holder has been convicted of any crime involving moral turpitude; ( * * *dc)  The holder has been convicted of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; ( * * *ed)  The holder has committed an act of malfeasance or has been dismissed from his employing law enforcement agency; or ( * * *fe)  Other due cause as determined by the board. (8)  When the board believes there is a reasonable basis for either the reprimand, suspension, cancellation of, or recalling the certification of a law enforcement officer or a part-time law enforcement officer, notice and opportunity for a hearing shall be provided in accordance with law prior to such reprimand, suspension or revocation. (9)  Any full- or part-time law enforcement officer aggrieved by the findings and order of the board may file an appeal with the chancery court of the county in which such person is employed from the final order of the board.  Such appeals must be filed within thirty (30) days of the final order of the board. (10)  Any full- or part-time law enforcement officer whose certification has been cancelled pursuant to this chapter may reapply for certification, but not sooner than two (2) years after the date on which the order of the board cancelling such certification becomes final. (11)  (a)  Any full- or part-time law enforcement officer, who is certified as required by the provisions under this chapter, and such officer resigns from his or her law enforcement agency, then the agency that the officer has resigned from shall notify the board in writing and by email within seventy-two (72) hours of the officer's resignation. (b)  If any full- or part-time law enforcement officer is terminated or resigns due to disciplinary action, the law enforcement agency shall notify the board within seventy-two (72) hours of the termination or resignation, as the case may be, and the agency shall provide in writing and by email to the board, the explanation for the termination or resignation of the officer.  The required explanation of such termination or resignation shall be submitted, along with the required notification, within the same seventy-two * * * (72)-hour time frame as required under this subsection. (c)  If a law enforcement agency fails to adhere to the reporting requirements of this subsection, as determined by the board, then such agency, during the time of noncompliance: (i)  Shall not be eligible for state grants or other subsidiary funding provided by the state; and (ii)  Shall not receive reimbursement for continuing education requirements as provided under Section 45-6-19. (d)  When the board determines that a law enforcement agency failed to adhere to the reporting requirements of this subsection, notice and opportunity for a hearing shall be provided by the board in accordance with law prior to the failure of the reporting. (e)  Any law enforcement agency that is aggrieved by any order or ruling made under the provisions of this subsection has the same rights and procedure of appeal as from any other order or ruling of the board. (f)  The board is authorized to institute and promulgate all rules necessary for implementing the requirements set out under this subsection (11). SECTION 9.  Section 73-1-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-1-13.  (1)  The board shall adopt rules and regulations for the eligibility, examination and registration of applicants desiring to practice architecture in accordance with this chapter and may amend, modify or repeal such rules and regulations. The board shall receive applications for registration as an architect only on forms prescribed and furnished by the board and upon receipt of such application may approve such applicant, providing such applicant meets the following requirements: (a)  The applicant must have a professional degree in architecture from a school or college of architecture on the list of accredited schools of architecture issued by the National Architectural Accrediting Board; (b)  The applicant must have been enrolled for a minimum of one (1) year in, and have completed all requirements of, a practical work internship program patterned after the National Council of Architectural Registration Boards intern-architect development program that will be prepared, adopted and approved by the board and must have received from the board a certification by the board that the applicant has met or exceeded the work requirements of the board.  The internship work program shall include, but not be limited to, the following subjects: (i)  Design and construction documents; (ii)  Construction administration; (iii)  Office management; and (iv)  Related special activities. (c)  The applicant must have passed the applicable National Council of Architectural Registration Board's examination; (d)  The applicant must have satisfied the board as to the applicant's good standing in the profession * * * and his moral character.  Any of the following acts shall preclude an applicant's eligibility as a candidate for registration: (i)  Conviction by any court for commission of any * * * felony or any crime involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (ii)  Conviction by any court of a misdemeanor involving fraud, deceit or misrepresentation; (iii)  Misstatement or misrepresentation of fact by the applicant in connection with the applicant's application for registration in this state or another jurisdiction; (iv)  Violation of any of the rules of conduct required of applicants or architects as adopted by board; (v)  Practicing architecture, or holding himself out as capable of practicing architecture, in this state in violation of the chapter. The board may admit an applicant otherwise precluded from consideration because of the prohibitions imposed in this paragraph (d) if the board determines that the applicant has shown clear and convincing evidence of rehabilitation and reform.  Such decision is in the sole discretion of the board and upon such terms, conditions and evidence as the board may require. Additionally, notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (b) of this subsection, if the applicant can provide sufficient and satisfactory evidence that he is unable to obtain the intern-architect development program certification, the board may accept in lieu thereof certification by the applicant that he has completed not less than three (3) continuous years of actual engagement in architectural work in the office or offices of a licensed architect or architects.  Such certification shall be on such terms, conditions and requirements as the board may establish. (2)  The board may require that the applicant appear before the board for a personal interview. SECTION 10.  Section 73-3-339, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-3-339.  Whenever any attorney subject to the disciplinary jurisdiction of the court shall be convicted in any state court or in any federal court, or enter a plea of guilty or a plea of nolo contendere therein, of any * * * felony other than manslaughter disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act or any violation of the United States Internal Revenue Code, or of any offense involving fraud, dishonesty, misrepresentation, deceit, or failure to account for money or property of a client, * * * or of any offense involving moral turpitude, a certified copy of the judgment of conviction shall be presented to the court by the Board of Commissioners.  Upon the presentation of such certified copy of judgment, the court shall forthwith strike the name of the attorney so convicted or who entered such a plea from the rolls of The Mississippi Bar and order his immediate suspension from practice, pending an appeal and final disposition of disciplinary proceedings.  Such attorney will be reinstated immediately upon the reversal of his conviction for the offense that has resulted in his automatic suspension, but such reinstatement shall not terminate any disciplinary proceeding then pending against the attorney. A certified copy of the final judgment of conviction of an attorney for any offense hereinabove specified shall be conclusive evidence of his guilt of that offense in any disciplinary proceeding instituted against him and based on said conviction. Upon the conviction of an attorney, or the entry by him of a plea of nolo contendere, for the above offenses, excluding manslaughter or any violation of the United States Internal Revenue Code, the Board of Commissioners shall immediately direct complaint counsel to institute a disciplinary proceeding in which the sole issue to be determined will be the extent of the final discipline to be imposed; provided, however, a disciplinary proceeding so instituted shall not be brought to hearing until all appeals from such conviction have been concluded. The judge of any court within this state in which an attorney has been convicted for any of the above enumerated offenses shall cause to be transmitted to the court and to the Board of Commissioners a certified copy of the judgment of conviction. SECTION 11.  Section 73-9-61, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-9-61.  (1)  Upon satisfactory proof, and in accordance with statutory provisions elsewhere set out for such hearings and protecting the rights of the accused as well as the public, the State Board of Dental Examiners may deny the issuance or renewal of a license or may revoke or suspend the license of any licensed dentist or dental hygienist practicing in the State of Mississippi, or take any other action in relation to the license as the board may deem proper under the circumstances, for any of the following reasons: (a)  Misrepresentation in obtaining a license, or attempting to obtain, obtaining, attempting to renew or renewing a license or professional credential by making any material misrepresentation, including the signing in his or her professional capacity any certificate that is known to be false at the time he or she makes or signs the certificate. (b)  Willful violation of any of the rules or regulations duly promulgated by the board, or of any of the rules or regulations duly promulgated by the appropriate dental licensure agency of another state or jurisdiction. (c)  Being impaired in the ability to practice dentistry or dental hygiene with reasonable skill and safety to patients by reason of illness or use of alcohol, drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or any other type of material or as a result of any mental or physical condition. (d)  Administering, dispensing or prescribing any prescriptive medication or drug outside the course of legitimate professional dental practice. (e)  Being convicted or found guilty of or entering a plea of nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, a violation of any federal or state law regulating the possession, distribution or use of any narcotic drug or any drug considered a controlled substance under state or federal law, a certified copy of the conviction order or judgment rendered by the trial court being prima facie evidence thereof, notwithstanding the pendency of any appeal. (f)  Practicing incompetently or negligently, regardless of whether there is actual harm to the patient. (g)  Being convicted or found guilty of or entering a plea of nolo contendere to, regardless of adjudication, a crime in any jurisdiction that relates to the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene, a certified copy of the conviction order or judgment rendered by the trial court being prima facie evidence thereof, notwithstanding the pendency of any appeal. (h)  Being convicted or found guilty of or entering a plea of nolo contendere to * * *, regardless of adjudication, a felony a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act in any jurisdiction, a certified copy of the conviction order or judgment rendered by the trial court being prima facie evidence thereof, notwithstanding the pendency of any appeal. (i)  Delegating professional responsibilities to a person who is not qualified by training, experience or licensure to perform them. (j)  The refusal of a licensing authority of another state or jurisdiction to issue or renew a license, permit or certificate to practice dentistry or dental hygiene in that jurisdiction or the revocation, suspension or other restriction imposed on a license, permit or certificate issued by the licensing authority that prevents or restricts practice in that jurisdiction, a certified copy of the disciplinary order or action taken by the other state or jurisdiction being prima facie evidence thereof, notwithstanding the pendency of any appeal. (k)  Surrender of a license or authorization to practice dentistry or dental hygiene in another state or jurisdiction when the board has reasonable cause to believe that the surrender is made to avoid or in anticipation of a disciplinary action. (l)  Any unprofessional conduct to be determined by the board on a case-by-case basis, which shall include, but not be restricted to, the following: * * *   (i)  Committing any crime involving moral turpitude. ( * * *iii)  Practicing deceit or other fraud upon the public. ( * * *iiiii)  Practicing dentistry or dental hygiene under a false or assumed name. ( * * *iviii)  Advertising that is false, deceptive or misleading. ( * * *viv)  Announcing a specialized practice shall be considered advertising that tends to deceive or mislead the public unless the dentist announcing as a specialist conforms to other statutory provisions and the duly promulgated rules or regulations of the board pertaining to practice of dentistry in the State of Mississippi. (m)  Failure to provide and maintain reasonable sanitary facilities and conditions or failure to follow board rules regarding infection control. (n)  Committing any act which would constitute sexual misconduct upon a patient or upon ancillary staff.  For purposes of this subsection, the term sexual misconduct means: (i)  Use of the licensee-patient relationship to engage or attempt to engage the patient in sexual activity; or (ii)  Conduct of a licensee that is intended to intimidate, coerce, influence or trick any person employed by or for the licensee in a dental practice or educational setting for the purpose of engaging in sexual activity or activity intended for the sexual gratification of the licensee. (o)  Violation of a lawful order of the board previously entered in a disciplinary or licensure hearing; failure to cooperate with any lawful request or investigation by the board; or failure to comply with a lawfully issued subpoena of the board. (p)  Willful, obstinate and continuing refusal to cooperate with the board in observing its rules and regulations in promptly paying all legal license or other fees required by law. (q)  Practicing dentistry or dental hygiene while the person's license is suspended. (r)  Violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners. (2)  In lieu of revocation of a license as provided for above, the board may suspend the license of the offending dentist or dental hygienist, suspend the sedation permit of the offending dentist, or take any other action in relation to his or her license as the board may deem proper under the circumstances. (3)  When a license to practice dentistry or dental hygiene is revoked or suspended by the board, the board may, in its discretion, stay the revocation or suspension and simultaneously place the licensee on probation upon the condition that the licensee shall not violate the laws of the State of Mississippi pertaining to the practice of dentistry or dental hygiene and shall not violate the rules and regulations of the board and shall not violate any terms in relation to his or her license as may be set by the board. (4)  In a proceeding conducted under this section by the board for the denial, revocation or suspension of a license to practice dentistry or dental hygiene, the board shall have the power and authority for the grounds stated for that denial, revocation or suspension, and in addition thereto or in lieu of that denial, revocation or suspension may assess and levy upon any person licensed to practice dentistry or dental hygiene in the State of Mississippi, a monetary penalty, as follows: (a)  For the first violation of any of paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d), (f), (i), (l), (m), (n), (o) or (q) of subsection (1) of this section, a monetary penalty of not less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). (b)  For the second violation of any of paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d), (f), (i), (l), (m), (n), (o) or (q) of subsection (1) of this section, a monetary penalty of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). (c)  For the third and any subsequent violation of any of paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d), (f), (i), (l), (m), (n), (o) or (q) of subsection (1) of this section, a monetary penalty of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00). (d)  For any violation of any of paragraphs (a) through (q) of subsection (1) of this section, those reasonable costs that are expended by the board in the investigation and conduct of a proceeding for licensure revocation or suspension, including, but not limited to, the cost of process service, court reporters, expert witnesses and investigators. (5)  The power and authority of the board to assess and levy monetary penalties under this section shall not be affected or diminished by any other proceeding, civil or criminal, concerning the same violation or violations except as provided in this section. (6)  A licensee shall have the right of appeal from the assessment and levy of a monetary penalty as provided in this section under the same conditions as a right of appeal is provided elsewhere for appeals from an adverse ruling, order or decision of the board. (7)  Any monetary penalty assessed and levied under this section shall not take effect until after the time for appeal has expired.  In the event of an appeal, the appeal shall act as a supersedeas. (8)  A monetary penalty assessed and levied under this section shall be paid to the board by the licensee upon the expiration of the period allowed for appeal of those penalties under this section or may be paid sooner if the licensee elects.  With the exception of subsection (4)(d) of this section, monetary penalties collected by the board under this section shall be deposited to the credit of the General Fund of the State Treasury.  Any monies collected by the board under subsection (4)(d) of this section shall be deposited into the special fund operating account of the board. (9)  When payment of a monetary penalty assessed and levied by the board against a licensee in accordance with this section is not paid by the licensee when due under this section, the board shall have power to institute and maintain proceedings in its name for enforcement of payment in the chancery court of the county and judicial district of residence of the licensee, and if the licensee is a nonresident of the State of Mississippi, the proceedings shall be in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi. (10)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (11)  All grounds for disciplinary action, including imposition of fines and assessment of costs as enumerated above, shall also apply to any other license or permit issued by the board under this chapter or regulations duly adopted by the board. SECTION 12.  Section 73-11-57, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-11-57.  (1)  The board, upon satisfactory proof at proper hearing and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations of the board, may suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew any license under this chapter, reprimand or place the holder of a license on a term of probation, and/or take any other action in relation to a license as the board may deem proper under the circumstances upon any of the following grounds: (a)  The employment of fraud or deception in applying for a license or in passing the examination provided for in this chapter; (b)  The erroneous issuance of a license to any person; (c)  The conviction of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act by any court in this state or any federal court or by the court of any other state or territory of the United States; having been convicted of or pled guilty to a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act in the courts of this state or any other state, territory or country which would prevent a person from holding elected office. Conviction, as used in this paragraph, shall include a deferred conviction, deferred prosecution, deferred sentence, finding or verdict of guilt, an admission of guilty, or a plea of nolo contendere; (d)  The practice of embalming under a false name or without a license for the practice of funeral service; (e)  The impersonation of another funeral service or funeral directing licensee; (f)  The permitting of a person other than a funeral service or funeral directing licensee to make arrangements for a funeral and/or form of disposition; (g)  Violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation of the board; (h)  Having had a license for the practice of funeral service or funeral directing suspended or revoked in any jurisdiction, having voluntarily surrendered his license in any jurisdiction, having been placed on probation in any jurisdiction, having been placed under disciplinary order(s) or other restriction in any manner for funeral directing and/or funeral service, or operating a funeral establishment (a certified copy of the order of suspension, revocation, probation or disciplinary action shall be prima facie evidence of such action); (i)  Solicitation of dead human bodies by the licensee, his agents, assistants or employees, whether such solicitation occurs after death or when death is imminent; if the person solicited has made known a desire not to receive the communication, or if the solicitation involves coercion, duress or harassment, or if the solicitation takes place at the residence of the client or prospective client and is uninvited by the client or prospective client and has not been previously agreed to by the client or prospective client; however, this shall not be deemed to prohibit general advertising; (j)  Employment directly or indirectly of any apprentice, agent, assistant, employee, or other person, on a part-time or full-time basis or on commission, for the purpose of calling upon individuals or institutions by whose influence dead human bodies may be turned over to a particular funeral establishment; (k)  Failure to give full cooperation to the board and/or its designees, agents or other representatives in the performance of official duties of the board.  Such failure to cooperate includes, but is not limited to: (i)  Not furnishing any relevant papers or documents requested by or for the board; (ii)  Not furnishing, in writing, an adequate explanation covering the matter contained in a complaint filed with the board; (iii)  Not responding without cause to subpoenas issued by the board, whether or not the licensee is the party charged in any preceding before the board; (iv)  Not reasonably providing access, as directed by the board for its authorized agents or representatives seeking to perform reviews or inspections at facilities or places utilized by the license holder in the practice of funeral service or funeral directing and/or in performing any other activity regulated by the board under this chapter; (v)  Failure to provide information within the specified time allotted and as required by the board and/or its representatives or designees; (vi)  Failure to cooperate with the board or its designees or representatives in the investigation of any alleged misconduct or interfering with a board investigation by willful misrepresentation of facts; (vii)  Deceiving or attempting to deceive the board regarding any matter under investigation, including altering or destroying any records; and (viii)  Failure, without good cause, to cooperate with any request by the board to appear before it; (l)  Knowingly performing any act that in any way assists an unlicensed person to practice funeral service or funeral directing; (m)  Knowingly making a false statement on death certificates; * * *  (n)  Conviction of a crime involving moral turpitude; ( * * *on)  Violating any statute, ordinance, rule or regulation of the state or any of its boards, agencies or political subdivisions affecting the registration of deaths or the handling, custody, care or transportation of dead human bodies; or ( * * *po)  Unprofessional conduct in the practice of funeral service or funeral directing which includes, but is not limited to: (i)  Retaining a dead human body for the payment of a fee for the performance of services that are not authorized; (ii)  Knowingly performing any act which in any way assists an unlicensed person to practice funeral service or funeral directing; (iii)  Being guilty of any dishonorable conduct likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public; (iv)  Any act or omission in the practice of funeral service or directing which constitutes dishonesty, fraud or misrepresentation with the intent to benefit the licensee, another person or funeral establishment, or with the intent to substantially injure another person, licensee or funeral establishment; or (v)  Any act or conduct, whether the same or of a different character than specified above, which constitutes or demonstrates bad faith, incompetency or untrustworthiness; or dishonest, fraudulent or improper dealing; or any other violation of the provisions of this chapter, the rules and regulations established by the board or any rule or regulation promulgated by the Federal Trade Commission relative to the practice of funeral service or funeral directing. (2)  Any person, including a member of the board, may initiate a complaint against a licensee of the board by filing with the board a written complaint on a form prescribed by the board. (a)  Upon receipt of a properly verified complaint, the board shall send a copy of the complaint to the affected licensee by certified mail to the address of such licensee appearing of record with the board.  The licensee shall answer the complaint in writing within twenty (20) days after receipt of the complaint.  The licensee shall mail a copy of his, her or its response to the board and the complainant.  Upon receipt of the licensee's response or lapse of twenty (20) days, the board is authorized to investigate a complaint that appears to show the existence of any of the causes or grounds for disciplinary action as provided in Section 73-11-57.  Upon finding reasonable cause to believe that the charges are not frivolous, unfounded or filed in bad faith, the board may, in its discretion, cause a hearing to be held, at a time and place fixed by the board, regarding the charges that a violation of this chapter has occurred. The board shall order a hearing for the licensee to appear and show cause why he/she should not be disciplined for a violation of this chapter. (b)  The board shall give the complainant and the affected licensee twenty (20) days' notice of any hearing upon a complaint.  Such notice shall be by United States certified mail. (c)  Any party appearing before the board may be accompanied by counsel. (d)  Before commencing a hearing, the chairman or designee of the board shall determine if all parties are present and ready to proceed.  If the complainant fails to attend a hearing without good cause shown, the complaint shall be dismissed summarily and all fees and expenses of convening the hearing shall be assessed to, and paid by, the complainant.  If any affected licensee fails to appear for a hearing without good cause shown, such licensee shall be presumed to have waived his right to appear before the board and be heard. (e)  Upon the chair's determination that all parties are ready to proceed, the chair or designee shall call the hearing to order and the complainant and the licensee may give opening statements.  The board may order the sequestration of nonparty witnesses. (f)  The complainant shall then present his, her or its complaint.  The licensee, any counsel and any member or designee of the board may ask questions of witnesses. (g)  The licensee shall then present his, her or its case in rebuttal.  The complainant, any counsel and any member or designee of the board may ask questions of witnesses. (h)  At the completion of the evidence, all parties may give closing statements. (i)  At the conclusion of the hearing, the board may either decide the issue at that time or take the case under advisement for further deliberation.  The board shall render its decision not more than ninety (90) days after the close of the hearing and shall forward the decision to the last-known business or residence address of the parties. (3)  The board, on its own motion, may file a formal complaint against a licensee. (4)  The board may temporarily suspend a license under this chapter without any hearing, simultaneously with the institution of proceedings under this section, if it finds that the evidence in support of the board's determination is clear, competent and unequivocal and that the licensee's continuation in practice would constitute an imminent danger to public health and safety. (5)  The board may, upon satisfactory proof that the applicant or licensee has been guilty of any of the offenses above enumerated, take the action authorized by this section against an applicant or licensee of the board upon a majority vote of the board members, after a hearing thereon.  The board is vested with full power and authority to hold and conduct such hearings, compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, records and documents, issue subpoenas therefor, administer oaths, examine witnesses, and do all things necessary to properly conduct such hearings.  The board may waive the necessity of a hearing if the person accused of a violation admits that he has been guilty of such offense. Any person who has been refused a license or whose license has been revoked or suspended may, within thirty (30) days after the decision of the board, file with the board a written notice stating that he feels himself aggrieved by such decision and may appeal therefrom to the circuit court of the county and judicial district of residence of the person, or if the person is a nonresident of the State of Mississippi, to the Circuit Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County.  The circuit court shall determine the action of the board was in accord or consistent with law, or was arbitrary, unwarranted or an abuse of discretion.  The appeal shall be perfected upon filing notice of the appeal with the circuit court and by the prepayment of all costs, including the cost of the preparation of the record of the proceedings by the board.  An appeal from the circuit court judgment or decree may be reviewed by the Supreme Court as is provided by law for other appeals.  An appeal of a decision or order of the board does not act as a supersedeas. (6)  In addition to any other power that it has, the board may, upon finding that an applicant or licensee has committed any of the violations listed in Section 73-11-57(1), impose a monetary penalty as follows: (a)  For the first violation of any of the subparagraphs of subsection (1) of this section, a monetary penalty of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). (b)  For the second violation of any of the subparagraphs of subsection (1) of this section, a monetary penalty of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). (c)  For the third and any subsequent violation of any of the subparagraphs of subsection (1) of this section, a monetary penalty of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00). (d)  For any violation of any of the subparagraphs of subsection (1) of this section, those reasonable costs that are expended by the board in the investigation and conduct of a proceeding for licensure revocation or suspension, including, but not limited to, the cost of process service, court reporters, expert witnesses and investigators. (7)  The power and authority of the board to assess and levy such monetary penalties hereunder shall not be affected or diminished by any other proceeding, civil or criminal, concerning the same violation or violations except as provided in this section. (8)  A licensee shall have the right of appeal from the assessment and levy of a monetary penalty as provided in this section under the same conditions as a right of appeal is provided elsewhere for appeals from an adverse ruling, order or decision of the board. (9)  Any monetary penalty assessed and levied under this section shall not take effect until after the time for appeal shall have expired. (10)  A monetary penalty assessed and levied under this section shall be paid to the board by the licensee upon the expiration of the period allowed for appeal of such penalties under this section or may be paid sooner if the licensee elects. With the exception of subsection (5)(d) of this section, monetary penalties collected by the board under this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the State Board of Funeral Service.  Any monies collected by the board under subsection (5)(d) of this section shall be deposited into the special fund operating account of the board. (11)  When payment of a monetary penalty assessed and levied by the board against a licensee in accordance with this section is not paid by the licensee when due under this section, the board shall have power to institute and maintain proceedings in its name for enforcement of payment in the chancery court of the county and judicial district of residence of the licensee, or if the licensee is a nonresident of the State of Mississippi, in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi. (12)  In any administrative or judicial proceeding in which the board prevails, the board shall have the right to recover reasonable attorney fees. (13)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  Actions taken by the board in suspending a license when required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 are not actions from which an appeal may be taken under this section.  Any appeal of a license suspension that is required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 shall be taken in accordance with the appeal procedure specified in Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, rather than the procedure specified in this section.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 13.  Section 73-14-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-14-35.  (1)  Any person registered under this chapter may have his license or certificate revoked or suspended for a fixed period to be determined by the board for any of the following causes: (a)  Being convicted of * * * an offense involving moral turpitude a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act.  The record of such conviction, or certified copy thereof from the clerk of the court where such conviction occurred or by the judge of that court, shall be sufficient evidence to warrant revocation or suspension. (b)  By securing a license or certificate under this chapter through fraud or deceit. (c)  For unethical conduct or for gross ignorance or inefficiency in the conduct of his practice. (d)  For knowingly practicing while suffering with a contagious or infectious disease. (e)  For the use of a false name or alias in the practice of his profession. (f)  For violating any of the provisions of this chapter or any rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter. (g)  For violating the provisions of any applicable federal laws or regulations. (h)  Discipline by another jurisdiction if at least one (1) of the grounds for the discipline is the same or substantially equivalent to those set forth in this chapter or rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter. (2)  In addition to the causes specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 14.  Section 73-15-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-15-29.  (1)  The board shall have power to revoke, suspend or refuse to renew any license issued by the board, or to revoke or suspend any privilege to practice, or to deny an application for a license, or to fine, place on probation and/or discipline a licensee, in any manner specified in this article, upon proof that such person: (a)  Has committed fraud or deceit in securing or attempting to secure such license; (b)  Has been convicted of a * * * felony, or a crime involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act or has had accepted by a court a plea of nolo contendere to a * * * felony or a crime involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act (a certified copy of the judgment of the court of competent jurisdiction of such conviction or pleas shall be prima facie evidence of such conviction); (c)  Has negligently or willfully acted in a manner inconsistent with the health or safety of the persons under the licensee's care; (d)  Has had a license or privilege to practice as a registered nurse or a licensed practical nurse suspended or revoked in any jurisdiction, has voluntarily surrendered such license or privilege to practice in any jurisdiction, has been placed on probation as a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse in any jurisdiction or has been placed under a disciplinary order(s) in any manner as a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse in any jurisdiction, (a certified copy of the order of suspension, revocation, probation or disciplinary action shall be prima facie evidence of such action); (e)  Has negligently or willfully practiced nursing in a manner that fails to meet generally accepted standards of such nursing practice; (f)  Has negligently or willfully violated any order, rule or regulation of the board pertaining to nursing practice or licensure; (g)  Has falsified or in a repeatedly negligent manner made incorrect entries or failed to make essential entries on records; (h)  Is addicted to or dependent on alcohol or other habit-forming drugs or is a habitual user of narcotics, barbiturates, amphetamines, hallucinogens, or other drugs having similar effect, or has misappropriated any medication; (i)  Has a physical, mental or emotional condition that renders the licensee unable to perform nursing services or duties with reasonable skill and safety; (j)  Has engaged in any other conduct, whether of the same or of a different character from that specified in this article, that would constitute a disqualifying crime as defined in * * * Title 97 of the Mississippi Code of 1972, as now or hereafter amended, and that relates to such person's employment as a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse the Fresh Start Act; (k)  Engages in conduct likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public; (l)  Engages in any unprofessional conduct as identified by the board in its rules; (m)  Has violated any provision of this article; (n)  Violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners; or (o)  Violation(s) of any provision of Title 41, Chapter 141, Mississippi Code of 1972. (2)  When the board finds any person unqualified because of any of the grounds set forth in subsection (1) of this section, it may enter an order imposing one or more of the following penalties: (a)  Denying application for a license or other authorization to practice nursing or practical nursing; (b)  Administering a reprimand; (c)  Suspending or restricting the license or other authorization to practice as a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse for up to two (2) years without review; (d)  Revoking the license or other authorization to practice nursing or practical nursing; (e)  Requiring the disciplinee to submit to care, counseling or treatment by persons and/or agencies approved or designated by the board as a condition for initial, continued or renewed licensure or other authorization to practice nursing or practical nursing; (f)  Requiring the disciplinee to participate in a program of education prescribed by the board as a condition for initial, continued or renewed licensure or other authorization to practice; (g)  Requiring the disciplinee to practice under the supervision of a registered nurse for a specified period of time; or (h)  Imposing a fine not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). (3)  In addition to the grounds specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license or privilege to practice of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153. The procedure for suspension of a license or privilege to practice for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license or privilege to practice suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license or privilege to practice suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this article, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (4)  If the public health, safety or welfare imperatively requires emergency action and the board incorporates a finding to that effect in an order, the board may order summary suspension of a license pending proceedings for revocation or other action. These proceedings shall be promptly instituted and determined by the board. (5)  The board may establish by rule an alternative to discipline program for licensees who have an impairment as a result of substance abuse or a mental health condition, which program shall include at least the following components: (a)  Participation in the program is voluntary with the licensee, and the licensee must enter the program before the board holds a disciplinary action hearing regarding the licensee; (b)  The full cost of participation in the program, including the cost of any care, counseling, treatment and/or education received by the licensee, shall be borne by the licensee; (c)  All of the procedures and records regarding the licensee's participation in the program shall be confidential, shall not be disclosed and shall be exempt from the provisions of the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983; and (d)  A licensee may not participate in the program more often than one (1) time during any period of five (5) years or such longer period as set by the board. (6)  A nurse practitioner who provides a written certification as authorized under the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act and in compliance with rules and regulations adopted thereunder shall not be subject to any disciplinary action under this section solely due to providing the written certification. SECTION 15.  Section 73-19-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-19-23.  (1)  (a)  The board shall refuse to grant a certificate of licensure to any applicant and may cancel, revoke or suspend the operation of any certificate by it granted for any or all of the following reasons:  unprofessional and unethical conduct * * * or the conviction of a crime involving moral turpitude, habitual intemperance in the use of ardent spirits, or stimulants, narcotics, or any other substance that impairs the intellect and judgment to such an extent as to incapacitate one for the performance of the duties of an optometrist.  The certificate of licensure of any person can be revoked for violating any section of this chapter. (b)  The board shall conduct a criminal history records check on licensure applicants and on licensees whose licenses are subject to investigation. (i)  The applicant or licensee shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant or licensee shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form or manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. (ii)  Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or licensee or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. (iii)  The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant or licensee, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. (iv)  The board shall charge and collect from the applicant or licensee, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant or licensee. (2)  The board shall further be authorized to take disciplinary action against a licensee for any unlawful acts, which shall include violations of regulations promulgated by the board, as well as the following acts: (a)  Fraud or misrepresentation in applying for or procuring an optometric license or in connection with applying for or procuring periodic renewal of an optometric license. (b)  Cheating on or attempting to subvert the optometric licensing examination(s). (c)  The conviction of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act in this state or any other jurisdiction, or the entry of a guilty or nolo contendere plea to a * * * felony charge disqualifying crime. (d)  The conviction of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act or as defined by federal law, or the entry of a guilty or nolo contendere plea to a * * * felony charge disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (e)  Conduct likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public. (f)  Making a false or misleading statement regarding his or her skill or the efficacy or value of the medicine, device, treatment or remedy prescribed by him or her or used at his or her direction in the treatment of any disease or other condition. (g)  Willfully or negligently violating the confidentiality between doctor and patient, except as required by law. (h)  Negligence or gross incompetence in the practice of optometry as determined by the board. (i)  Being found to be a person with mental illness or with an intellectual disability by any court of competent jurisdiction. (j)  The use of any false, fraudulent, deceptive or misleading statement in any document connected with the practice of optometry. (k)  Aiding or abetting the practice of optometry by an unlicensed, incompetent or impaired person. (l)  Commission of any act of sexual abuse, misconduct or exploitation related to the licensee's practice of optometry. (m)  Being addicted or habituated to a drug or intoxicant. (n)  Violating any state or federal law or regulation relating to a drug legally classified as a controlled substance. (o)  Obtaining any fee by fraud, deceit or misrepresentation. (p)  Disciplinary action of another state or jurisdiction against a licensee or other authorization to practice optometry based upon acts or conduct by the licensee similar to acts or conduct that would constitute grounds for action as defined in this chapter, a certified copy of the record of the action taken by the other state or jurisdiction being conclusive evidence thereof. (q)  Failure to report to the board the relocation of his or her office in or out of the jurisdiction, or to furnish floor plans as required by regulation. (r)  Violation of any provision(s) of the Optometry Practice Act or the rules and regulations of the board or of an action, stipulation or agreement of the board. (s)  To advertise in a manner that tends to deceive, mislead or defraud the public. (t)  The designation of any person licensed under this chapter, other than by the terms "optometrist," "Doctor of Optometry" or "O.D.," which shall include any violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners. (u)  To knowingly submit or cause to be submitted any misleading, deceptive or fraudulent representation on a claim form, bill or statement. (v)  To practice or attempt to practice optometry while his or her license is suspended. (3)  Any person who is a holder of a certificate of licensure or who is an applicant for examination for a certificate of licensure, against whom is preferred any charges, shall be furnished by the board with a copy of the complaint and shall have a hearing in Jackson, Mississippi, before the board, at which hearing he may be represented by counsel.  At the hearing, witnesses may be examined for and against the accused respecting  those charges, and the hearing orders or appeals will be conducted according to the procedure now provided in Section 73-25-27.  The suspension of a certificate of licensure by reason of the use of stimulants or narcotics may be removed when the holder of the certificate has been adjudged by the board to be cured and capable of practicing optometry. (4)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (5)  A licensee who provides a written certification as authorized under the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act and in compliance with rules and regulations adopted thereunder shall not be subject to any disciplinary action under this section solely due to providing the written certification. SECTION 16.  Section 73-21-97, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-97.  (1)  The board may refuse to issue or renew, or may suspend, reprimand, revoke or restrict the license, registration or permit of any person, or may impose a monetary penalty, upon one or more of the following grounds: (a)  Unprofessional conduct as defined by the rules and regulations of the board; (b)  Incapacity of a nature that prevents a pharmacist or intern/extern from engaging in the practice of pharmacy or a pharmacy technician from engaging in or providing nonjudgmental technical services in the practice of pharmacy with reasonable skill, confidence and safety to the public; (c)  Being found guilty by a court of competent jurisdiction of one or more of the following: (i)  A * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (ii)  Any act involving * * * moral turpitude or gross immorality; or (iii)  Violation of pharmacy or drug laws of this state or rules or regulations pertaining thereto, or of statutes, rules or regulations of any other state or the federal government; (d)  Fraud or intentional misrepresentation by a licensee, registrant or permit holder in securing the issuance or renewal of a license or permit; (e)  Engaging or aiding and abetting an individual to engage in the practice of pharmacy without a license; (f)  Violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or rules or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter; (g)  Failure to comply with lawful orders of the board; (h)  Negligently or willfully acting in a manner inconsistent with the health or safety of the public; (i)  Addiction to or dependence on alcohol or controlled substances or the unauthorized use or possession of controlled substances; (j)  Misappropriation of any prescription drug; (k)  Being found guilty by the licensing agency in another state of violating the statutes, rules or regulations of that jurisdiction; (l)  The unlawful or unauthorized possession of a controlled substance; (m)  Willful failure to submit drug monitoring information or willful submission of incorrect dispensing information as required by the Prescription Monitoring Program under Section 73-21-127; (n)  Failure to obtain the license, registration or permit required by this chapter; or (o)  Violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners. (2)  In lieu of suspension, revocation or restriction of a license, registration or permit as provided for above, the board may warn, reprimand or issue a citation to the offending licensee, registrant or permit holder. (3)  In addition to the grounds specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license, registration or permit of any person for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153. The procedure for suspension of a license, registration or permit for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license, registration or permit suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license, registration or permit suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 17.  Section 73-25-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-25-29.  The grounds for the nonissuance, suspension, revocation or restriction of a license or the denial of reinstatement or renewal of a license are: (1)  Habitual personal use of narcotic drugs, or any other drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. (2)  Habitual use of intoxicating liquors, or any beverage, to an extent which affects professional competency. (3)  Administering, dispensing or prescribing any narcotic drug, or any other drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability otherwise than in the course of legitimate professional practice. (4)  Conviction of violation of any federal or state law regulating the possession, distribution or use of any narcotic drug or any drug considered a controlled substance under state or federal law, a certified copy of the conviction order or judgment rendered by the trial court being prima facie evidence thereof, notwithstanding the pendency of any appeal. (5)  Procuring, or attempting to procure, or aiding in, an abortion that is not medically indicated. (6)  Conviction of a * * * felony or misdemeanor involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, a certified copy of the conviction order or judgment rendered by the trial court being prima facie evidence thereof, notwithstanding the pendency of any appeal. (7)  Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license by fraud or deception. (8)  Unprofessional conduct, which includes, but is not limited to: (a)  Practicing medicine under a false or assumed name or impersonating another practitioner, living or dead. (b)  Knowingly performing any act which in any way assists an unlicensed person to practice medicine. (c)  Making or willfully causing to be made any flamboyant claims concerning the licensee's professional excellence. (d)  Being guilty of any dishonorable or unethical conduct likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public. (e)  Obtaining a fee as personal compensation or gain from a person on fraudulent representation of a disease or injury condition generally considered incurable by competent medical authority in the light of current scientific knowledge and practice can be cured or offering, undertaking, attempting or agreeing to cure or treat the same by a secret method, which he refuses to divulge to the board upon request. (f)  Use of any false, fraudulent or forged statement or document, or the use of any fraudulent, deceitful, dishonest or immoral practice in connection with any of the licensing requirements, including the signing in his professional capacity any certificate that is known to be false at the time he makes or signs such certificate. (g)  Failing to identify a physician's school of practice in all professional uses of his name by use of his earned degree or a description of his school of practice. (9)  The refusal of a licensing authority of another state or jurisdiction to issue or renew a license, permit or certificate to practice medicine in that jurisdiction or the revocation, suspension or other restriction imposed on a license, permit or certificate issued by such licensing authority which prevents or restricts practice in that jurisdiction, a certified copy of the disciplinary order or action taken by the other state or jurisdiction being prima facie evidence thereof, notwithstanding the pendency of any appeal. (10)  Surrender of a license or authorization to practice medicine in another state or jurisdiction or surrender of membership on any medical staff or in any medical or professional association or society while under disciplinary investigation by any of those authorities or bodies for acts or conduct similar to acts or conduct which would constitute grounds for action as defined in this section. (11)  Final sanctions imposed by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Office of Inspector General or any successor federal agency or office, based upon a finding of incompetency, gross misconduct or failure to meet professionally recognized standards of health care; a certified copy of the notice of final sanction being prima facie evidence thereof.  As used in this paragraph, the term "final sanction" means the written notice to a physician from the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Officer of Inspector General or any successor federal agency or office, which implements the exclusion. (12)  Failure to furnish the board, its investigators or representatives information legally requested by the board. (13)  Violation of any provision(s) of the Medical Practice Act or the rules and regulations of the board or of any order, stipulation or agreement with the board. (14)  Violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners. (15)  Performing or inducing an abortion on a woman in violation of any provision of Sections 41-41-131 through 41-41-145. (16)  Performing an abortion on a pregnant woman after determining that the unborn human individual that the pregnant woman is carrying has a detectable fetal heartbeat as provided in Section 41-41-34.1. (17)  Violation(s) of any provision of Title 41, Chapter 141, Mississippi Code of 1972. In addition to the grounds specified above, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. A physician who provides a written certification as authorized under the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act and in compliance with rules and regulations adopted thereunder shall not be subject to any disciplinary action under this section solely due to providing the written certification. SECTION 18.  Section 73-29-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-29-13.  A person is qualified to receive a license as an examiner: (1)  Who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age; (2)  Who is a citizen of the United States; (3)  Who establishes that he is a person of honesty, truthfulness, integrity, and moral fitness; (4)  Who has not been convicted of a * * * felony or a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (5)  Who holds a baccalaureate degree from a college or university accredited by the American Association of Collegiate Registrars and Admissions Officers or, in lieu thereof, has five (5) consecutive years of active investigative experience immediately preceding his application; (6)  Who is a graduate of a polygraph examiners course approved by the board and has satisfactorily completed not less than six (6) months of internship training, provided that if the applicant is not a graduate of an approved polygraph examiners course, satisfactory completion of not less than twelve (12) months of internship training may satisfy this subdivision; and (7)  Prior to the issuance of a license, the applicant must furnish to the board evidence of a surety bond or insurance policy.  Said surety bond or insurance policy shall be in the sum of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) and shall be conditioned that the obligor therein will pay to the extent of the face amount of such surety bond or insurance policy all judgments which may be recovered against the licensee by reason of any wrongful or illegal acts committed by him in the course of his examinations. SECTION 19.  Section 73-29-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-29-31.  (1)  The board may refuse to issue or may suspend or revoke a license on any one or more of the following grounds: (a)  For failing to inform a subject to be examined as to the nature of the examination; (b)  For failing to inform a subject to be examined that his participation in the examination is voluntary; (c)  Material misstatement in the application for original license or in the application for any renewal license under this chapter; (d)  Willful disregard or violation of this chapter or of any regulation or rule issued pursuant thereto, including, but not limited to, willfully making a false report concerning an examination for polygraph examination purposes; (e)  If the holder of any license has been adjudged guilty of the commission of a * * * felony or a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (f)  Making any willful misrepresentation or false promises or causing to be printed any false or misleading advertisement for the purpose of directly or indirectly obtaining business or trainees; (g)  Having demonstrated unworthiness or incompetency to act as a polygraph examiner as defined by this chapter; (h)  Allowing one's license under this chapter to be used by any unlicensed person in violation of the provisions of this chapter; (i)  Willfully aiding or abetting another in the violation of this chapter or any regulation or rule issued pursuant thereto; (j)  Where the license holder has been adjudged by a court of competent jurisdiction as habitual drunkard, mentally incompetent, or in need of a conservator; (k)  Failing, within a reasonable time, to provide information requested by the secretary as the result of a formal complaint to the board which would indicate a violation of this chapter; (l)  Failing to inform the subject of the results of the examination if so requested; or (m)  With regard to any polygraph examiner employed for a fee and not employed by a governmental law enforcement agency or the Mississippi Department of Corrections: (i)  Requiring a subject, prior to taking the examination or as a condition of receiving the results of the examination, to waive any rights or causes of action he may have or which may accrue in favor of the subject arising out of or resulting from the administration of the examination; except the examiner may require, prior to the examination or as a condition of receiving the results of the examination, a subject to waive any rights or causes of action that may accrue against the examiner as a result of any use made of the results of the examination by the person who employed the examiner; (ii)  Requiring a subject to acknowledge that his examination is not done for purposes of employment when, in fact, the results of the examination are to be submitted to an employer or an agent of an employer; or (iii)  Reporting the results of an examination to any person not authorized to receive the results of the examination except for the person who employed the examiner, unless authorized in writing by the subject. (2)   In addition to the grounds specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 20.  Section 73-31-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-31-21.  (1)  The board, by an affirmative vote of at least four (4) of its seven (7) members, shall withhold, deny, revoke or suspend any license issued or applied for in accordance with the provisions of this article, or otherwise discipline a licensed psychologist, upon proof that the applicant or licensed psychologist: (a)  Has violated the current code of ethics of the American Psychological Association or other codes of ethical standards adopted by the board; or (b)  Has been convicted of a * * * felony or any offense involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, the record of conviction being conclusive evidence thereof; or (c)  Is using any substance or any alcoholic beverage to an extent or in a manner dangerous to any other person or the public, or to an extent that the use impairs his or her ability to perform the work of a professional psychologist with safety to the public; or (d)  Has impersonated another person holding a psychologist license or allowed another person to use his or her license; or (e)  Has used fraud or deception in applying for a license or in taking an examination provided for in this article; or (f)  Has accepted commissions or rebates or other forms of remuneration for referring clients to other professional persons; or (g)  Has performed psychological services outside of the area of his or her training, experience or competence; or (h)  Has allowed his or her name or license issued under this article to be used in connection with any person or persons who perform psychological services outside of the area of their training, experience or competence; or (i)  Is legally adjudicated mentally incompetent, the record of that adjudication being conclusive evidence thereof; or (j)  Has willfully or negligently violated any of the provisions of this article.  The board may recover from any person disciplined under this article, the costs of investigation, prosecution, and adjudication of the disciplinary action. (2)  Notice shall be effected by registered mail or personal service setting forth the particular reasons for the proposed action and fixing a date not less than thirty (30) days nor more than sixty (60) days from the date of the mailing or that service, at which time the applicant or licensee shall be given an opportunity for a prompt and fair hearing.  For the purpose of the hearing, the board, acting by and through its executive secretary, may subpoena persons and papers on its own behalf and on behalf of the applicant or licensee, may administer oaths and may take testimony.  That testimony, when properly transcribed, together with the papers and exhibits, shall be admissible in evidence for or against the applicant or licensee.  At the hearing, the applicant or licensee may appear by counsel and personally in his or her own behalf.  Any person sworn and examined by a witness in the hearing shall not be held to answer criminally, nor shall any papers or documents produced by the witness be competent evidence in any criminal proceedings against the witness other than for perjury in delivering his or her evidence.  On the basis of any such hearing, or upon default of applicant or licensee, the board shall make a determination specifying its findings of fact and conclusions of law.  A copy of that determination shall be sent by registered mail or served personally upon the applicant or licensee.  The decision of the board denying, revoking or suspending the license shall become final thirty (30) days after so mailed or served, unless within that period the applicant or licensee appeals the decision to the chancery court, under the provisions hereof, and the proceedings in chancery shall be conducted as other matters coming before the court.  All proceedings and evidence, together with exhibits, presented at the hearing before the board shall be admissible in evidence in court in the appeal. (3)  The board may subpoena persons and papers on its own behalf and on behalf of the respondent, may administer oaths and may compel the testimony of witnesses.  It may issue commissions to take testimony, and testimony so taken and sworn to shall be admissible in evidence for and against the respondent.  The board shall be entitled to the assistance of the chancery court or the chancellor in vacation, which, on petition by the board, shall issue ancillary subpoenas and petitions and may punish as for contempt of court in the event of noncompliance therewith. (4)  Every order and judgment of the board shall take effect immediately on its promulgation unless the board in the order or judgment fixes a probationary period for the applicant or  licensee.  The order and judgment shall continue in effect unless upon appeal the court by proper order or decree terminates it earlier.  The board may make public its order and judgments in  any manner and form as it deems proper.  It shall, in event of the suspension or revocation of a license, direct the clerk of the circuit court of the county in which that license was recorded to cancel that record. (5)  Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting or revoking the authority of any court or of any licensing or registering officer or board, other than the Mississippi Board of Psychology, to suspend, revoke and reinstate licenses and to cancel registrations under the provisions of Section 41-29-311. (6)  Suspension by the board of the license of a psychologist shall be for a period not exceeding one (1) year.  At the end of this period the board shall reevaluate the suspension, and shall either reinstate or revoke the license.  A person whose license has been revoked under the provisions of this section may reapply for a license after more than two (2) years have elapsed from the date that the denial or revocation is legally effective. (7)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157.  Actions taken by the board in suspending a license when required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 are not actions from which an appeal may be taken under this section.  Any appeal of a license suspension that is required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 shall be taken in accordance with the appeal procedure specified in Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, rather than the procedure specified in this section.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this article, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (8)  The board may issue a nondisciplinary, educational letter to licensees as provided in Section 73-31-7(2)(g). The board may also direct a psychologist to obtain a formal assessment of ability to practice safely if there is reason to believe there may be impairment due to substance abuse or mental incapacity.  Licensees who may be impaired, but who are able to practice safely, may be required by the board to seek appropriate treatment and/or supervision.  That action by the board in itself will not be considered disciplinary. (9)  The board may discipline any person who has been granted the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology or the temporary authorization to practice under the Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact provided for under Section 73-31-51, for any of the grounds specified in subsection (1) of this section in the same manner as the board disciplines a licensed psychologist under this section. SECTION 21.  Section 73-34-109, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-34-109.  (1)  An appraisal management company applying for registration in this state shall not: (a)  Be owned, in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, by any person who has had an appraiser license or certificate in this state or in any other state, refused, denied, cancelled, surrendered in lieu of revocation, or revoked; or (b)  Be owned by more than ten percent (10%) by a person who * * * is not of good moral character, which for purposes of this section shall require that such person has not been convicted of, or entered a plea of nolo contendere to a felony relating to the practice of appraisal, banking, mortgage or the provision of financial services, or any crime involving fraud, misrepresentation or moral turpitude has been convicted of a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (2)  (a)  For purposes of subsection (1)(b) to qualify for initial registration and every third annual renewed registration thereafter as an appraisal management company, each individual owner of more than ten percent (10%) of an appraisal management company must have successfully been cleared for registration through an investigation that shall consist of a * * * determination as to good moral character and verification that the owner is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of registration as set forth in this chapter.  If no individual owns more than ten percent (10%) of the appraisal management company, then an investigation of an owner is not required, but in such instances, the controlling person designated by the appraisal management company shall be subject to the requirements of this subsection.  If following the initial registration, any individual becomes either an owner of more than ten percent (10%) of the appraisal management company or the designated controlling person of the appraisal management company, then each such person shall be subject to the requirements of this subsection at the appraisal management company's next annual renewal.  To assist the board in conducting its registration investigation, each individual owner of more than ten percent (10%) of an appraisal management company shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints, in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. (b)  Any state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for registration, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act, Section 25-61-1 et seq.  Except upon written consent of the applicant, or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, or when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine registration, no such information or records related thereto shall be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. (c)  The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. (d)  The board shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. SECTION 22.  Section 73-39-77, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-39-77.  (1) Upon a written complaint sworn to by any person, the board, in its sole discretion, may, after a hearing, revoke, suspend or limit for a certain time a license, impose an administrative fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each separate offense, or otherwise discipline any licensed veterinarian for any of the following reasons: (a)  The employment of fraud, misrepresentation or deception in obtaining a license. (b)  The inability to practice veterinary medicine with reasonable skill and safety because of a physical or mental disability, including deterioration of mental capacity, loss of motor skills or abuse of drugs or alcohol of sufficient degree to diminish the person's ability to deliver competent patient care. (c)  The use of advertising or solicitation that is false or misleading. (d)  Conviction of the following in any federal court or in the courts of this state or any other jurisdiction, regardless of whether the sentence is deferred: (i)  Any * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (ii)  Any crime involving cruelty, abuse or neglect of animals, including bestiality; * * *   (iii)  Any crime of moral turpitude; ( * * *iviii) Any crime involving unlawful sexual contact, child abuse, the use or threatened use of a weapon, the infliction of injury, indecent exposure, perjury, false reporting, criminal impersonation, forgery and any other crime involving a lack of truthfulness, veracity or honesty, intimidation of a victim or witness, larceny, or alcohol or drugs. For the purposes of this paragraph, a plea of guilty or a plea of nolo contendere accepted by the court shall be considered as a conviction. (e)  Incompetence, gross negligence or other malpractice in the practice of veterinary medicine. (f)  Aiding the unlawful practice of veterinary medicine. (g)  Fraud or dishonesty in the application or reporting of any test for disease in animals. (h)  Failure to report, as required by law, or making false or misleading report of, any contagious or infectious disease. (i)  Failure to keep accurate patient records. (j)  Dishonesty or gross negligence in the performance of food safety inspections or in the issuance of any health or inspection certificates. (k)  Failure to keep veterinary premises and equipment, including practice vehicles, in a clean and sanitary condition. (l)  Failure to permit the board or its agents to enter and inspect veterinary premises and equipment, including practice vehicles, as set by rules promulgated by the board. (m)  Revocation, suspension or limitation of a license to practice veterinary medicine by another state, territory or district of the United States. (n)  Loss or suspension of accreditation by any federal or state agency. (o)  Unprofessional conduct as defined in regulations adopted by the board. (p)  The dispensing, distribution, prescription or administration of any veterinary prescription drug, or the extra-label use of any drug in the absence of a veterinarian-client-patient relationship. (q)  Violations of state or federal drug laws. (r)  Violations of any order of the board. (s)  Violations of this chapter or of the rules promulgated under this chapter. (t)  Violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners. (2)  A certified copy of any judgment of conviction or finding of guilt by a court of competent jurisdiction or by a governmental agency, or agency authorized to issue licenses or permits, including the United States Department of Agriculture, Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, the Mississippi Board of Animal Health and the Mississippi Board of Health, of a veterinarian or veterinary technician of any matters listed in this section shall be admissible in evidence in any hearing held by the board to discipline such veterinarian or technician and shall constitute prima facie evidence of the commission of any such act. SECTION 23.  Section 73-42-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-42-9.  (1)  An applicant for registration shall submit an application for registration to the Secretary of State in a form prescribed by the Secretary of State.  An application filed under this section is a public record.  Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), the application must be in the name of an individual, signed by the applicant under penalty of perjury and must state or contain: (a)  The name of the applicant and the address of the applicant's principal place of business; (b)  The name of the applicant's business or employer, if applicable; (c)  Any business or occupation engaged in by the applicant for the five (5) years next preceding the date of submission of the application; (d)  A description of the applicant's: (i)  Formal training as an athlete agent; (ii)  Practical experience as an athlete agent; and (iii)  Educational background relating to the applicant's activities as an athlete agent; (e)  The names and addresses of three (3) individuals not related to the applicant who are willing to serve as references; (f)  The name, sport and last known team for each individual for whom the applicant provided services as an athlete agent during the five (5) years next preceding the date of submission of the application; (g)  The names and addresses of all persons who are: (i)  With respect to the athlete agent's business if it is not a corporation, the partners, officers, associates, individuals or profit-sharers; and (ii)  With respect to a company or corporation employing the athlete agent, the officers, directors and any shareholder of the corporation or member with a five percent (5%) or greater interest; (h)  Whether the applicant or any other person named pursuant to paragraph (g) has been convicted of a crime that, if committed in this state, would be a * * * felony or other crime involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, and identify the crime; (i)  Whether there has been any administrative or judicial determination that the applicant or any other person named pursuant to paragraph (g) has made a false, misleading, deceptive or fraudulent representation; (j)  Any instance in which the conduct of the applicant or any other person named pursuant to paragraph (g) resulted in the imposition of a sanction, suspension or declaration of ineligibility to participate in an interscholastic or intercollegiate athletic event on a student-athlete or educational institution; (k)  Any sanction, suspension or disciplinary action taken against the applicant or any other person named pursuant to paragraph (g) arising out of occupational or professional conduct; (l)  Whether there has been any denial of an application for, suspension or revocation of, or refusal to renew, the certification, registration or licensure of the applicant or any other person named pursuant to paragraph (g) as an athlete agent in any state; (m)  Any pending litigation against the applicant in the applicant's capacity as an agent; (n)  A list of all other states in which the applicant is currently licensed or registered as an athlete agent and a copy of each state's license or registration, as applicable; and (o)  Consent to submit to a criminal background check before being issued a certificate of registration.  Any fees connected with the background check shall be assessed to the applicant. (2)  An individual who has submitted an application for, and received a certificate of, registration or licensure as an athlete agent in another state, may submit a copy of the application and a valid certificate of registration or licensure from the other state in lieu of submitting an application in the form prescribed pursuant to subsection (1), along with the information requested in paragraphs (l), (m), (n) and (o) of subsection (1).  The Secretary of State shall accept the application and the certificate from the other state as an application for registration in this state if the application to the other state: (a)  Was submitted in the other state within the six (6) months next preceding the submission of the application in this state and the applicant certifies the information contained in the application is current; (b)  Contains information substantially similar to or more comprehensive than that required in an application submitted in this state; and (c)  Was signed by the applicant under penalty of perjury. (3)  An athlete agent must notify the Secretary of State within thirty (30) days whenever the information contained in any application for registration as an athlete agent in this state changes in a material way or is, or becomes, inaccurate or incomplete in any respect.  Events requiring notice shall include, but are not limited to, the following: (a)  Change in address of the athlete agent's principal place of business; (b)  Conviction of a * * * felony or other crime involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act by the athlete agent; (c)  Denial, suspension, refusal to renew, or revocation of a registration or license of the athlete agent as an athlete agent in any state; or (d)  Sanction, suspension or other disciplinary action taken against the athlete agent arising out of occupational or professional conduct. SECTION 24.  Section 73-42-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-42-11.  (1)  Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of registration to an individual who complies with Section 73-42-9(1). (2)  Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), the Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of registration to an individual whose application has been accepted under Section 73-42-9(2). (3)  The Secretary of State may refuse to issue a certificate of registration if they determine that the applicant has engaged in conduct that has a significant adverse effect on the applicant's fitness to serve as an athlete agent.  In making the determination, the Secretary of State may consider whether the applicant has: (a)  Been convicted of a crime in another state that, if committed in this state, would be a * * * felony or other crime involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (b)  Made a materially false, misleading, deceptive or fraudulent representation as an athlete agent or in the application; (c)  Engaged in conduct that would disqualify the applicant from serving in a fiduciary capacity; (d)  Engaged in conduct prohibited by Section 73-42-27; (e)  Had a registration, licensure or certification as an athlete agent suspended, revoked, or denied or been refused renewal of registration, licensure or certification in any state; (f)  Engaged in conduct or failed to engage in conduct the consequence of which was that a sanction, suspension or declaration of ineligibility to participate in an interscholastic or intercollegiate athletic event was imposed on a student-athlete or educational institution; or (g)  Engaged in conduct that significantly adversely reflects on the applicant's trustworthiness or credibility. (4)  In making a determination under subsection (3), the Secretary of State shall consider: (a)  How recently the conduct occurred; (b)  The nature of the conduct and the context in which it occurred; and (c)  Any other relevant conduct of the applicant. (5)  An athlete agent may apply to renew a registration by submitting an application for renewal in a form prescribed by the Secretary of State.  An application filed under this section is a public record.  The application for renewal must be signed by the applicant under penalty of perjury and must contain current information on all matters required in an original registration. (6)  An individual who has submitted an application for renewal of registration or licensure in another state, in lieu of submitting an application for renewal in the form prescribed pursuant to subsection (5), may file a copy of the application for renewal and a valid certificate of registration from the other state.  The Secretary of State shall accept the application for renewal from the other state as an application for renewal in this state if the application to the other state: (a)  Was submitted in the other state within the last six (6) months and the applicant certifies the information contained in the application for renewal is current; (b)  Contains information substantially similar to or more comprehensive than that required in an application for renewal submitted in this state; and (c)  Was signed by the applicant under penalty of perjury. (7)  Except as provided in Section 33-1-39, a certificate of registration or a renewal of a registration is valid for two (2) years. SECTION 25.  Section 73-53-8, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-53-8.  (1)  There is created the Board of Examiners for Social Workers and Marriage and Family Therapists to license and regulate social workers and marriage and family therapists.  The board shall be composed of ten (10) members, six (6) of which shall be social workers and four (4) of which shall be marriage and family therapists. (2)  Of the social worker members of the board, two (2) must be licensed social workers, and four (4) must be licensed master social workers or licensed certified social workers or a combination thereof.  The marriage and family therapist members of the board must be licensed marriage and family therapists.  For at least two (2) years immediately preceding his or her appointment, each marriage and family therapist appointee must have been actively engaged as a marriage and family therapist in rendering professional services in marriage and family therapy, or in the education and training of master's, doctoral or post-doctoral students of marriage and family therapy, or in marriage and family therapy research, and during the two (2) years preceding his or her appointment, must have spent the majority of the time devoted to that activity in this state.  The initial marriage and family therapist appointees shall be deemed to be and shall become licensed practicing marriage and family therapists immediately upon their appointment and qualification as members of the board.  All subsequent marriage and family therapist appointees to the board must be licensed marriage and family therapists before their appointment. (3)  The Governor shall appoint six (6) members of the board, four (4) of which shall be social workers and two (2) of which shall be marriage and family therapists, and the Lieutenant Governor shall appoint four (4) members of the board, two (2) of which shall be social workers and two (2) of which shall be marriage and family therapists. Social worker members of the board shall be appointed from nominations submitted by the Mississippi Chapter of the National Association of Social Workers, and marriage and family therapist members of the board shall be appointed from nominations submitted by the Mississippi Association for Marriage and Family Therapy.  All appointments shall be made with the advice and consent of the Senate. (4)  The initial appointments to the board shall be made as follows:  The Governor shall appoint one (1) social worker member for a term that expires on June 30, 1999, one (1) social worker member for a term that expires on June 30, 2001, two (2) social worker members for terms that expire on June 30, 2002, one (1) marriage and family therapist member for a term that expires on June 30, 1998, and one (1) marriage and family therapist member for a term that expires on June 30, 2000. The Lieutenant Governor shall appoint one (1) social worker member for a term that expires on June 30, 1998, one (1) social worker member for a term that expires on June 30, 2000, one (1) marriage and family therapist member for a term that expires on June 30, 1999, and one (1) marriage and family therapist member of the board for a term that expires on June 30, 2001.  After the expiration of the initial terms, all subsequent appointments shall be made by the original appointing authorities for terms of four (4) years from the expiration date of the previous term.  Upon the expiration of his or her term of office, a board member shall continue to serve until his or her successor has been appointed and has qualified.  No person may be appointed more than once to fill an unexpired term or more than two (2) consecutive full terms. (5)  Any vacancy on the board before the expiration of a term shall be filled by appointment of the original appointing authority for the remainder of the unexpired term. Appointments to fill vacancies shall be made from nominations submitted by the appropriate organization as specified in subsection (2) of this section for the position being filled. (6)  The appointing authorities shall give due regard to geographic distribution, race and sex in making all appointments to the board. (7)  The board shall select one (1) of its members to serve as chairman during the term of his or her appointment to the board.  No person may serve as chairman for more than four (4) years.  The board may remove any member of the board or the chairman from his or her position as chairman for (a) malfeasance in office, or (b) conviction of a * * * felony or a crime of moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act while in office, or (c) failure to attend three (3) consecutive board meetings.  However, no member may be removed until after a public hearing of the charges against him or her, and at least thirty (30) days' prior written notice to the accused member of the charges against him or her and of the date fixed for such hearing.  No board member shall participate in any matter before the board in which he has a pecuniary interest, personal bias or other similar conflict of interest. (8)  Board members shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of official board business as provided in Section 25-3-41. (9)  Four (4) social worker members and three (3) marriage and family therapist members of the board shall constitute a quorum of the board.  In making its decisions and taking actions affecting the members of one (1) of the professions regulated by the board, the board shall consider the recommendations of the board members who are members of that profession.  If the board is unable to have a quorum present at a regularly scheduled meeting location, the board may allow other members to participate in the meeting by telephone or other electronic means.  In the case of an administrative hearing, when recusals from the process are necessary, a quorum may consist of a simple majority of six (6) members. (10)  The principal office of the board shall be in the City of Jackson, but the board may act and exercise all of its powers at any other place.  The board shall adopt an official seal, which shall be judicially noticed and which shall be affixed to all licenses issued by the board. (11)  The board is authorized to employ, subject to the approval of the State Personnel Board, an executive director and such attorneys, experts and other employees as it may, from time to time, find necessary for the proper performance of its duties and for which the necessary funds are available, and to set the salary of the executive director, subject to the approval of the State Personnel Board. (12)  The board, by a majority vote, from time to time, may make such provisions as it deems appropriate to authorize the performance by any board member or members, employee or other agent of the board of any function given the board in this article or Sections 73-54-1 through 73-54-39. SECTION 26.  Section 73-55-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-55-19.  (1)  Any person licensed under this chapter may have his license revoked or suspended for a fixed period to be determined by the board for any of the following causes: (a)  Being convicted of an offense involving * * * moral turpitude a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act.  The record of such conviction, or certified copy thereof from the clerk of the court where such conviction occurred or by the judge of that court, shall be sufficient evidence to warrant revocation or suspension. (b)  By securing a license under this chapter through fraud or deceit. (c)  For unethical conduct or for gross ignorance or inefficiency in the conduct of his practice. (d)  For knowingly practicing while suffering with a contagious or infectious disease. (e)  For the use of a false name or alias in the practice of his profession. (f)  For violating any of the provisions of this chapter. (2)  Any person, whose license is sought to be revoked or suspended under the provisions of this chapter, shall be given thirty (30) days' notice, in writing, enumerating the charges and specifying a date for public hearing thereon.  The hearing shall be held in the county where the person's business is conducted.  The board may issue subpoenas, compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses, and place them under oath, the same as any court of competent jurisdiction where the hearing takes place. (3)  At all hearings the board may designate in writing one or more persons deemed competent by the board to conduct the hearing as trial examiner or trial committee, with the decision to be rendered in accordance with the provisions of subsection (4) of this section. (4)  After a hearing has been completed the trial examiner or trial committee who conducted the hearing shall proceed to consider the case and, as soon as practicable, shall render a decision.  In any case, the decision must be rendered within sixty (60) days after the hearing.  The decision shall contain: (a)  The findings of fact made by the trial examiner or trial committee; (b)  Conclusions of law reached by the trial examiner or trial committee; and (c)  The order based upon these findings of fact and conclusions of law. (5)  From any revocation or suspension, the person charged may, within thirty (30) days thereof, appeal to the chancery court of the county where the hearing was held. (6)  Notice of appeals shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the court, who shall issue a writ of certiorari directed to the board, commanding it within ten (10) days after service thereof to certify to such court its entire record in the matter in which the appeal has been taken.  The appeal shall thereupon be heard in the due course by said court without a jury, and the court shall review the record and make its determination of the cause between the parties. (7)  If there is an appeal, such appeal may, in the discretion of and on motion to the chancery court, act as a supersedeas.  The chancery court shall dispose of the appeal and enter its decision promptly.  The hearing on the appeal may, in the discretion of the chancellor, be tried in vacation. (8)  Any person taking an appeal shall post a satisfactory bond in the amount of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) for payment of any costs which may be adjudged against him. (9)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  Actions taken by the board in suspending a license when required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 are not actions from which an appeal may be taken under this section.  Any appeal of a license suspension that is required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 shall be taken in accordance with the appeal procedure specified in Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, rather than the procedure specified in this section.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 27.  Section 73-65-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-65-13.  (1)  The board may deny any application, or suspend or revoke any license held or applied for under the provisions of Section 73-65-7 if the person: (a)  Is found guilty of fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation in procuring or attempting to procure a license to practice art therapy; (b)  Is adjudicated mentally incompetent; (c)  Is found guilty of a * * * felony or misdemeanor involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (d)  Is found guilty of unprofessional or unethical conduct in this or any other jurisdiction; (e)  Has been using any controlled substance or alcoholic beverage to an extent or in a manner dangerous to the person, any other person, or the public, or to an extent that the use impairs the ability to perform as a licensed professional art therapist; (f)  Has violated any provision of this chapter; or (g)  Willfully or negligently divulges a professional confidence. (2)  A certified copy of the record of conviction shall be conclusive evidence of the conviction. (3)  Disciplinary proceedings may be initiated upon the receipt by the board of a sworn complaint by any person, including members of the board. SECTION 28.  Section 73-71-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-71-33.  The following acts constitute grounds for which the board may initiate disciplinary actions: (a)  Attempting to obtain, or renewing a license to practice acupuncture by bribery or misinterpretation; (b)  Having a license to practice acupuncture revoked, suspended, or otherwise acted against, including the denial of licensure by the licensing authority of another state or territory for reasons that would preclude licensure in this state; (c)  Being convicted or found guilty, regardless of adjudication, in any jurisdiction of a * * * felony, or a crime of moral turpitude, disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act or a crime that directly relates to acupuncture.  For the purposes of this paragraph, a plea of guilty or a plea of nolo contendere accepted by the court shall be considered as a conviction; (d)  Advertising, practicing, or attempting to practice under a name other than one's own; (e)  The use of advertising or solicitation that is false or misleading; (f)  Aiding, assisting, procuring, employing or advertising an unlicensed person to practice acupuncture contrary to this chapter or a rule of the board; (g)  Failing to perform any statutory or legal obligation placed upon an acupuncture practitioner; (h)  Making or filing a report that the licensee knows to be false, intentionally or negligently failing to file a report required by state or federal law, willfully impeding or obstructing that filing or inducing another person to do so.  Those reports shall include only those that are signed in the capacity of an acupuncture practitioner; (i)  Exercising coercion, intimidation or undue influence in entering into sexual relations with a patient, or continuing the patient-practitioner relationship with a patient with whom the licensee has sexual relations, if those sexual relations cause the licensee to perform services incompetently.  This paragraph shall not apply to sexual relations between acupuncture practitioners and their spouses; (j)  Making deceptive, untrue or fraudulent misrepresentations in the practice of acupuncture; (k)  Soliciting patients, either personally or through an agent, through the use of fraud, intimidation or undue influence, or a form of overreaching conduct; (l)  Failing to keep written medical records justifying the course of treatment of the patient; (m)  Exercising undue influence on the patient to exploit the patient for financial gain of the licensee or of a third party; (n)  Being unable to practice acupuncture with reasonable skill and safety to patients by reason of illness or intemperate use of alcohol, drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or any other type of material or as a result of any mental or physical condition; (o)  Malpractice or the failure to practice acupuncture to that level of care, skill and treatment that is recognized by a reasonably prudent similar practitioner of acupuncture as being acceptable under similar conditions and circumstances; (p)  Practicing or offering to practice beyond the scope permitted by law or accepting or performing professional responsibilities that the licensee knows or has reason to know that he or she is not qualified by training, experience or certification to perform; (q)  Delegating professional responsibilities to a person when the licensee delegating those responsibilities knows, or has reason to know, that the person is not qualified by training, experience or licensure to perform them; (r)  Violating any provision of this chapter, a rule of the board, or a lawful order of the board previously entered in a disciplinary hearing or failing to comply with a lawfully issued subpoena of the board; (s)  Conspiring with another to commit an act, or committing an act, that coerces, intimidates or precludes another licensee from lawfully advertising or providing his or her services; (t)  Fraud or deceit, or gross negligence, incompetence or misconduct in the operation of a course of study; (u)  Failing to comply with state, county or municipal regulations or reporting requirements relating to public health and the control of contagious and infectious disease; (v)  Failing to comply with any rule of the board relating to health and safety, including, but not limited to, sterilization of equipment and the disposal of potentially infectious materials; (w)  Incompetence, gross negligence or other malpractice in the practice of acupuncture; (x)  Aiding the unlawful practice of acupuncture; (y)  Fraud or dishonesty in the application or reporting of any test for disease; (z)  Failure to report, as required by law, or making false or misleading report of, any contagious or infectious disease; (aa)  Failure to keep accurate patient records; or (bb)  Failure to permit the board or its agents to enter and inspect acupuncture premises and equipment as set by rules promulgated by the board. SECTION 29.  Section 73-73-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-73-7.  (1)  Beginning on July 1, 2012, the board and Interior Design Advisory Committee shall receive applications for certification as a Mississippi Certified Interior Designer on forms prescribed and furnished by the board and IDAC. (2)  Upon receipt of an application, the board, upon the recommendation of IDAC, may approve the application, provided the applicant meets one (1) of the following requirements: (a)  The applicant passed the IDQE as administered by NCIDQ before January 1, 2012; (b)  The applicant has a degree in interior design from a program accredited by the CIDA, a degree in architecture from a program accredited by the National Architectural Accreditation Board (NAAB), or a four-year degree in interior design from a college or university approved by the regulatory board.  Additionally, the applicant must have passed the IDQE as administered by NCIDQ or its approved successor; (c)  The applicant is a licensed architect in the State of Mississippi who has passed the IDQE as administered by NCIDQ or its approved successor; or (d)  The applicant is a licensed engineer in the State of Mississippi who has passed the IDQE as administered by NCIDQ or its approved successor. (3)  The applicant must exhibit to the regulatory board and IDAC the applicant's good standing in the profession * * * and the applicant's moral character.  Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any of the following acts shall preclude an applicant's eligibility as a candidate for certification: (a)  Conviction by any court for commission of any * * * felony or any crime involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (b)  Conviction by any court of a misdemeanor involving fraud, deceit or misrepresentation. (c)  Misstatement or misrepresentation of fact by the applicant in connection with the applicant's application for certification in this state or another jurisdiction. (d)  Violation of any of the rules of conduct required of applicants or interior designers as adopted by the board. If the board determines that the applicant has shown clear and convincing evidence of rehabilitation and reform, the board may certify an applicant otherwise precluded from consideration because of an act prohibited under this subsection.  A decision to certify an applicant notwithstanding the applicant's violation of an act prohibited under this subsection is in the sole discretion of the board and upon such terms, conditions and evidence as the board may require. (4)  The board and IDAC may require that the applicant appear before the board for a personal interview. (5)  The board, upon the recommendation of IDAC, may adopt or develop alternate routes of eligibility and examination requirements based on standards as set forth by NCIDQ or its approved successor. (6)  Any application submitted to the board and IDAC may be denied for any violation of the provisions of this chapter. SECTION 30.  Section 73-75-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-75-19.  (1)  The board, by an affirmative vote of at least three (3) of its five (5) members, shall withhold, deny, revoke or suspend any license issued or applied for in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, or otherwise discipline a licensed behavior analyst or licensed assistant behavior analyst upon finding that the applicant or licensee: (a)  Has violated the current Behavior Analyst Certification Board Professional Disciplinary and Ethical Standards, the Behavior Analyst Certification Board Guidelines for Responsible Conduct for Behavior Analysts, or other codes of ethical standards adopted by the board, or has lost or failed to renew certification by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board; or (b)  Has been convicted of a * * * felony or any offense involving moral turpitude disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, the record of conviction being conclusive evidence thereof; or (c)  Is using any narcotic or any alcoholic beverage to an extent or in a manner dangerous to any other person or the public, or to an extent that such use impairs his ability to perform the work of a licensed behavior analyst or licensed assistant behavior analyst; or (d)  Has impersonated another person holding a license issued under this chapter or allowed another person to use his license; or (e)  Has used fraud or deception in applying for a license provided for in this chapter; or (f)  Has accepted commissions or rebates or other forms of remuneration for referring clients to other professional persons; or (g)  Has allowed his name or license issued under this chapter to be used in connection with any person or persons who perform applied behavior analysis services outside the area of their training, experience or competence; or (h)  Is legally adjudicated mentally incompetent, the record of such adjudication being conclusive evidence thereof; or (i)  Has willfully or negligently violated any of the provisions of this chapter. (2)  The board may recover from any person disciplined under this chapter the costs of investigation, prosecution, and adjudication of the disciplinary action. (3)  Notice shall be effected by registered mail or personal service setting forth the particular reasons for the proposed action and fixing a date not less than thirty (30) days nor more than sixty (60) days from the date of such mailing or such service, at which time the applicant or licensee shall be given an opportunity for a prompt and fair hearing.  For the purpose of such hearing the board, acting by and through its executive secretary, may exercise all authority granted to conduct investigations and hearings pursuant to Section 73-75-9(2)(a) and (b). At such hearing the applicant or licensee may appear by counsel and personally on his own behalf.  On the basis of any such hearing, or upon default of applicant or licensee, the board shall make a determination specifying its findings of fact and conclusions of law.  A copy of such determination shall be sent by registered mail or served personally upon the applicant or licensee. The decision of the board denying, revoking or suspending the license shall become final thirty (30) days after so mailed or served unless within that period the licensee appeals the decision to the Chancery Court of Madison or Rankin Counties, pursuant to the provisions hereof, and the proceedings in chancery shall be conducted as other matters coming before the court.  All proceedings and evidence, together with exhibits, presented at such hearing before the board in the event of appeal, shall be admissible in evidence in the court. (4)  Nothing in this subsection shall be interpreted to prohibit the board from immediately suspending any license prior to a hearing under subsection (3) of this section, when in its sole discretion the suspension is required for the instruction, safety or well-being of any member of the public. (5)  Every order and judgment of the board shall take effect immediately upon its promulgation unless the board in such order or judgment fixes a probationary period for applicant or licensee.  Such order and judgment shall continue in effect unless upon appeal the court by proper order or decree terminates it earlier.  The board may make public its order and judgments in such manner and form as it deems proper. (6)  Suspension by the board of a license issued under this chapter shall be for a period not to exceed one (1) year.  At the end of this period the board shall reevaluate the suspension, and shall either reinstate or revoke the license.  A person whose license has been revoked under the provisions of this section may reapply for license after more than two (2) years have elapsed from the date such revocation is legally effective. (7)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, in compliance with the procedures set forth in Sections 93-11-151 through 93-11-163. SECTION 31.  Section 75-76-131, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-131.  (1)  The executive director shall: (a)  Ascertain and keep himself informed of the identity, prior activities and present location of all gaming employees in the State of Mississippi; and (b)  Maintain confidential records of such information. (2)  No person may be employed as a gaming employee unless he is the holder of a work permit issued by the commission. (3)  A work permit issued to a gaming employee must have clearly imprinted thereon a statement that it is valid for gaming purposes only. (4)  Application for a work permit is to be made to the executive director and may be granted or denied for any cause deemed reasonable by the commission.  Whenever the executive director denies such an application, he shall include in the notice of the denial a statement of the facts upon which he relied in denying the application. (5)  Any person whose application for a work permit has been denied by the executive director may, not later than sixty (60) days after receiving notice of the denial or objection, apply to the commission for a hearing before a hearing examiner.  A failure of a person whose application has been denied to apply for a hearing within sixty (60) days or his failure to appear at a hearing conducted pursuant to this section shall be deemed to be an admission that the denial or objection is well founded and precludes administrative or judicial review.  At the hearing, the hearing examiner appointed by the commission shall take any testimony deemed necessary.  After the hearing the hearing examiner shall within thirty (30) days after the date of the hearing announce his decision sustaining or reversing the denial of the work permit or the objection to the issuance of a work permit.  The executive director may refuse to issue a work permit if the applicant has: (a)  Failed to disclose, misstated or otherwise attempted to mislead the commission with respect to any material fact contained in the application for the issuance or renewal of a work permit; (b)  Knowingly failed to comply with the provisions of this chapter or the regulations of the commission at a place of previous employment; (c)  Committed, attempted or conspired to commit any crime of * * * moral turpitude, embezzlement or larceny or any violation of any law pertaining to gaming, or any crime which is inimical to the declared policy of this state concerning gaming; (d)  Been identified in the published reports of any federal or state legislative or executive body as being a member or associate of organized crime, or as being of notorious and unsavory reputation; (e)  Been placed and remains in the constructive custody of any federal, state or municipal law enforcement authority; (f)  Had a work permit revoked or committed any act which is a ground for the revocation of a work permit or would have been a ground for revoking his work permit if he had then held a work permit; or (g)  For any other reasonable cause. The executive director shall refuse to issue a work permit if the applicant has committed, attempted or conspired to commit a crime which is a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act in this state or an offense in another state or jurisdiction which would be a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act if committed in this state. (6)  Any applicant aggrieved by the decision of the hearing examiner may, within fifteen (15) days after the announcement of the decision, apply in writing to the commission for review of the decision.  Review is limited to the record of the proceedings before the hearing examiner.  The commission may sustain or reverse the hearing examiner's decision.  The commission may decline to review the hearing examiner's decision, in which case the hearing examiner's decision becomes the final decision of the commission.  The decision of the commission is subject to judicial review. (7)  All records acquired or compiled by the commission relating to any application made pursuant to this section and all lists of persons to whom work permits have been issued or denied and all records of the names or identity of persons engaged in the gaming industry in this state are confidential and must not be disclosed except in the proper administration of this chapter or to an authorized law enforcement agency.  Any record of the commission which shows that the applicant has been convicted of a disqualifying crime in another state must show whether the crime was a misdemeanor, gross misdemeanor, felony or other class of crime as classified by the state in which the crime was committed.  In a disclosure of the conviction, reference to the classification of the crime must be based on the classification in the state where it was committed. (8)  A work permit expires unless renewed within ten (10) days after a change of place of employment or if the holder thereof is not employed as a gaming employee within the jurisdiction of the issuing authority for more than ninety (90) days. (9)  Notice of any objection to or denial of a work permit by the executive director as provided pursuant to this section is sufficient if it is mailed to the applicant's last known address as indicated on the application for a work permit.  The date of mailing may be proven by a certificate signed by the executive director or his designee that specifies the time the notice was mailed.  The notice is presumed to have been received by the applicant five (5) days after it is deposited with the United States Postal Service with the postage thereon prepaid. SECTION 32.  Section 83-7-207, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-7-207.  (1)  The commissioner may suspend, revoke or refuse to renew the license of a viatical settlement provider, viatical settlement representative or viatical settlement broker if the commissioner finds that: (a)  There was any material misrepresentation in the application for the license; (b)  The licensee or any officer, partner or key management personnel has been convicted of fraudulent or dishonest practices, is subject to a final administrative action or is otherwise shown to be untrustworthy or incompetent; (c)  The viatical settlement provider demonstrates a pattern of unreasonable payments to viators; (d)  The licensee has been found guilty of, or has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to, any * * * felony or to a misdemeanor involving fraud or moral turpitude, regardless of whether a judgment of conviction has been entered by the court disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (e)  The viatical settlement provider has failed to honor contractual obligations set out in a viatical settlement contract; (f)  The licensee no longer meets the requirements for initial licensure; (g)  The viatical settlement provider has assigned, transferred or pledged a viaticated policy to a person other than a viatical settlement provider licensed in this state or a financing entity; or (h)  The licensee has violated any provisions of Sections 83-7-201 through 83-7-223. (2)  Before the commissioner shall deny a license application or suspend, revoke or refuse to renew the license of a viatical settlement provider, viatical settlement broker or viatical settlement representative, the commissioner shall conduct a hearing in accordance with Section 25-43-1.101 et seq. SECTION 33.  Section 83-39-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-39-15.  (1)  The department may deny, suspend, revoke or refuse to renew, as may be appropriate, a license to engage in the business of professional bail agent, soliciting bail agent, or bail enforcement agent for any of the following reasons: (a)  Any cause for which the issuance of the license would have been refused had it then existed and been known to the department. (b)  Failure to post a qualification bond in the required amount with the department during the period the person is engaged in the business within this state or, if the bond has been posted, the forfeiture or cancellation of the bond. (c)  Material misstatement, misrepresentation or fraud in obtaining the license. (d)  Willful failure to comply with, or willful violation of, any provision of this chapter or of any proper order, rule or regulation of the department or any court of this state. (e)  Conviction of * * * felony or crime involving moral turpitude a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (f)  Default in payment to the court should any bond issued by such bail agent be forfeited by order of the court. (g)  Being elected or employed as a law enforcement or judicial official. (h)  Engaging in the practice of law. (i)  Writing a bond in violation of Section 83-39-3(2)(b)(i) and (ii). (j)  Giving legal advice or a legal opinion in any form. (k)  Acting as or impersonating a bail agent without a license. (l)  Use of any other trade name than what is submitted on a license application to the department. (m)  Issuing a bail bond that contains information intended to mislead a court about the proper delivery by personal service or certified mail of a writ of scire facias, judgment nisi or final judgment. (2)  In addition to the grounds specified in subsection (1) of this section, the department shall be authorized to suspend the license, registration or permit of any person for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license, registration or permit for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license, registration or permit suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license, registration or permit suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (3)  In addition to the sanctions provided in this section, the department may assess an administrative fine in an amount not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per violation.  Such administrative fines shall be in addition to any criminal penalties assessed under Section 99-5-1. SECTION 34.  Section 9-13-109, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 9-13-109.  Every applicant for certification shall have reached the age of majority * * *, be of good moral character and be a resident citizen of the State of Mississippi.  Further, every applicant shall meet the criteria established by the board for certification or shall meet the requirements of Section 9-13-109. SECTION 35.  Section 21-27-131, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 21-27-131.  No person may drive or operate motor vehicles for hire in any city or town in this state unless he shall first have been licensed so to do as follows:  he shall make application to the mayor of such municipality in writing, accompanied by a statement of some reputable citizen thereof, that the applicant is over the age of eighteen (18) years, an experienced driver, * * * of good moral character, and physically and mentally capacitated to drive and operate such motor vehicle.  The mayor shall place such application before the board of aldermen, or other governing authorities, whereupon inquiry may be made by such governing authorities into the * * * moral character and mental and physical fitness of the applicant.  If the permit shall be granted the applicant shall receive a certificate of such permit, signed by the mayor, together with an identification badge, and the name of the municipality thereon, and which shall be worn so that the same will be displayed while engaged in or about such occupation.  The governing authorities of the municipality may require the applicant to give a reasonable bond, of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), to guarantee the faithful observance of the law as well as the rules and regulations which may be prescribed by the said municipality, and they may also require a reasonable fee, for such permit and badge.  In the event the governing authority of such municipality refuse to grant such permit to an applicant, an appeal may be taken to the circuit court, in the manner provided by law for appealing from other orders of the governing authorities of municipalities, and the questions to be tried upon appeal will be as to the age and experience and the moral, mental and physical fitness of the said applicant to pursue such vocation in such municipality. SECTION 36.  Section 21-27-151, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 21-27-151.  No person may drive or operate any bus of a transportation system for the transportation of passengers within any city or town in this state, where the operation of such bus is subject to regulation by the authorities of such city or town under Section 21-27-121, unless he shall first have been licensed so to do as follows:  he shall make application to the mayor of such municipality in writing, accompanied by a statement of some reputable citizen thereof, that the applicant is over the age of eighteen (18) years, an experienced driver, * * * of good moral character, and physically and mentally capacitated to drive and operate such motor vehicle.  The mayor shall place such application before the board of aldermen, or other governing authorities, whereupon inquiry may be made by such governing authorities into the * * * moral character and mental and physical fitness of the applicant.  If the permit shall be granted the applicant shall receive a license, signed by the mayor, together with a metallic badge, which shall have a number and the name of the municipality thereon, and which shall be worn so that the same will be displayed while engaged in or about such occupation.  The governing authorities of the municipality may require the applicant to give a reasonable bond, of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), to guarantee the faithful observance of the law as well as the rules and regulations which may be prescribed by the said municipality, and they may also require a reasonable fee, not to exceed Five Dollars ($5.00) for such license, which said license fee shall be paid into the general fund of such municipality.  In the event the governing authority of such municipality refuse to grant such license to an applicant, an appeal may be taken to the circuit court, in the manner provided by law for appealing from other orders of the governing authorities of municipalities, and the questions to be tried upon appeal will be as to the age and experience and the * * * moral, mental and physical fitness of the said applicant to pursue such vocation in such municipality. SECTION 37.  Section 27-109-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-109-5.  (1)  Any person who the tax commission determines is qualified to receive a license or is found suitable under the provisions of this chapter, having due consideration for the proper protection of the health, safety, morals, good order and general welfare of the inhabitants of the State of Mississippi and the declared policy of this state, may be issued a state privilege license for the operation of a cruise vessel.  The burden of proving his qualification to receive any license or be found suitable is on the applicant. (2)  An application to receive a license shall not be granted unless the commission is satisfied that the applicant is: (a)  A person of * * * good character, honesty and integrity; (b)  A person whose prior activities, criminal record, if any, reputation, habits and associations do not pose a threat to the public interest of this state or to the effective regulation and control of cruise vessels, or create or enhance the dangers of unsuitable, unfair or illegal practices, methods and activities in the operation of cruise vessels or the carrying on of the business and financial arrangements incidental thereto; and (c)  In all other respects qualified to be licensed or found suitable consistently with the declared policy of the state. (3)  A license to operate a cruise vessel shall not be granted unless the applicant has satisfied the commission that: (a)  He has adequate business probity, competence and experience, in the operation of cruise vessels or generally; and (b)  The proposed financing of the entire operation is: (i)  Adequate for the nature of the proposed operation; and (ii)  From a suitable source.  Any lender or other source of money or credit which the commission finds does not meet the standards set forth in subsection (2) may be deemed unsuitable. SECTION 38.  Section 37-3-2, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-3-2.  (1)  There is established within the State Department of Education the Commission on Teacher and Administrator Education, Certification and Licensure and Development.  It shall be the purpose and duty of the commission to make recommendations to the State Board of Education regarding standards for the certification and licensure and continuing professional development of those who teach or perform tasks of an educational nature in the public schools of Mississippi. (2)  (a)  The commission shall be composed of fifteen (15) qualified members.  The membership of the commission shall be composed of the following members to be appointed, three (3) from each of the four (4) congressional districts, as such districts existed on January 1, 2011, in accordance with the population calculations determined by the 2010 federal decennial census, including:  four (4) classroom teachers; three (3) school administrators; one (1) representative of schools of education of public institutions of higher learning located within the state to be recommended by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning; one (1) representative from the schools of education of independent institutions of higher learning to be recommended by the Board of the Mississippi Association of Independent Colleges; one (1) representative from public community and junior colleges located within the state to be recommended by the Mississippi Community College Board; one (1) local school board member; and four (4) laypersons.  Three (3) members of the commission, at the sole discretion of the State Board of Education, shall be appointed from the state at large. (b)  All appointments shall be made by the State Board of Education after consultation with the State Superintendent of Public Education.  The first appointments by the State Board of Education shall be made as follows:  five (5) members shall be appointed for a term of one (1) year; five (5) members shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years; and five (5) members shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years.  Thereafter, all members shall be appointed for a term of four (4) years. (3)  The State Board of Education when making appointments shall designate a chairman.  The commission shall meet at least once every two (2) months or more often if needed.  Members of the commission shall be compensated at a rate of per diem as authorized by Section 25-3-69 and be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses as authorized by Section 25-3-41. (4)  (a)  An appropriate staff member of the State Department of Education shall be designated and assigned by the State Superintendent of Public Education to serve as executive secretary and coordinator for the commission.  No less than two (2) other appropriate staff members of the State Department of Education shall be designated and assigned by the State Superintendent of Public Education to serve on the staff of the commission. (b)  An Office of Educator Misconduct Evaluations shall be established within the State Department of Education to assist the commission in responding to infractions and violations, and in conducting hearings and enforcing the provisions of subsections (11), (12), (13), (14) and (15) of this section, and violations of the Mississippi Educator Code of Ethics. (5)  It shall be the duty of the commission to: (a)  Set standards and criteria, subject to the approval of the State Board of Education, for all educator preparation programs in the state; (b)  Recommend to the State Board of Education each year approval or disapproval of each educator preparation program in the state, subject to a process and schedule determined by the State Board of Education; (c)  Establish, subject to the approval of the State Board of Education, standards for initial teacher certification and licensure in all fields; (d)  Establish, subject to the approval of the State Board of Education, standards for the renewal of teacher licenses in all fields; (e)  Review and evaluate objective measures of teacher performance, such as test scores, which may form part of the licensure process, and to make recommendations for their use; (f)  Review all existing requirements for certification and licensure; (g)  Consult with groups whose work may be affected by the commission's decisions; (h)  Prepare reports from time to time on current practices and issues in the general area of teacher education and certification and licensure; (i)  Hold hearings concerning standards for teachers' and administrators' education and certification and licensure with approval of the State Board of Education; (j)  Hire expert consultants with approval of the State Board of Education; (k)  Set up ad hoc committees to advise on specific areas; (l)  Perform such other functions as may fall within their general charge and which may be delegated to them by the State Board of Education; and (m)  Establish standards, subject to the approval of the State Board of Education, for supplemental endorsements, provided that the standards allow teachers as many options as possible to receive a supplemental endorsement, including, but not limited to, the option of taking additional coursework or earning at least the minimum qualifying score or higher on the required licensure subject assessment relevant to the endorsement area for which the licensure is sought.  The subject assessment option shall not apply to certain subject areas, including, but not limited to, Early/Primary Education PreK-3, Elementary Education, or Special Education, except by special approval by the State Board of Education. (6)  (a)  Standard License - Approved Program Route.  An educator entering the school system of Mississippi for the first time and meeting all requirements as established by the State Board of Education shall be granted a standard five-year license. Persons who possess two (2) years of classroom experience as an assistant teacher or who have taught for one (1) year in an accredited public or private school shall be allowed to fulfill student teaching requirements under the supervision of a qualified participating teacher approved by an accredited college of education.  The local school district in which the assistant teacher is employed shall compensate such assistant teachers at the required salary level during the period of time such individual is completing student teaching requirements.  Applicants for a standard license shall submit to the department: (i)  An application on a department form; (ii)  An official transcript of completion of a teacher education program approved by the department or a nationally accredited program, subject to the following: Licensure to teach in Mississippi prekindergarten through kindergarten classrooms shall require completion of a teacher education program or a Bachelor of Science degree with child development emphasis from a program accredited by the American Association of Family and Consumer Sciences (AAFCS) or by the National Association for Education of Young Children (NAEYC) or by the National Council for Accreditation of Teacher Education (NCATE).  Licensure to teach in Mississippi kindergarten, for those applicants who have completed a teacher education program, and in Grade 1 through Grade 4 shall require the completion of an interdisciplinary program of studies.  Licenses for Grades 4 through 8 shall require the completion of an interdisciplinary program of studies with two (2) or more areas of concentration.  Licensure to teach in Mississippi Grades 7 through 12 shall require a major in an academic field other than education, or a combination of disciplines other than education.  Students preparing to teach a subject shall complete a major in the respective subject discipline.  All applicants for standard licensure shall demonstrate that such person's college preparation in those fields was in accordance with the standards set forth by the National Council for Accreditation of Teacher Education (NCATE) or the National Association of State Directors of Teacher Education and Certification (NASDTEC) or, for those applicants who have a Bachelor of Science degree with child development emphasis, the American Association of Family and Consumer Sciences (AAFCS).  Effective July 1, 2016, for initial elementary education licensure, a teacher candidate must earn a passing score on a rigorous test of scientifically research-based reading instruction and intervention and data-based decision-making principles as approved by the State Board of Education; (iii)  A copy of test scores evidencing satisfactory completion of nationally administered examinations of achievement, such as the Educational Testing Service's teacher testing examinations; (iv)  Any other document required by the State Board of Education; and (v)  From and after July 1, 2020, no teacher candidate shall be licensed to teach in Mississippi who did not meet the following criteria for entrance into an approved teacher education program: 1.  An ACT Score of twenty-one (21) (or SAT equivalent); or 2.  Achieve a qualifying passing score on the Praxis Core Academic Skills for Educators examination as established by the State Board of Education; or 3.  A minimum GPA of 3.0 on coursework prior to admission to an approved teacher education program. (b)  (i)  Standard License - Nontraditional Teaching Route.  From and after July 1, 2020, no teacher candidate shall be licensed to teach in Mississippi under the alternate route who did not meet the following criteria: 1.  An ACT Score of twenty-one (21) (or SAT equivalent); or 2.  Achieve a qualifying passing score on the Praxis Core Academic Skills for Educators examination as established by the State Board of Education; or 3.  A minimum GPA of 3.0 on coursework prior to admission to an approved teacher education program. (ii)  Beginning July 1, 2020, an individual who has attained a passing score on the Praxis Core Academic Skills for Educators or an ACT Score of twenty-one (21) (or SAT equivalent) or a minimum GPA of 3.0 on coursework prior to admission to an approved teacher education program and a passing score on the Praxis Subject Assessment in the requested area of endorsement may apply for admission to the Teach Mississippi Institute (TMI) program to teach students in Grades 7 through 12 if the individual meets the requirements of this paragraph (b).  The State Board of Education shall adopt rules requiring that teacher preparation institutions which provide the Teach Mississippi Institute (TMI) program for the preparation of nontraditional teachers shall meet the standards and comply with the provisions of this paragraph. 1.  The Teach Mississippi Institute (TMI) shall include an intensive eight-week, nine-semester-hour summer program or a curriculum of study in which the student matriculates in the fall or spring semester, which shall include, but not be limited to, instruction in education, effective teaching strategies, classroom management, state curriculum requirements, planning and instruction, instructional methods and pedagogy, using test results to improve instruction, and a one (1) semester three-hour supervised internship to be completed while the teacher is employed as a full-time teacher intern in a local school district.  The TMI shall be implemented on a pilot program basis, with courses to be offered at up to four (4) locations in the state, with one (1) TMI site to be located in each of the three (3) Mississippi Supreme Court districts. 2.  The school sponsoring the teacher intern shall enter into a written agreement with the institution providing the Teach Mississippi Institute (TMI) program, under terms and conditions as agreed upon by the contracting parties, providing that the school district shall provide teacher interns seeking a nontraditional provisional teaching license with a one-year classroom teaching experience. The teacher intern shall successfully complete the one (1) semester three-hour intensive internship in the school district during the semester immediately following successful completion of the TMI and prior to the end of the one-year classroom teaching experience. 3.  Upon completion of the nine-semester-hour TMI or the fall or spring semester option, the individual shall submit his transcript to the commission for provisional licensure of the intern teacher, and the intern teacher shall be issued a provisional teaching license by the commission, which will allow the individual to legally serve as a teacher while the person completes a nontraditional teacher preparation internship program. 4.  During the semester of internship in the school district, the teacher preparation institution shall monitor the performance of the intern teacher.  The school district that employs the provisional teacher shall supervise the provisional teacher during the teacher's intern year of employment under a nontraditional provisional license, and shall, in consultation with the teacher intern's mentor at the school district of employment, submit to the commission a comprehensive evaluation of the teacher's performance sixty (60) days prior to the expiration of the nontraditional provisional license.  If the comprehensive evaluation establishes that the provisional teacher intern's performance fails to meet the standards of the approved nontraditional teacher preparation internship program, the individual shall not be approved for a standard license. 5.  An individual issued a provisional teaching license under this nontraditional route shall successfully complete, at a minimum, a one-year beginning teacher mentoring and induction program administered by the employing school district with the assistance of the State Department of Education. 6.  Upon successful completion of the TMI and the internship provisional license period, applicants for a Standard License - Nontraditional Route shall submit to the commission a transcript of successful completion of the twelve (12) semester hours required in the internship program, and the employing school district shall submit to the commission a recommendation for standard licensure of the intern.  If the school district recommends licensure, the applicant shall be issued a Standard License - Nontraditional Route which shall be valid for a five-year period and be renewable. 7.  At the discretion of the teacher preparation institution, the individual shall be allowed to credit the twelve (12) semester hours earned in the nontraditional teacher internship program toward the graduate hours required for a Master of Arts in Teacher (MAT) Degree. 8.  The local school district in which the nontraditional teacher intern or provisional licensee is employed shall compensate such teacher interns at Step 1 of the required salary level during the period of time such individual is completing teacher internship requirements and shall compensate such Standard License - Nontraditional Route teachers at Step 3 of the required salary level when they complete license requirements. (iii) Implementation of the TMI program provided for under this paragraph (b) shall be contingent upon the availability of funds appropriated specifically for such purpose by the Legislature.  Such implementation of the TMI program may not be deemed to prohibit the State Board of Education from developing and implementing additional alternative route teacher licensure programs, as deemed appropriate by the board.  The emergency certification program in effect prior to July 1, 2002, shall remain in effect. (iv)  A Standard License - Approved Program Route shall be issued for a five-year period, and may be renewed.  Recognizing teaching as a profession, a hiring preference shall be granted to persons holding a Standard License - Approved Program Route or Standard License - Nontraditional Teaching Route over persons holding any other license. (c)  Special License - Expert Citizen.  In order to allow a school district to offer specialized or technical courses, the State Department of Education, in accordance with rules and regulations established by the State Board of Education, may grant a five-year expert citizen-teacher license to local business or other professional personnel to teach in a public school or nonpublic school accredited or approved by the state.  Such person shall be required to have a high school diploma, an industry-recognized certification related to the subject area in which they are teaching and a minimum of five (5) years of relevant experience but shall not be required to hold an associate or bachelor's degree, provided that he or she possesses the minimum qualifications required for his or her profession, and may begin teaching upon his employment by the local school board and licensure by the Mississippi Department of Education.  If a school board hires a career technical education pathway instructor who does not have an industry certification in his or her area of expertise but does have the required experience, the school board shall spread their decision on the minutes at their next meeting and provide a detailed explanation for why they hired the instructor.  Such instructor shall present the minutes of the school board to the State Department of Education when he or she applies for an expert citizen license.  The board shall adopt rules and regulations to administer the expert citizen-teacher license.  A Special License - Expert Citizen may be renewed in accordance with the established rules and regulations of the State Department of Education. (d)  Special License - Nonrenewable.  The State Board of Education is authorized to establish rules and regulations to allow those educators not meeting requirements in paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of this subsection (6) to be licensed for a period of not more than three (3) years, except by special approval of the State Board of Education. (e)  Nonlicensed Teaching Personnel.  A nonlicensed person may teach for a maximum of three (3) periods per teaching day in a public school district or a nonpublic school accredited/approved by the state.  Such person shall submit to the department a transcript or record of his education and experience which substantiates his preparation for the subject to be taught and shall meet other qualifications specified by the commission and approved by the State Board of Education.  In no case shall any local school board hire nonlicensed personnel as authorized under this paragraph in excess of five percent (5%) of the total number of licensed personnel in any single school. (f)  Special License - Transitional Bilingual Education.  Beginning July 1, 2003, the commission shall grant special licenses to teachers of transitional bilingual education who possess such qualifications as are prescribed in this section.  Teachers of transitional bilingual education shall be compensated by local school boards at not less than one (1) step on the regular salary schedule applicable to permanent teachers licensed under this section.  The commission shall grant special licenses to teachers of transitional bilingual education who present the commission with satisfactory evidence that they (i) possess a speaking and reading ability in a language, other than English, in which bilingual education is offered and communicative skills in English; (ii) are in good health * * * and sound moral character; (iii) possess a bachelor's degree or an associate's degree in teacher education from an accredited institution of higher education; (iv) meet such requirements as to courses of study, semester hours therein, experience and training as may be required by the commission; and (v) are legally present in the United States and possess legal authorization for employment.  A teacher of transitional bilingual education serving under a special license shall be under an exemption from standard licensure if he achieves the requisite qualifications therefor. Two (2) years of service by a teacher of transitional bilingual education under such an exemption shall be credited to the teacher in acquiring a Standard Educator License.  Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to prohibit a local school board from employing a teacher licensed in an appropriate field as approved by the State Department of Education to teach in a program in transitional bilingual education. (g)  In the event any school district meets the highest accreditation standards as defined by the State Board of Education in the accountability system, the State Board of Education, in its discretion, may exempt such school district from any restrictions in paragraph (e) relating to the employment of nonlicensed teaching personnel. (h)  Highly Qualified Teachers.  Beginning July 1, 2006, any teacher from any state meeting the federal definition of highly qualified, as described in the No Child Left Behind Act, must be granted a standard five-year license by the State Department of Education. (7)  Administrator License.  The State Board of Education is authorized to establish rules and regulations and to administer the licensure process of the school administrators in the State of Mississippi.  There will be four (4) categories of administrator licensure with exceptions only through special approval of the State Board of Education. (a)  Administrator License - Nonpracticing.  Those educators holding administrative endorsement but having no administrative experience or not serving in an administrative position on January 15, 1997. (b)  Administrator License - Entry Level.  Those educators holding administrative endorsement and having met the department's qualifications to be eligible for employment in a Mississippi school district.  Administrator License - Entry Level shall be issued for a five-year period and shall be nonrenewable. (c)  Standard Administrator License - Career Level.  An administrator who has met all the requirements of the department for standard administrator licensure. (d)  Administrator License - Nontraditional Route.  The board may establish a nontraditional route for licensing administrative personnel.  Such nontraditional route for administrative licensure shall be available for persons holding, but not limited to, a master of business administration degree, a master of public administration degree, a master of public planning and policy degree or a doctor of jurisprudence degree from an accredited college or university, with five (5) years of administrative or supervisory experience.  Successful completion of the requirements of alternate route licensure for administrators shall qualify the person for a standard administrator license. Individuals seeking school administrator licensure under paragraph (b), (c) or (d) shall successfully complete a training program and an assessment process prescribed by the State Board of Education.  All applicants for school administrator licensure shall meet all requirements prescribed by the department under paragraph (b), (c) or (d), and the cost of the assessment process required shall be paid by the applicant. (8)  Reciprocity.  The department shall grant a standard five-year license to any individual who possesses a valid standard license from another state, or another country or political subdivision thereof, within a period of twenty-one (21) days from the date of a completed application.  The issuance of a license by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (9)  Renewal and Reinstatement of Licenses.  The State Board of Education is authorized to establish rules and regulations for the renewal and reinstatement of educator and administrator licenses.  Effective May 15, 1997, the valid standard license held by an educator shall be extended five (5) years beyond the expiration date of the license in order to afford the educator adequate time to fulfill new renewal requirements established pursuant to this subsection.  An educator completing a master of education, educational specialist or doctor of education degree in May 1997 for the purpose of upgrading the educator's license to a higher class shall be given this extension of five (5) years plus five (5) additional years for completion of a higher degree.  For all license types with a current valid expiration date of June 30, 2021, the State Department of Education shall grant a one-year extension to June 30, 2022.  Beginning July 1, 2022, and thereafter, applicants for licensure renewal shall meet all requirements in effect on the date that the complete application is received by the State Department of Education. (10)  All controversies involving the issuance, revocation, suspension or any change whatsoever in the licensure of an educator required to hold a license shall be initially heard in a hearing de novo, by the commission or by a subcommittee established by the commission and composed of commission members, or by a hearing officer retained and appointed by the commission, for the purpose of holding hearings.  Any complaint seeking the denial of issuance, revocation or suspension of a license shall be by sworn affidavit filed with the Commission on Teacher and Administrator Education, Certification and Licensure and Development.  The decision thereon by the commission, its subcommittee or hearing officer, shall be final, unless the aggrieved party shall appeal to the State Board of Education, within ten (10) days, of the decision of the commission, its subcommittee or hearing officer.  An appeal to the State Board of Education shall be perfected upon filing a notice of the appeal and by the prepayment of the costs of the preparation of the record of proceedings by the commission, its subcommittee or hearing officer.  An appeal shall be on the record previously made before the commission, its subcommittee or hearing officer, unless otherwise provided by rules and regulations adopted by the board.  The decision of the commission, its subcommittee or hearing officer shall not be disturbed on appeal if supported by substantial evidence, was not arbitrary or capricious, within the authority of the commission, and did not violate some statutory or constitutional right.  The State Board of Education in its authority may reverse, or remand with instructions, the decision of the commission, its subcommittee or hearing officer.  The decision of the State Board of Education shall be final. (11)  (a)  The State Board of Education, acting through the commission, may deny an application for any teacher or administrator license for one or more of the following: (i)  Lack of qualifications which are prescribed by law or regulations adopted by the State Board of Education; (ii)  The applicant has a physical, emotional or mental disability that renders the applicant unfit to perform the duties authorized by the license, as certified by a licensed psychologist or psychiatrist; (iii)  The applicant is actively addicted to or actively dependent on alcohol or other habit-forming drugs or is a habitual user of narcotics, barbiturates, amphetamines, hallucinogens or other drugs having similar effect, at the time of application for a license; (iv)  Fraud or deceit committed by the applicant in securing or attempting to secure such certification and license; (v)  Failing or refusing to furnish reasonable evidence of identification; (vi)  The applicant has been convicted, has pled guilty or entered a plea of nolo contendere to a * * * felony, as defined by federal or state law disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act.  For purposes of this subparagraph (vi) of this paragraph (a), a "guilty plea" includes a plea of guilty, entry of a plea of nolo contendere, or entry of an order granting pretrial or judicial diversion; (vii)  The applicant or licensee is on probation or post-release supervision for a * * * felony or conviction, as defined by federal or state law disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act.  However, this disqualification expires upon the end of the probationary or post-release supervision period. (b)  The State Board of Education, acting through the commission, shall deny an application for any teacher or administrator license, or immediately revoke the current teacher or administrator license, for one or more of the following: (i)  If the applicant or licensee has been convicted, has pled guilty or entered a plea of nolo contendere to a sex offense as defined by federal or state law.  For purposes of this subparagraph (i) of this paragraph (b), a "guilty plea" includes a plea of guilty, entry of a plea of nolo contendere, or entry of an order granting pretrial or judicial diversion; (ii)  The applicant or licensee is on probation or post-release supervision for a sex offense conviction, as defined by federal or state law; (iii)  The license holder has fondled a student as described in Section 97-5-23, or had any type of sexual involvement with a student as described in Section 97-3-95; or (iv)  The license holder has failed to report sexual involvement of a school employee with a student as required by Section 97-5-24. (12)  The State Board of Education, acting through the commission, may revoke, suspend or refuse to renew any teacher or administrator license for specified periods of time or may place on probation, reprimand a licensee, or take other disciplinary action with regard to any license issued under this chapter for one or more of the following: (a)  Breach of contract or abandonment of employment may result in the suspension of the license for one (1) school year as provided in Section 37-9-57; (b)  Obtaining a license by fraudulent means shall result in immediate suspension and continued suspension for one (1) year after correction is made; (c)  Suspension or revocation of a certificate or license by another state shall result in immediate suspension or revocation and shall continue until records in the prior state have been cleared; (d)  The license holder has been convicted, has pled guilty or entered a plea of nolo contendere to a * * * felony, as defined by federal or state law disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act.  For purposes of this paragraph, a "guilty plea" includes a plea of guilty, entry of a plea of nolo contendere, or entry of an order granting pretrial or judicial diversion; (e)  The license holder knowingly and willfully committing any of the acts affecting validity of mandatory uniform test results as provided in Section 37-16-4(1); (f)  The license holder has engaged in unethical conduct relating to an educator/student relationship as identified by the State Board of Education in its rules; (g)  The license holder served as superintendent or principal in a school district during the time preceding and/or that resulted in the Governor declaring a state of emergency and the State Board of Education appointing a conservator; (h)  The license holder submitted a false certification to the State Department of Education that a statewide test was administered in strict accordance with the Requirements of the Mississippi Statewide Assessment System; or (i)  The license holder has failed to comply with the Procedures for Reporting Infractions as promulgated by the commission and approved by the State Board of Education pursuant to subsection (15) of this section. For purposes of this subsection, probation shall be defined as a length of time determined by the commission, its subcommittee or hearing officer, and based on the severity of the offense in which the license holder shall meet certain requirements as prescribed by the commission, its subcommittee or hearing officer.  Failure to complete the requirements in the time specified shall result in immediate suspension of the license for one (1) year. (13)  (a)  Dismissal or suspension of a licensed employee by a local school board pursuant to Section 37-9-59 may result in the suspension or revocation of a license for a length of time which shall be determined by the commission and based upon the severity of the offense. (b)  Any offense committed or attempted in any other state shall result in the same penalty as if committed or attempted in this state. (c)  A person may voluntarily surrender a license.  The surrender of such license may result in the commission recommending any of the above penalties without the necessity of a hearing.  However, any such license which has voluntarily been surrendered by a licensed employee may only be reinstated by a majority vote of all members of the commission present at the meeting called for such purpose. (14)  (a)  A person whose license has been suspended or surrendered on any grounds except criminal grounds may petition for reinstatement of the license after one (1) year from the date of suspension or surrender, or after one-half (1/2) of the suspended or surrendered time has lapsed, whichever is greater.  A person whose license has been suspended or revoked on any grounds or violations under subsection (12) of this section may be reinstated automatically or approved for a reinstatement hearing, upon submission of a written request to the commission. A license suspended, revoked or surrendered * * * on criminal grounds because of a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act may be reinstated upon petition to the commission filed after expiration of the sentence and parole or probationary period imposed upon conviction.  A revoked, suspended or surrendered license may be reinstated upon satisfactory showing of evidence of rehabilitation.  The commission shall require all who petition for reinstatement to furnish evidence satisfactory to the commission of good * * * character, good mental, emotional and physical health and such other evidence as the commission may deem necessary to establish the petitioner's rehabilitation and fitness to perform the duties authorized by the license. (b)  A person whose license expires while under investigation by the Office of Educator Misconduct for an alleged violation may not be reinstated without a hearing before the commission if required based on the results of the investigation. (15)  Reporting procedures and hearing procedures for dealing with infractions under this section shall be promulgated by the commission, subject to the approval of the State Board of Education.  The revocation or suspension of a license shall be effected at the time indicated on the notice of suspension or revocation.  The commission shall immediately notify the superintendent of the school district or school board where the teacher or administrator is employed of any disciplinary action and also notify the teacher or administrator of such revocation or suspension and shall maintain records of action taken.  The State Board of Education may reverse or remand with instructions any decision of the commission, its subcommittee or hearing officer regarding a petition for reinstatement of a license, and any such decision of the State Board of Education shall be final. (16)  An appeal from the action of the State Board of Education in denying an application, revoking or suspending a license or otherwise disciplining any person under the provisions of this section shall be filed in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, on the record made, including a verbatim transcript of the testimony at the hearing.  The appeal shall be filed within thirty (30) days after notification of the action of the board is mailed or served and the proceedings in chancery court shall be conducted as other matters coming before the court.  The appeal shall be perfected upon filing notice of the appeal and by the prepayment of all costs, including the cost of preparation of the record of the proceedings by the State Board of Education, and the filing of a bond in the sum of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) conditioned that if the action of the board be affirmed by the chancery court, the applicant or license holder shall pay the costs of the appeal and the action of the chancery court. (17)  All such programs, rules, regulations, standards and criteria recommended or authorized by the commission shall become effective upon approval by the State Board of Education as designated by appropriate orders entered upon the minutes thereof. (18)  The granting of a license shall not be deemed a property right nor a guarantee of employment in any public school district.  A license is a privilege indicating minimal eligibility for teaching in the public school districts of Mississippi.  This section shall in no way alter or abridge the authority of local school districts to require greater qualifications or standards of performance as a prerequisite of initial or continued employment in such districts. (19)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsections (12) and (13) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  Actions taken by the board in suspending a license when required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 are not actions from which an appeal may be taken under this section.  Any appeal of a license suspension that is required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 shall be taken in accordance with the appeal procedure specified in Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, rather than the procedure specified in this section.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. (20)  The Department of Education shall grant and renew all licenses and certifications of teachers and administrators within twenty-one (21) days from the date of a completed application if the applicant has otherwise met all established requirements for the license or certification. SECTION 39.  Section 41-29-303, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-29-303.  No license shall be issued under Section 41-29-301 * * * unless and until the applicant therefor has furnished proof satisfactory to the State Board of Pharmacy that the applicant is * * * of good moral character or, if the applicant be an association or corporation, that the managing officers are of good moral character, and that the applicant is properly equipped as to land, buildings, and paraphernalia to carry on the business described in his application.  No license shall be granted to any person who has within five (5) years been convicted of a willful violation of any law of the United States, or of any state, relating to opium, coca leaves, or other narcotic drugs, or to any person who is a narcotic drug addict.  The state board of pharmacy may suspend or revoke any license for cause. SECTION 40.  Section 51-5-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 51-5-3.  In order to be licensed as a water well contractor in the State of Mississippi, the applicant must be qualified as set out below: (a)  Be at least twenty-one (21) years of age; * * *  (b)  Be of good moral character; ( * * *cb)  Demonstrate to the satisfaction of the commission a reasonable knowledge of this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted by the commission under the provisions of this chapter; ( * * *dc)  Possess the necessary drilling equipment, or present to the commission sufficient evidence to show that he has access to the use of such equipment at any time he needs it; and ( * * *ed)  Have not less than three (3) years' experience in the work for which he is applying for a license. SECTION 41.  Section 67-1-57, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 67-1-57.  Before a permit is issued the department shall satisfy itself: (a)  That the applicant, if an individual, or if a partnership, each of the members of the partnership, or if a corporation, each of its principal officers and directors, or if a limited liability company, each member of the limited liability company, * * * is of good moral character and, in addition, enjoys a reputation of being a peaceable, law-abiding citizen of the community in which he resides, and is generally fit for the trust to be reposed in him, is not less than twenty-one (21) years of age, and has not been convicted of a * * * felony in any state or federal court disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act.  However, a felony conviction, other than a crime of violence or a violation of state or federal controlled substance laws, does not automatically disqualify a person from being approved for a permit.  If at least ten (10) years have elapsed since conviction, the department may consider such felony convictions in determining whether all other qualifications are met. (b)  That, except in the case of an application for a solicitor's permit, the applicant is the true and actual owner of the business for which the permit is desired, and that he intends to carry on the business authorized for himself and not as the agent of any other person, and that he intends to superintend in person the management of the business or that he will designate a manager to manage the business for him.  Except for managers employed by the holder of a direct wine shipper's permit, all managers must be approved by the department prior to completing any managerial tasks on behalf of the permittee and must possess all of the qualifications required of a permittee; however, a felony conviction, other than a crime of violence, does not automatically disqualify a person from being approved as a manager if the person was released from incarceration at least three (3) years prior to application for approval as a manager.  A felony conviction, other than a crime of violence, may be considered by the department in determining whether all other qualifications are met. (c)  That the applicant for a package retailer's permit, if an individual, is a resident of the State of Mississippi.  If the applicant is a partnership, each member of the partnership must be a resident of the state.  If the applicant is a limited liability company, each member of the limited liability company must be a resident of the state.  If the applicant is a corporation, the designated manager of the corporation must be a resident of the state. (d)  That the place for which the permit is to be issued is an appropriate one considering the character of the premises and the surrounding neighborhood. (e)  That the place for which the permit is to be issued is within the corporate limits of an incorporated municipality or qualified resort area or club which comes within the provisions of this article. (f)  That the applicant is not indebted to the state for any taxes, fees or payment of penalties imposed by any law of the State of Mississippi or by any rule or regulation of the department. (g)  That the applicant is not in the habit of using alcoholic beverages to excess and is not physically or mentally incapacitated, and that the applicant has the ability to read and write the English language. (h)  That the department does not believe and has no reason to believe that the applicant will sell or knowingly permit any agent, servant or employee to unlawfully sell liquor in a dry area or in any other manner contrary to law. (i)  That the applicant is not residentially domiciled with any person whose permit or license has been cancelled for cause within the twelve (12) months next preceding the date of the present application for a permit. (j)  That the department has not, in the exercise of its discretion which is reserved and preserved to it, refused to grant permits under the restrictions of this section, as well as under any other pertinent provision of this article. (k)  That there are not sufficient legal reasons to deny a permit on the ground that the premises for which the permit is sought has previously been operated, used or frequented for any purpose or in any manner that is lewd, immoral or offensive to public decency.  In the granting or withholding of any permit to sell alcoholic beverages at retail, the department in forming its conclusions may give consideration to any recommendations made in writing by the district or county attorney or county, circuit or chancery judge of the county, or the sheriff of the county, or the mayor or chief of police of an incorporated city or town wherein the applicant proposes to conduct his business and to any recommendations made by representatives of the department. (l)  That the applicant and the applicant's key employees, as determined by the department, do not have a disqualifying criminal record.  In order to obtain a criminal record history check, the applicant shall submit to the department a set of fingerprints from any local law enforcement agency for each person for whom the records check is required.  The department shall forward the fingerprints to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the Department of Public Safety shall forward the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check.  Costs for processing the set or sets of fingerprints shall be borne by the applicant.  The department may waive the fingerprint requirement in the case of an applicant for a direct wine shipper's permit. The department shall not deny employment to an employee of the applicant prior to the identification of a disqualifying record or other disqualifying information. SECTION 42.  Section 67-3-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 67-3-19.  Where application is made for a permit to engage in the business of a retailer of light wine, light spirit product or beer, the applicant shall show in his application that he possesses the following qualifications: (a)  Applicant must be a person at least twenty-one (21) years of age * * *, of good moral character and a resident of the State of Mississippi. (b)  Applicant shall not have been convicted of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, or of pandering or of keeping or maintaining a house of prostitution, or have been convicted within two (2) years of the date of his application of any violation of the laws of this state or the laws of the United States relating to alcoholic liquor.  However, a felony conviction, other than a crime of violence or a violation of state-or federal-controlled substance laws, does not automatically disqualify a person from being approved for a permit.  If ten (10) years or more have elapsed since the person was discharged from confinement, imprisonment, parole, post release supervision or probation, whichever is later, the department may consider such felony convictions in determining whether all other qualifications are met. (c)  Applicant shall not have had revoked, except for a violation of Section 67-3-52, within two (2) years next preceding his application, any license or permit issued to him pursuant to the laws of this state, or any other state, to sell alcoholic liquor of any kind. (d)  Applicant shall be the owner of the premises for which the permit is sought or the holder of an existing lease thereon. (e)  Applicant shall not be residentially domiciled with any person whose permit has been revoked for cause, except for a violation of Section 67-3-52, within two (2) years next preceding the date of the present application for a permit. (f)  The applicant has not had any license or permit to sell beer, light spirit product or light wine at retail revoked, within five (5) years next preceding his application, due to a violation of Section 67-3-52. (g)  Applicant shall not employ any person whose permit has been revoked when such person owned or operated the business on the premises for which a permit is sought or allow such person to have any financial interest in the business of the applicant, until such person is qualified to obtain a permit in his own name. (h)  The applicant is not indebted to the State of Mississippi for any taxes. (i)  If applicant is a partnership, all members of the partnership must be qualified to obtain a permit.  Each member of the partnership must be a resident of the State of Mississippi. (j)  If applicant is a corporation, all officers and directors thereof, and any stockholder owning more than five percent (5%) of the stock of such corporation, and the person or persons who shall conduct and manage the licensed premises for the corporation shall possess all the qualifications required herein for any individual permittee.  However, the requirements as to residence shall not apply to officers, directors and stockholders of such corporation. Any misstatement or concealment of fact in an application shall be grounds for denial of the application or for revocation of the permit issued thereon. The commissioner may refuse to issue a permit to an applicant for a place that is frequented by known criminals, prostitutes, or other law violators or troublemakers who disturb the peace and quietude of the community and frequently require the assistance of peace officers to apprehend such law violators or to restore order.  The burden of proof of establishing the foregoing shall rest upon the commissioner. SECTION 43.  Section 73-2-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-2-7.  In order to qualify for a license as a landscape architect, an applicant must: (a)  Submit evidence of his * * * good moral character and integrity to the examining board. (b)  Have received a degree in landscape architecture from a college or university having a minimum four-year curriculum in landscape architecture approved by the board or have completed seven (7) years of work in the practice of landscape architecture of a grade and character suitable to the board.  Graduation in a curriculum other than landscape architecture from a college or university shall be equivalent to two (2) years' experience of the seven (7) specified above in this section, except that no applicant shall receive credit for more than two (2) years' experience for any scholastic training. (c)  Pass such written examination as required in Section 73-2-9. Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 44.  Section 73-4-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-4-17.  There shall be two (2) classes of auctioneers' licenses, which shall be auctioneer and auction firm.  All applicants for a license under this chapter shall possess the following minimum qualifications: (a)  Applicants shall have attained the age of eighteen (18) years by the issuance date of the license. (b)  Applicants shall have obtained at a minimum a high school diploma or G.E.D. equivalent and shall be graduates of an auctioneering school approved by the commission. (c)  Each applicant for a license under this chapter shall demonstrate to the commission that he is * * * of good moral character and worthy of public trust through background information to be provided on his application form and two (2) letters of reference from persons not related to the applicant who have known the applicant at least three (3) years.  The commission may require additional information or a personal interview with the applicant to determine if such applicant should be granted a license. (d)  Each applicant for a license under this chapter shall take and successfully complete an examination as prescribed by the commission.  The examination shall include questions on ethics, reading comprehension, writing, spelling, elementary arithmetic, elementary principals of land economics, general knowledge of bulk sales law, contracts of sale, agency, leases, brokerage, knowledge of various goods commonly sold at auction, ability to call bids, knowledge of sale preparation and proper sale advertising and sale summary, and knowledge of the provisions of this chapter and the commission's rules and regulations.  There shall be separate examinations for auctioneer and auction firm each based upon relevant subject matter appropriate to the license classification as set forth herein.  Examinations shall be administered at least once a year and may be administered quarterly at the commission's discretion provided there are at least twenty-five (25) examinees.  The commission shall ensure that the various forms of the test remain secure. (e)  In order to defray the cost of administration of the examinations, applicants for the examination shall pay fees as follows: (i)  Auctioneer.......................... $100.00. (ii)  Auction firm....................... $100.00. (f)  Each applicant desiring to sit for the examination for any license required under this chapter shall be required to furnish to the commission at least thirty (30) days prior to the examination evidence of a surety bond in the following minimum amounts: (i)  Auctioneer....................... $10,000.00. (ii)  Auction firm.................... $10,000.00. (g)  In addition to the bond required herein, applicants for the auction firm license shall furnish the commission with all relevant information concerning the premises to be licensed, to include location, whether the premises are owned or leased, and an affidavit that the proposed use of the premises as an auction firm does not violate zoning or any other use restrictions.  A separate license shall be required for each business location of the owner of multiple auction galleries. (h)  Except as provided in Section 33-1-39, all licenses granted pursuant to this chapter shall be for a term of two (2) years and shall expire on the first day of March at the end of such two-year term.  The biennial license fees shall be set from time to time by the commission with a maximum fee of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00). License fees shall not be prorated for any portion of a year but shall be paid for the entire biennial period regardless of the date of the application. Individuals failing to submit license renewal fees on or before March 1 of the year for renewal shall be required to successfully pass the next administration of the examination in order to renew a license. (i)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64, Mississippi Code of 1972. (j)  A licensee shall keep such books, accounts and records as will enable the commission to determine whether such licensee is in compliance with the provisions of this chapter, and rules and regulations made pursuant thereto, and any other law, rule and regulation applicable to the conduct of such business.  The commission and its employees or representatives shall have the right to enter and make inspections of any place where the auction business is carried on and inspect and copy any record pertaining to the auction business under this chapter.  The commission may conduct or cause to be conducted an examination or audit of the books and records of any licensee at any time the commission deems proper, the cost of the examination or audit to be borne by the licensee.  The refusal of access to the books and records shall be cause for the revocation of its license. SECTION 45.  Section 73-6-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-6-13.  (1)  Any adult * * * of good moral character who has (a) graduated from a school or college of chiropractic recognized by the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, preceded by the successful completion of at least two (2) academic years at an accredited institution of higher learning, or accredited junior college, and (b) successfully completed parts 1, 2, 3 and 4 and the physical modality section of the examination prepared by the National Board of Chiropractic Examiners, shall be entitled to take the examination for a license to practice chiropractic in Mississippi.  The State Board of Chiropractic Examiners shall keep on file a list of schools or colleges of chiropractic which are so recognized.  No chiropractic school shall be approved unless it is recognized and approved by the Council on Chiropractic Education, its successor or an equivalent accrediting agency, offers an accredited course of study of not less than four (4) academic years of at least nine (9) months in length, and requires its graduates to receive not less than forty (40) clock hours of instruction in the operation of x-ray machinery and not less than forty (40) clock hours of instruction in x-ray interpretation and diagnosis. (2)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, the State Board of Health shall prescribe rules and regulations for the operation and use of x-ray machines. (3)  The examination to practice chiropractic used by the board shall consist of testing on the statutes and the rules and regulations regarding the practice of chiropractic in the State of Mississippi. (4)  Reciprocity privileges for a chiropractor from another state shall be granted at the board's option on an individual basis and by a majority vote of the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners to an adult * * * of good moral character who (a) is currently an active competent practitioner for at least eight (8) years and holds an active chiropractic license in another state with no disciplinary proceeding or unresolved complaint pending anywhere at the time a license is to be issued by this state, (b) demonstrates having obtained licensure as a chiropractor in another state under the same education requirements which were equivalent to the education requirements in this state to obtain a chiropractic license at the time the applicant obtained the license in the other state, (c) satisfactorily passes the examination administered by the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, and (d) meets the requirements of Section 73-6-1(3) pertaining to therapeutic modalities.  The issuance of a license by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. SECTION 46.  Section 73-9-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-9-23.  (1)  No person who desires to practice dentistry or dental hygiene in the State of Mississippi shall be licensed until that person has passed an examination by the board. Applicants for examination shall apply in writing to the board for an examination at least thirty (30) days before the examination and shall upon application pay a nonrefundable fee as elsewhere provided in this chapter. (2)  An applicant for licensure by examination as a dentist who is a graduate of a dental school accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association (ADA), or its successor commission, shall: (a)  Be * * * of good moral character, be possessed of a high school education, and have attained the age of twenty-one (21) years; (b)  Exhibit with the application a diploma or certificate of graduation from the ADA accredited dental school; and (c)  Have successfully completed Parts I and II of the National Board Examinations of the Joint Commission on National Dental Examinations, or its successor commission, unless the applicant graduated from an accredited dental school before 1960. (3)  An applicant for licensure by examination as a dentist who is a graduate of a non-ADA accredited foreign country dental school shall: (a) * * *  Be of good moral character and  Have attained the age of twenty-one (21) years; (b)  Be proficient in oral and written communications in the English language; (c)  Have completed not less than six (6) academic years of postsecondary study and graduated from a foreign dental school that is recognized by the licensure authorities in that country; (d)  Have been licensed as a dentist or admitted to the practice of dentistry in the foreign country in which the applicant received foreign dental school training; (e)  Present documentation of having completed at least two (2) or more years of full-time postdoctoral dental education in a dental school accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association, or its successor commission, and has been certified by the dean of the accredited dental school as having achieved the same level of didactic and clinical competence as expected of a graduate of the school; and (f)  Have successfully completed Parts I and II of the National Board Examinations of the Joint Commission on National Dental Examinations, or its successor commission, unless the applicant graduated from an approved dental school before 1960. (4)  An applicant for licensure by examination as a dental hygienist who is a graduate of a dental hygiene school accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association (ADA), or its successor commission, shall: (a)  Be * * * of good moral character, be possessed of a high school education and have attained the age of eighteen (18) years; (b)  Exhibit with the application a diploma or certificate of graduation from the ADA accredited dental hygiene school; and (c)  Have successfully completed the National Board Dental Hygiene Examinations of the Joint Commission on National Dental Examinations, or its successor commission. (5)  An applicant for licensure by examination as a dental hygienist who is a graduate of a non-ADA accredited foreign country dental hygiene school shall: (a) * * *  Be of good moral character and  Have attained the age of eighteen (18) years; (b)  Be proficient in oral and written communications in the English language; (c)  Have completed not less than two (2) academic years of postsecondary study and graduated from a foreign dental hygiene school that is recognized by the licensure authorities in that country; (d)  Have been licensed as a dental hygienist or admitted to the practice of dental hygiene in the foreign country in which the applicant received foreign dental hygiene school training; (e)  Present documentation of having completed at least one or more years of full-time postgraduate clinical education in a dental hygiene school accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association, or its successor commission, and has been certified by the dean of the accredited dental hygiene school as having achieved the same level of didactic and clinical competence as expected of a graduate of the school; and (f)  Have successfully completed the National Board Dental Hygiene Examinations of the Joint Commission on National Dental Examinations, or its successor commission. (6)  Applications shall be made in the form and content as required in this section and as shall be prescribed by the board, and each applicant shall submit upon request such proof as the board may require as to age * * *, character and qualifications.  Applications must be signed by two (2) citizens of the state of which the applicant is a resident * * *, attesting under oath that the applicant is of good moral character.  All applicants for licensure shall submit an endorsement from all states in which he or she is currently licensed or has ever been licensed to practice dentistry or dental hygiene.  The board may disallow the licensure examination to any applicant who has been found guilty of any of the grounds for disciplinary action as enumerated in Section 73-9-61. (7)  Examination shall be as elsewhere provided in this chapter and the board may by its rules and regulations prescribe reasonable professional standards for oral, written, clinical and other examinations given to applicants, and, if deemed necessary by the board, include a requirement that licensure examinations of applicants be conducted utilizing live human subjects.  Each applicant shall appear before the board and be examined to determine his or her learning and skill in dentistry or dental hygiene.  If found by the members of the board conducting the examination to possess sufficient learning and skill therein * * * and to be of good moral character, the board shall, as early as practicable, grant to the person a license to practice dentistry or dental hygiene, as the case may be, which shall be signed by each member of the board who attended the examination and approved the issuance of a license. (8)  The Board of Dental Examiners may, at its own discretion, accept certification of a licensure applicant, either dentist or dental hygienist, by the National Board Examinations of the Joint Commission on National Dental Examinations, or its successor commission, in lieu of the written examination.  However, in all such instances the board shall retain the right to administer such further written and practical examinations and demonstrations as it deems necessary. (9)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 47.  Section 73-11-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-11-51.  (1)  No person shall engage in the business or practice of funeral service, including embalming, and/or funeral directing or hold himself out as transacting or practicing or being entitled to transact or practice funeral service, including embalming, and/or funeral directing in this state unless duly licensed under the provisions of this chapter. (2)  The board is authorized and empowered to examine applicants for licenses for the practice of funeral service and funeral directing and shall issue the proper license to those persons who successfully pass the applicable examination and otherwise comply with the provisions of this chapter. (3)  To be licensed for the practice of funeral directing under this chapter, a person must furnish satisfactory evidence to the board that he or she: (a)  Is at least eighteen (18) years of age; (b)  Has a high school diploma or the equivalent thereof; (c)  Has served as a resident trainee for not less than twelve (12) months under the supervision of a person licensed for the practice of funeral service or funeral directing in this state; and (d)  Has successfully passed a written and/or oral examination as prepared or approved by the board. (4)  To be licensed for the practice of funeral service under this chapter, a person must furnish satisfactory evidence to the board that he or she: (a)  Is at least eighteen (18) years of age; (b)  Has a high school diploma or the equivalent thereof; (c)  Has successfully completed twelve (12) months or more of academic and professional instruction from an institution accredited by the United States Department of Education for funeral service education and have a certificate of completion from an institution accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service Education or any other successor recognized by the United States Department of Education for funeral service education; (d)  Has served as a resident trainee for not less than twelve (12) months, either before or after graduation from an accredited institution mentioned above, under the supervision of a person licensed for the practice of funeral service in this state and in an establishment licensed in this state; and (e)  Has successfully passed the National Conference of Funeral Examiners examination and/or such other examination as approved by the board. (5)  All applications for examination and license for the practice of funeral service or funeral directing shall be upon forms furnished by the board and shall be accompanied by an examination fee, a licensing fee and a nonrefundable application fee in amounts fixed by the board in accordance with Section 73-11-56.  The fee for an initial license, however, may be prorated in proportion to the period of time from the date of issuance to the date of biennial license renewal prescribed in subsection (8) of this section.  All applications for examination shall be filed with the board office at least sixty (60) days before the date of examination.  A candidate shall be deemed to have abandoned the application for examination if he does not appear on the scheduled date of examination unless such failure to appear has been approved by the board. (6)  The practice of funeral service or funeral directing must be engaged in at a licensed funeral establishment, at least one (1) of which is listed as the licensee's place of business; and no person, partnership, corporation, association or other organization shall open or maintain a funeral establishment at which to engage in or conduct or hold himself or itself out as engaging in the practice of funeral service or funeral directing until such establishment has complied with the licensing requirements of this chapter.  A license for the practice of funeral service or funeral directing shall be used only at licensed funeral establishments; however, this provision shall not prevent a person licensed for the practice of funeral service or funeral directing from conducting a funeral service at a church, a residence, public hall, lodge room or cemetery chapel, if such person maintains a fixed licensed funeral establishment of his own or is in the employ of or an agent of a licensed funeral establishment. (7)  Any person holding a valid, unrevoked and unexpired nonreciprocal license in another state or territory having requirements greater than or equal to those of this state as determined by the board may apply for a license to practice in this state by filing with the board a certified statement from the secretary of the licensing board of the state or territory in which the applicant holds his license certifying to his qualifications and good standing with that board.  He/she must also successfully pass a written and/or oral examination on the Mississippi Funeral Service licensing law and rules and regulations as prepared or approved by the board, and must pay a nonrefundable application fee set by the board. If the board finds that the applicant has fulfilled aforesaid requirements and has fulfilled substantially similar requirements of those required for a Mississippi licensee, the board shall grant such license upon receipt of a fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee set by the board for a license for the practice of funeral service or funeral directing, as the case may be, in this state.  The board may issue a temporary funeral service or funeral directing work permit before a license is granted, before the next regular meeting of the board, if the applicant for a reciprocal license has complied with all requirements, rules and regulations of the board.  The temporary permit will expire at the next regular meeting of the board.  The issuance of a license or temporary permit by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (8)  (a)  Except as provided in Section 33-1-39, any person holding a license for the practice of funeral service or funeral directing may have the same renewed for a period of two (2) years by making and filing with the board an application on or before the due date.  Payment of the renewal fee shall be in an amount set by the board in accordance with Section 73-11-56.  The board shall mail the notice of renewal and the due date for the payment of the renewal fee to the last-known address of each licensee at least thirty (30) days before that date.  It is the responsibility of the licensee to notify the board in writing of any change of address.  An application will be considered late if the application and proper fees are not in the board's office or postmarked by the due date.  Failure of a license holder to receive the notice of renewal shall not exempt or excuse a license holder from the requirement of renewing the license on or before the license expiration date. (b)  If the renewal fee is not paid on or postmarked by the due date, the license of such person shall by operation of law automatically expire and become void without further action of the board.  The board may reinstate such license if application for licensure is made within a period of five (5) years, upon payment of the renewal fee for the current year, all renewal fees in arrears, and a reinstatement fee.  After a period of five (5) years, the licensee must make application, pay the current renewal fee, all fees in arrears, and pass a written and/or oral examination as prepared or approved by the board. (9)  No license shall be assignable or valid for any person other than the original licensee. (10)  The board may, in its discretion, if there is a major disaster or emergency where human death is likely to occur, temporarily authorize the practice of funeral directing and funeral service by persons licensed to practice in another state but not licensed to practice in this state.  Only persons licensed in this state, however, may sign death certificates. (11)  Any funeral service technology or mortuary science program accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service Education in the State of Mississippi, as well as students enrolled in such a program, shall be exempt from licensing under this chapter when embalming or otherwise preparing a deceased human body for disposition as part of a student practicum experience, when the student is directly supervised by an instructor or preceptor who holds a current funeral service license. This exemption shall apply to practicum experiences performed at an accredited institution of funeral service technology or mortuary science program or at a duly licensed funeral establishment or commercial mortuary service.  Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to allow any funeral service technology or mortuary science program, or those students enrolled in such a program, to engage in practicum experiences for remuneration. (12)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 48.  Section 73-11-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-11-51.  (1)  No person shall engage in the business or practice of funeral service, including embalming, and/or funeral directing or hold himself out as transacting or practicing or being entitled to transact or practice funeral service, including embalming, and/or funeral directing in this state unless duly licensed under the provisions of this chapter. (2)  The board is authorized and empowered to examine applicants for licenses for the practice of funeral service and funeral directing and shall issue the proper license to those persons who successfully pass the applicable examination and otherwise comply with the provisions of this chapter. (3)  To be licensed for the practice of funeral directing under this chapter, a person must furnish satisfactory evidence to the board that he or she: (a)  Is at least eighteen (18) years of age; (b)  Has a high school diploma or the equivalent thereof; (c)  Has served as a resident trainee for not less than twelve (12) months under the supervision of a person licensed for the practice of funeral service or funeral directing in this state; and (d)  Has successfully passed a written and/or oral examination as prepared or approved by the board * * *; and. * * *  (e)  Is of good moral character. (4)  To be licensed for the practice of funeral service under this chapter, a person must furnish satisfactory evidence to the board that he or she: (a)  Is at least eighteen (18) years of age; (b)  Has a high school diploma or the equivalent thereof; (c)  Has successfully completed twelve (12) months or more of academic and professional instruction from an institution accredited by the United States Department of Education for funeral service education and have a certificate of completion from an institution accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service Education or any other successor recognized by the United States Department of Education for funeral service education; (d)  Has served as a resident trainee for not less than twelve (12) months, either before or after graduation from an accredited institution mentioned above, under the supervision of a person licensed for the practice of funeral service in this state and in an establishment licensed in this state; and (e)  Has successfully passed the National Conference of Funeral Examiners examination and/or such other examination as approved by the board * * *; and. * * *  (f)  Is of good moral character. (5)  All applications for examination and license for the practice of funeral service or funeral directing shall be upon forms furnished by the board and shall be accompanied by an examination fee, a licensing fee and a nonrefundable application fee in amounts fixed by the board in accordance with Section 73-11-56.  The fee for an initial license, however, may be prorated in proportion to the period of time from the date of issuance to the date of biennial license renewal prescribed in subsection (8) of this section.  All applications for examination shall be filed with the board office at least sixty (60) days before the date of examination.  A candidate shall be deemed to have abandoned the application for examination if he does not appear on the scheduled date of examination unless such failure to appear has been approved by the board. (6)  The practice of funeral service or funeral directing must be engaged in at a licensed funeral establishment, at least one (1) of which is listed as the licensee's place of business; and no person, partnership, corporation, association or other organization shall open or maintain a funeral establishment at which to engage in or conduct or hold himself or itself out as engaging in the practice of funeral service or funeral directing until such establishment has complied with the licensing requirements of this chapter.  A license for the practice of funeral service or funeral directing shall be used only at licensed funeral establishments; however, this provision shall not prevent a person licensed for the practice of funeral service or funeral directing from conducting a funeral service at a church, a residence, public hall, lodge room or cemetery chapel, if such person maintains a fixed licensed funeral establishment of his own or is in the employ of or an agent of a licensed funeral establishment. (7)  Any person holding a valid, unrevoked and unexpired nonreciprocal license in another state or territory having requirements greater than or equal to those of this state as determined by the board may apply for a license to practice in this state by filing with the board a certified statement from the secretary of the licensing board of the state or territory in which the applicant holds his license certifying to his qualifications and good standing with that board.  He/she must also successfully pass a written and/or oral examination on the Mississippi Funeral Service licensing law and rules and regulations as prepared or approved by the board, and must pay a nonrefundable application fee set by the board.  If the board finds that the applicant has fulfilled aforesaid requirements and has fulfilled substantially similar requirements of those required for a Mississippi licensee, the board shall grant such license upon receipt of a fee in an amount equal to the renewal fee set by the board for a license for the practice of funeral service or funeral directing, as the case may be, in this state.  The board may issue a temporary funeral service or funeral directing work permit before a license is granted, before the next regular meeting of the board, if the applicant for a reciprocal license has complied with all requirements, rules and regulations of the board.  The temporary permit will expire at the next regular meeting of the board.  The issuance of a license or temporary permit by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (8)  (a)  Except as provided in Section 33-1-39, any person holding a license for the practice of funeral service or funeral directing may have the same renewed for a period of two (2) years by making and filing with the board an application on or before the due date.  Payment of the renewal fee shall be in an amount set by the board in accordance with Section 73-11-56.  The board shall mail the notice of renewal and the due date for the payment of the renewal fee to the last-known address of each licensee at least thirty (30) days before that date.  It is the responsibility of the licensee to notify the board in writing of any change of address.  An application will be considered late if the application and proper fees are not in the board's office or postmarked by the due date.  Failure of a license holder to receive the notice of renewal shall not exempt or excuse a license holder from the requirement of renewing the license on or before the license expiration date. (b)  If the renewal fee is not paid on or postmarked by the due date, the license of such person shall by operation of law automatically expire and become void without further action of the board.  The board may reinstate such license if application for licensure is made within a period of five (5) years, upon payment of the renewal fee for the current year, all renewal fees in arrears, and a reinstatement fee.  After a period of five (5) years, the licensee must make application, pay the current renewal fee, all fees in arrears, and pass a written and/or oral examination as prepared or approved by the board. (9)  No license shall be assignable or valid for any person other than the original licensee. (10)  The board may, in its discretion, if there is a major disaster or emergency where human death is likely to occur, temporarily authorize the practice of funeral directing and funeral service by persons licensed to practice in another state but not licensed to practice in this state.  Only persons licensed in this state, however, may sign death certificates. (11)  Any funeral service technology or mortuary science program accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service Education in the State of Mississippi, as well as students enrolled in such a program, shall be exempt from licensing under this chapter when embalming or otherwise preparing a deceased human body for disposition as part of a student practicum experience, when the student is directly supervised by an instructor or preceptor who holds a current funeral service license. This exemption shall apply to practicum experiences performed at an accredited institution of funeral service technology or mortuary science program or at a duly licensed funeral establishment or commercial mortuary service.  Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to allow any funeral service technology or mortuary science program, or those students enrolled in such a program, to engage in practicum experiences for remuneration. (12)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 49.  Section 73-13-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-13-23.  (1)  (a)  The following shall be considered as minimum evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant is qualified for licensure as a professional engineer: Graduation in an engineering curriculum of four (4) years or more from a school or college approved by the board as of satisfactory standing or graduation in an engineering, engineering technology, or related science curriculum of four (4) scholastic years from a school or college other than those approved by the board plus a graduate degree in an engineering curriculum from a school or college wherein the same engineering curriculum at the undergraduate level is approved by the board as of satisfactory standing; a specific record of four (4) years of qualifying engineering experience indicating that the applicant is competent to practice engineering (in counting years of experience, the board at its discretion may give credit not in excess of three (3) years for satisfactory graduate study in engineering), and the successful passing of examinations in engineering as prescribed by the board. (b)  In considering the qualifications of applicants, engineering teaching may be construed as engineering experience. (c)  The mere execution, as a contractor, of work designed by a professional engineer, or the supervision of the construction of such work as a foreman or superintendent shall not be deemed to be the practice of engineering. (d)  Any person having the necessary qualifications prescribed in Sections 73-13-1 through 73-13-45 to entitle him to licensure shall be eligible for such licensure although he may not be practicing his profession at the time of making his application. (e)  No person shall be eligible for licensure as a professional engineer who * * * is not of good character and reputation, as defined in the board's Code of Professional Conduct, or who presents claims in support of his application which contain major discrepancies. (2)  The following shall be considered as minimum evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant is qualified for enrollment as an engineer intern: (a)  Graduation in an engineering curriculum of four (4) scholastic years or more from a school or college approved by the board as of satisfactory standing or graduation in an engineering, engineering technology, or related science curriculum of four (4) scholastic years from a school or college other than those approved by the board plus a graduate degree in an engineering curriculum from a school or college wherein that same engineering curriculum at the undergraduate level is approved by the board as of satisfactory standing; and (b)  Successfully passing a written examination in the fundamental engineering subjects. SECTION 50.  Section 73-13-77, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-13-77.  (1)  The following shall be considered as minimum evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant is qualified for licensure as a professional surveyor: (a)  (i)  A bachelor's degree in geomatics, surveying or surveying technology approved by the board consisting of a minimum of one hundred twenty (120) semester hours, or the equivalent, in surveying curriculum subjects and a specific record of four (4) years of qualifying surveying experience; or (ii)  A bachelor's degree in a related science curriculum defined by board rule, consisting of sixty-two (62) semester hours in surveying curriculum subjects as defined by board rule, and a specific record of five (5) years of qualifying surveying experience; or (iii)  A bachelor's degree in a related science curriculum defined by board rule, and a specific record of six (6) years of qualifying surveying experience; or (iv)  An associate degree, or its equivalent, in a curriculum approved by the board consisting of sixty-two (62) semester hours in surveying curriculum subjects as defined by board rule, and a specific record of seven (7) years or more of qualifying surveying experience; or (v)  A high school diploma, or its equivalent, and a specific record of twelve (12) years or more of qualifying surveying experience; and (b)  Successfully passing examinations in surveying prescribed by the board. (2)  The following shall be considered as minimum evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant is qualified for enrollment as a surveyor intern: (a)  (i)  A bachelor's degree in geomatics, surveying or surveying technology approved by the board consisting of a minimum of one hundred twenty (120) semester hours, or the equivalent, in surveying curriculum subjects; or (ii)  A bachelor's degree in a related science curriculum defined by board rule consisting of sixty-two (62) semester hours in surveying curriculum subjects as defined by board rule; or (iii)  A bachelor's degree in a related science curriculum defined by board rule; or (iv)  An associate degree, or its equivalent, in a curriculum approved by the board consisting of sixty-two (62) semester hours in surveying curriculum subjects as defined by board rule; or (v)  A high school diploma, or its equivalent, and a specific record of eight (8) years or more of qualifying surveying experience; and (b)  Successfully passing examinations in surveying fundamentals prescribed by the board. * * * (3)  No person shall be eligible for licensure as a professional surveyor who is not of good character and reputation, as defined in the board's Code of Professional Conduct. SECTION 51.  Section 73-15-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-15-19.  (1)  Registered nurse applicant qualifications.  Any applicant for a license to practice as a registered nurse shall submit to the board: (a)  An attested written application on a Board of Nursing form; (b)  Written official evidence of completion of a nursing program approved by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, or one approved by a legal accrediting agency of another state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country which is satisfactory to this board; (c)  Evidence of competence in English related to nursing, provided the first language is not English; (d)  Any other official records required by the board. In addition to the requirements specified in paragraphs (a) through (d) of this subsection, in order to qualify for a license to practice as a registered nurse, an applicant must have successfully been cleared for licensure through an investigation that shall consist of a * * * determination as to good moral character and verification that the prospective licensee is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of licensure as set forth in Section 73-15-29 or guilty of any offense specified in Section 73-15-33.  To assist the board in conducting its licensure investigation, all applicants shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of his or her fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. The board shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. The board may, in its discretion, refuse to accept the application of any person who has been convicted of a criminal offense under any provision of Title 97 of the Mississippi Code of 1972, as now or hereafter amended, or any provision of this article. (2)  Licensure by examination.  (a)  Upon the board being satisfied that an applicant for a license as a registered nurse has met the qualifications set forth in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall proceed to examine such applicant in such subjects as the board shall, in its discretion, determine. The subjects in which applicants shall be examined shall be in conformity with curricula in schools of nursing approved by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, or one approved by a legal accrediting agency of another state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country which is satisfactory to the board. (b)  The applicant shall be required to pass the written examination as selected by the board. (c)  Upon successful completion of such examination, the board shall issue to the applicant a license to practice as a registered nurse. (d)  The board may use any part or all of the state board test pool examination for registered nurse licensure, its successor examination, or any other nationally standardized examination identified by the board in its rules.  The passing score shall be established by the board in its rules. (3)  Licensure by endorsement.  The board may issue a license to practice nursing as a registered nurse without examination to an applicant who has been duly licensed as a registered nurse under the laws of another state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country if, in the opinion of the board, the applicant meets the qualifications required of licensed registered nurses in this state and has previously achieved the passing score or scores on the licensing examination required by this state, at the time of his or her graduation.  The issuance of a license by endorsement to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (4)  Requirements for rewriting the examination.  The board shall establish in its rules the requirements for rewriting the examination for those persons failing the examination on the first writing or subsequent rewriting. (5)  Fee.  The applicant applying for a license by examination or by endorsement to practice as a registered nurse shall pay a fee not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) to the board. (6)  Temporary permit. (a)  The board may issue a temporary permit to practice nursing to a graduate of an approved school of nursing pending the results of the examination in Mississippi, and to a qualified applicant from another state, territory or possession of the United States, or District of Columbia, or pending licensure procedures as provided for elsewhere in this article.  The fee shall not exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00). (b)  The board may issue a temporary permit for a period of ninety (90) days to a registered nurse who is currently licensed in another state, territory or possession of the United States or the District of Columbia and who is an applicant for licensure by endorsement.  Such permit is not renewable except by board action.  The issuance of a temporary permit to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (c)  The board may issue a temporary permit to a graduate of an approved school of nursing pending the results of the first licensing examination scheduled after application. Such permit is not renewable except by board action. (d)  The board may issue a temporary permit for a period of thirty (30) days to any registered nurse during the time enrolled in a nursing reorientation program.  This time period may be extended by board action.  The fee shall not exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00). (e)  The board may adopt such regulations as are necessary to limit the practice of persons to whom temporary permits are issued. (7)  Temporary license. The board may issue a temporary license to practice nursing at a youth camp licensed by the State Board of Health to nonresident registered nurses and retired resident registered nurses under the provisions of Section 75-74-8. (8)  Title and abbreviation.  Any person who holds a license or holds the privilege to practice as a registered nurse in this state shall have the right to use the title "registered nurse" and the abbreviation "R.N."  No other person shall assume such title or use such abbreviation, or any words, letters, signs or devices to indicate that the person using the same is a registered nurse. (9)  Registered nurses licensed under a previous law.  Any person holding a license to practice nursing as a registered nurse issued by this board which is valid on July 1, 1981, shall thereafter be deemed to be licensed as a registered nurse under the provisions of this article upon payment of the fee provided in Section 73-15-27. (10)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 52.  Section 73-15-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-15-21.  (1)  Licensed practical nurse applicant qualifications.  Any applicant for a license to practice practical nursing as a licensed practical nurse shall submit to the board: (a)  An attested written application on a Board of Nursing form; (b)  A diploma from an approved high school or the equivalent thereof, as determined by the appropriate educational agency; (c)  Written official evidence of completion of a practical nursing program approved by the State Department of Education through its Division of Vocational Education, or one approved by a legal accrediting agency of another state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country which is satisfactory to this board; (d)  Evidence of competence in English related to nursing, provided the first language is not English; (e)  Any other official records required by the board. (2)  Licensed practical nurse applicant qualifications for military medics.  Any applicant for a license to practice practical nursing as a licensed practical nurse who is a United States Army Combat Medic Specialist, a United States Navy Hospital Corpsman, or a United States Air Force Aerospace Medical Service Specialist shall submit to the board: (a)  An attested written application on a Board of Nursing form; (b)  A diploma from an approved high school or the equivalent thereof, as determined by the appropriate educational agency; (c)  Written official evidence of completion of the training required for a United States Army Combat Medic Specialist, a United States Navy Hospital Corpsman, or a United States Air Force Aerospace Medical Service Specialist, and after such training, completion of two (2) years of clinical experience that involves providing direct patient care, which may include trauma or emergency oriented care; (d)  Evidence of competence in English related to nursing, provided the first language is not English; (e)  Any other official records required by the board. (3)  Additional requirements for applicants.  In addition to the requirements specified in paragraphs (a) through (e) of subsection (1) or (2) of this section, in order to qualify for a license to practice practical nursing as a licensed practical nurse, an applicant must have successfully been cleared for licensure through an investigation that shall consist of a * * * determination as to good moral character and verification that the prospective licensee is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of licensure as set forth in Section 73-15-29 or guilty of any offense specified in Section 73-15-33.  To assist the board in conducting its licensure investigation, all applicants shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of his or her fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. The board shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. The board may, in its discretion, refuse to accept the application of any person who has been convicted of a criminal offense under any provision of Title 97 of the Mississippi Code of 1972, as now or hereafter amended, or any provision of this article. (4)  Licensure by examination.  (a)  Upon the board being satisfied that an applicant for a license as a practical nurse has met the qualifications set forth in subsection (1) or (2) of this section and subsection (3) of this section, the board shall proceed to examine such applicant in such subjects as the board shall, in its discretion, determine.  The subjects in which applicants shall be examined shall be in conformity with curricula in schools of practical nursing approved by the State Department of Education. (b)  The applicant shall be required to pass the written examination selected by the board. (c)  Upon successful completion of such examination, the board shall issue to the applicant a license to practice as a licensed practical nurse. (d)  The board may use any part or all of the state board test pool examination for practical nurse licensure, its successor examination, or any other nationally standardized examination identified by the board in its rules.  The passing score shall be established by the board in its rules. (5)  Licensure by endorsement.  The board may issue a license to practice practical nursing as a licensed practical nurse without examination to an applicant who has been duly licensed as a licensed practical nurse under the laws of another state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or a foreign country if, in the opinion of the board, the applicant meets the qualifications required of licensed practical nurses in this state and has previously achieved the passing score or scores on the licensing examination required by this state at the time of his or her graduation.  The issuance of a license by endorsement to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (6)  Licensure by equivalent amount of theory and clinical experience.  In the discretion of the board, former students of a state-accredited school preparing students to become registered nurses may be granted permission to take the examination for licensure to practice as a licensed practical nurse, provided the applicant's record or transcript indicates the former student completed an equivalent amount of theory and clinical experiences as required of a graduate of a practical nursing program, and provided the school attended was, at the time of the student's attendance, an accredited school of nursing. (7)  Requirements for rewriting the examination.  The board shall establish in its rules the requirements for rewriting the examination for those persons failing the examination on the first writing or subsequent writing. (8)  Fee.  The applicant applying for a license by examination or by endorsement to practice as a licensed practical nurse shall pay a fee not to exceed Sixty Dollars ($60.00) to the board. (9)  Temporary permit.  (a) The board may issue a temporary permit to practice practical nursing to a graduate of an approved school of practical nursing pending the results of the examination in Mississippi, and to a qualified applicant from another state, territory or possession of the United States, or the District of Columbia, pending licensing procedures as provided for elsewhere in this article.  The fee shall not exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00). (b)  The board may issue a temporary permit for a period of ninety (90) days to a licensed practical nurse who is currently licensed in another state, territory or possession of the United States or the District of Columbia and who is an applicant for licensure by endorsement.  Such permit is not renewable except by board action.  The issuance of a temporary permit to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (c)  The board may issue a temporary permit to a graduate of an approved practical nursing education program or an equivalent program satisfactory to the board pending the results of the first licensing examination scheduled after application. Such permit is not renewable except by board action. (d)  The board may issue a temporary permit for a period of thirty (30) days to any licensed practical nurse during the time enrolled in a nursing reorientation program. This time period may be extended by board action.  The fee shall not exceed Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00). (e)  The board may adopt such regulations as are necessary to limit the practice of persons to whom temporary permits are issued. (10)  Title and abbreviation.  Any person who holds a license or holds the privilege to practice as a licensed practical nurse in this state shall have the right to use the title "licensed practical nurse" and the abbreviation "L.P.N."  No other person shall assume such title or use such abbreviation, or any words, letters, signs or devices to indicate that a person using the same is a licensed practical nurse. (11)  Licensed practical nurses licensed under a previous law.  Any person holding a license to practice nursing as a practical nurse issued by this board which is valid on July 1, 1981, shall thereafter be deemed to be licensed as a practical nurse under the provisions of this article upon payment of the fee prescribed in Section 73-15-27. (12)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 53.  Section 73-17-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-17-9.  It shall be the function and duty of the board to: (a)  Develop, impose, and enforce standards which must be met by individuals in order to receive a license as a nursing home administrator, which standards shall be designed to ensure that nursing home administrators will be individuals who are of good character and are * * * otherwise suitable, and who, by training or experience in the field of institutional administration, are qualified to serve as nursing home administrators; (b)  Develop and apply appropriate techniques, including examinations and investigations, for determining whether an individual meets such standards; (c)  Issue licenses to individuals determined, after the application of such techniques, to meet such standards, and revoke or suspend licenses previously issued by the board in any case where the individual holding any such license is determined substantially to have failed to conform to the requirements of such standards; (d)  Establish and carry out procedures designed to ensure that individuals licensed as nursing home administrators will, during any period that they serve as such, comply with the requirements of such standards; (e)  Receive, investigate, and take appropriate action with respect to any charge or complaint filed with the board to the effect that any individual licensed as a nursing home administrator has failed to comply with the requirements of such standards; (f)  Conduct a continuing study and investigation of nursing homes and administrators of nursing homes within the state with a view to the improvement of the standards imposed for the licensing of such administrators and of procedures and methods for the enforcement of such standards with respect to administrators of nursing homes who have been licensed as such; and (g)  To devise and implement an educational program designed to increase the professional proficiency of nursing home administrators and to assist otherwise qualified individuals to prepare for careers in nursing home administration. SECTION 54.  Section 73-17-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-17-11.  (1)  From and after July 1, 2011, in order to be eligible to be licensed as a nursing home administrator, an individual must submit evidence satisfactory to the board that he or she: (a)  Is at least twenty-one (21) years of age; (b) * * *  Is of good moral character  Has not been convicted of a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, including evidence of a criminal background check within the last six (6) months, under Section 43-11-13 and Section G.407.3 of the Minimum Standards for Institutions for the Aged or Infirm; (c)  Is in good health; (d)  Has satisfied at least one (1) of the following requirements for education and experience: (i)  Has sixty-four (64) hours of college work from an accredited institution and has worked in a supervisory capacity in a Mississippi-licensed nursing home for a minimum of two (2) years immediately before making application for the Administrator-in-Training Program established by board rule; (ii)  Has an associate degree from an accredited institution and has worked in a supervisory capacity in a Mississippi-licensed nursing home for a minimum of two (2) years immediately before making application for the Administrator-in-Training Program established by board rule; (iii)  Has a bachelor's degree in any other field of study from an accredited institution before making application for the Administrator-in-Training Program established by board rule; or (iv)  Has a bachelor's degree in health care administration or a health care related field or business from an accredited institution before making application for the Administrator-in-Training Program established by board rule; (e)  Has (i) completed a nursing home Administrator-in-Training Program and successfully completed the National Association of Long-Term Care Administrator Board (NAB) examination, or (ii) completed an Administrator-in-Training Program in Long-Term Care Administration from an academic institution during which time the institution held National Association of Long-Term Care Administrator Board (NAB) Program Approval through the academic approval process, to the satisfaction of the board; (f)  Has successfully passed the National Association of Long-Term Care Administrator Board (NAB) examination and the Mississippi State Board of Nursing Home Administrators examination to test his or her proficiency and basic knowledge in the area of nursing home administration.  The board may establish the frequency of the offering of those examinations and the contents thereof; and (g)  Has met all of the requirements established by federal law. (2)  The board is authorized to conduct a criminal history records check on applicants for licensure.  In order to determine the applicant's suitability for licensing, the applicant shall be fingerprinted.  The board shall submit the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety for a check of the state criminal records and forward to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a check of the national criminal records.  The Department of Public Safety shall disseminate the results of the state check and the national check to the board for a suitability determination.  The applicant shall not be charged any of the costs of requesting and obtaining the state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. (3)  Reciprocity shall be extended to individuals holding licenses as nursing home administrators in other states, upon proper application and a finding on the part of the board that: (a)  The applicant possesses the basic qualifications listed in this chapter and in the rules and regulations adopted under federal law; (b)  The applicant has met all of the requirements established by federal law; and (c)  The standards for licensure in the other states are at least the substantial equivalent of those in this state, including education and experience, and the applicant has passed both the National Association of Long-Term Care Administrator Board (NAB) and the state exams. The issuance of a license by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (4)  The board may prescribe appropriate fees for the taking of those examinations and for the issuance of licenses.  Those fees shall be not more than the cost of the examinations and Five Hundred Fifty Dollars ($550.00) for the issuance of a license.  However, the fee for an initial license may be prorated in proportion to the period of time from the date of issuance and the date of biennial license renewal prescribed in subsection (5).  All licenses issued under this chapter shall be for a maximum period of two (2) years. (5)  Except as provided in Section 33-1-39, the board may renew licenses biennially upon the payment of a fee to be established by the board, which shall be not more than Five Hundred Fifty Dollars ($550.00), plus any administrative costs for late payment. (6)  Any person who is not licensed under this chapter on July 1, 2011, who makes application with the board on or before June 30, 2012, may qualify for a license under this chapter provided that on or before January 31, 2014, he or she demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that he or she (a) meets the eligibility requirements for a nursing home administrator's license prescribed in this section as those requirements existed on June 30, 2011; (b) has successfully completed the Administrator-in-Training Program requirements existing on June 30, 2011; and (c) has paid all required fees for licensure. (7)  Current licensure by the Department of Mental Health under Section 41-4-7(r) as a mental health/intellectual disability program administrator shall exempt the licensee from the requirement of licensure as a nursing home administrator if the licensee is employed in the state mental health system as Administrator of Intermediate Care Facility or Facilities for Persons with Intellectual Disabilities (ICF/ID) no larger than sixteen (16) beds. (8)  Any member of the Legislature who serves on the Public Health and/or Medicaid Committee who is a licensed nursing home administrator shall be exempt from continuing education requirements for license renewal. SECTION 55.  Section 73-19-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-19-17.  Any person over the age of twenty-one (21) years * * *, of good moral character, and who has graduated from a high school or preparatory school affiliated with and recognized by a state university, and who has graduated from a reputable school or college of optometry, shall be entitled to stand for the examination for license to practice optometry in Mississippi.  The examining Board of Optometry shall keep on file a list of schools or colleges of optometry which are recognized by said board.  The examination to practice optometry shall consist of tests in practical, theoretical and physiological optics, in theoretical and practical optometry and in anatomy and physiology of the eye and in pathology as applied to optometry.  The State Board of Optometry shall not examine or certify any optometrist in any therapeutic procedures unless the optometrist has successfully completed the proper didactic education and supervised clinical training taught by an institution accredited by a regional or professional accreditation organization that is recognized or approved by the Council on Postsecondary Accreditation of the United States Department of Education, or its successor, and approved by the State Board of Optometry with the advice and consultation of the designated members of the State Board of Medical Licensure and the State Board of Pharmacy. SECTION 56.  Section 73-21-85, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-85.  (1)  To obtain a license to engage in the practice of pharmacy by examination, or by score transfer, the applicant shall: (a)  Have submitted a written application on the form prescribed by the board; * * *  (b)  Be of good moral character; ( * * *cb)  Have graduated from a school or college of pharmacy accredited by the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education and have been granted a pharmacy degree therefrom; ( * * *dc)  Have successfully passed an examination approved by the board; ( * * *ed)  Have paid all fees specified by the board for examination, not to exceed the cost to the board of administering the examination; ( * * *fe)  Have paid all fees specified by the board for licensure; and ( * * *gf)  Have submitted evidence of externship and/or internship as specified by the board. (2)  To obtain a license to engage in the practice of pharmacy, a foreign pharmacy graduate applicant shall obtain the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy's Foreign Pharmacy Graduate Examination Committee's certification, which shall include, but not be limited to, successfully passing the Foreign Pharmacy Graduate Equivalency Examination and attaining a total score of at least five hundred fifty (550) on the Test of English as a Foreign Language (TOEFL), and shall: (a)  Have submitted a written application on the form prescribed by the board; * * *  (b)  Be of good moral character; ( * * *cb)  Have graduated and been granted a pharmacy degree from a college or school of pharmacy recognized and approved by the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy's Foreign Pharmacy Graduate Examination Committee; ( * * *dc)  Have paid all fees specified by the board for examination, not to exceed the cost to the board of administering the examination; ( * * *ed)  Have successfully passed an examination approved by the board; ( * * *fe)  Have completed the number of internship hours as set forth by regulations of the board; and ( * * *gf)  Have paid all fees specified by the board for licensure. (3)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. (4) * * *  To ensure that all applicants are of good moral character,  The board shall conduct a criminal history records check on all applicants for a license.  In order to determine the applicant's suitability for licensing, the applicant shall be fingerprinted.  The board shall submit the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety for a check of the state criminal records and forward to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a check of the national criminal records. The Department of Public Safety shall disseminate the results of the state check and the national check to the board for a suitability determination.  The board shall be authorized to collect from the applicant the amount of the fee that the Department of Public Safety charges the board for the fingerprinting, whether manual or electronic, and the state and national criminal history records checks. (5) * * *  To ensure that all applicants are of good moral character,  The board, upon request of the dean of a school of pharmacy in Mississippi, shall be authorized to conduct a criminal history records check on all applicants for enrollment into the school of pharmacy.  In order to determine the applicant's suitability for enrollment and licensing, the applicant shall be fingerprinted.  The board shall submit the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety for a check of the state criminal records and forward to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a check of the national criminal records.  The Department of Public Safety shall disseminate the results of the state check and the national check to the board for a suitability determination and the board shall forward the results to the dean of the school of pharmacy.  The board shall be authorized to collect from the applicant the amount of the fee that the Department of Public Safety charges the board for the fingerprinting, whether manual or electronic, and the state and national criminal history records checks. SECTION 57.  Section 73-21-87, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-87.  (1)  To obtain a license to engage in the practice of pharmacy by reciprocity or license transfer, the applicant shall: (a)  Have submitted a written application on the form prescribed by the board; * * *  (b)  Be of good moral character; ( * * *cb)  Have possessed at the time of initial licensure as a pharmacist such other qualifications necessary to have been eligible for licensure at that time in that state; ( * * *dc)  Have presented to the board proof that any license or licenses granted to the applicant by any other states have not been suspended, revoked, cancelled or otherwise restricted for any reason except nonrenewal or the failure to obtain required continuing education credits; and ( * * *ed)  Have paid all fees specified by the board for licensure. (2)  No applicant shall be eligible for licensure by reciprocity or license transfer unless the state in which the applicant was initially licensed also grants a reciprocal license or transfer license to pharmacists licensed by this state under like circumstances and conditions. (3)  The issuance of a license by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (4)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 58.  Section 73-21-111, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-111.  (1)  The board shall make, adopt, amend and repeal, from time to time, such rules and regulations for the regulation of supportive personnel as may be deemed necessary by the board. (2)  Every person who acts or serves as a pharmacy technician in a pharmacy that is located in this state and permitted by the board shall obtain a registration from the board.  To obtain a pharmacy technician registration the applicant must: (a)  Have submitted a written application on a form(s) prescribed by the board; and * * *  (b)  Be of good moral character; and ( * * *cb)  Have paid the initial registration fee not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). (3)  Each pharmacy technician shall renew his or her registration annually.  To renew his or her registration, a technician must: (a)  Submit an application on a form prescribed by the board; and (b)  Pay a renewal fee not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for each annual registration period.  The board may add a surcharge of not more than Five Dollars ($5.00) to the registration renewal fee to assist in funding a program that assists impaired pharmacists, pharmacy students and pharmacy technicians. (4) * * *  To ensure that all applicants are of good moral character,  The board shall conduct a criminal history records check on all applicants for a license.  In order to determine the applicant's suitability for licensing, the applicant shall be fingerprinted.  The board shall submit the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety for a check of the state criminal records and forward to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a check of the national criminal records.  The Department of Public Safety shall disseminate the results of the state check and the national check to the board for a suitability determination.  The board shall be authorized to collect from the applicant the amount of the fee that the Department of Public Safety charges the board for the fingerprinting, whether manual or electronic, and the state and national criminal history records checks. SECTION 59.  Section 73-23-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-23-47.  (1)  Any person who desires to be licensed under this chapter must: * * *  (a) be of good moral character;  ( * * *ba) have graduated from a physical therapy or physical therapist assistant program, as the case may be, accredited by an agency recognized by the United States Department of Education, Office on Postsecondary Education; * * * and ( * * *cb) pay a nonrefundable examination fee as set by the board; ( * * *dc) pay an application fee, no part of which shall be refunded; ( * * *ed) be examined for licensure by the board; and meet the requirements established by the rules of the board.  The licensure examination for physical therapists and for physical therapist assistants shall be selected by the board and may also include an oral examination or practical examination or both at the discretion of the board. (2)  Any person who desires to exercise the privilege to practice under the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact must complete the terms and provisions of the compact as prescribed in Section 73-23-101. (3)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 60.  Section 73-23-51, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-23-51.  (1)  The board may license as a physical therapist or as a physical therapist assistant, and furnish a certificate of licensure without examination to, any applicant who presents evidence, satisfactory to the board, of having passed an examination before a similar lawfully authorized examining agency or board in physical therapy of another state or the District of Columbia, if the standards for registration in physical therapy or for licensure as a physical therapist assistant in such other state or district are determined by the board to be as high as those of this state.  The issuance of a license by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (2)  Any person who has been trained as a physical therapist in a foreign country and desires to be licensed under this chapter and who: * * *  (a) is of good moral character;  ( * * *ba) holds a diploma from an educational program for physical therapists approved by the board; ( * * *cb) submits documentary evidence to the board that he has completed a course of professional instruction substantially equivalent to that obtained by an applicant for licensure; ( * * *dc) demonstrates satisfactory proof of proficiency in the English language; and ( * * *ed) meets other requirements established by rules of the board, may make application on a form furnished by the board for examination as a foreign-trained physical therapist.  At the time of making such application, the applicant shall pay the fee prescribed by the board, no portion of which shall be returned. Any person who desires to be licensed under this subsection shall take an examination approved by the board and shall obtain a permanent license.  If this requirement is not met, the license of the foreign-trained therapist may be revoked. SECTION 61.  Section 73-24-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-24-19.  (1)  An applicant applying for a license as an occupational therapist or as an occupational therapy assistant shall file a written application on forms provided by the board, showing to the satisfaction of the board that he or she meets the following requirements: * * *  (a)  Is of good moral character; ( * * *ba)  Has been awarded a degree from an education program in occupational therapy recognized by the board, with a concentration of instruction in basic human sciences, the human development process, occupational tasks and activities, the health-illness-health continuum, and occupational therapy theory and practice: (i)  For an occupational therapist, such program shall be accredited by the Accreditation Council for Occupational Therapy Education of the American Occupational Therapy Association or the board-recognized accrediting body; (ii)  For an occupational therapy assistant, such a program shall be accredited by the Accreditation Council for Occupational Therapy Education of the American Occupational Therapy Association or the board-recognized accrediting body; ( * * *cb)  Has successfully completed a period of supervised fieldwork experience at a recognized educational institution or a training program approved by the educational institution where he or she met the academic requirements: (i)  For an occupational therapist, the required supervised fieldwork experience shall meet current national standards that are published annually by the board; (ii)  For an occupational therapy assistant, the required supervised fieldwork experience shall meet national standards that are published annually by the board. (2)  The board shall approve an examination for occupational therapists and an examination for occupational therapy assistants that will be used as the examination for licensure. (3)  Any person applying for licensure shall, in addition to demonstrating his or her eligibility in accordance with the requirements of this section, make application to the board for review of proof of his or her eligibility for certification by the National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy, Inc. (NBCOT), or its successor organization, on a form and in such a manner as the board shall prescribe.  The application shall be accompanied by the fee fixed in accordance with the provisions of Section 73-24-29.  The board shall establish standards for acceptable performance on the examination.  A person who fails an examination may apply for reexamination upon payment of the prescribed fee. (4)  Applicants for licensure shall be examined at a time and place and under such supervision as the board may require.  The board shall give reasonable public notice of these examinations in accordance with its rules and regulations. (5)  An applicant may be licensed as an occupational therapist if he or she:  (a) has practiced as an occupational therapy assistant for four (4) years, (b) has completed the requirements of a period of six (6) months of supervised fieldwork experience at a recognized educational institution or a training program approved by a recognized accredited educational institution before January 1, 1988, and (c) has passed the examination for occupational therapists. (6)  An applicant applying for a compact privilege to practice as an occupational therapist or as an occupational therapy assistant must meet the requirements set out in the Occupational Therapy Licensure Compact provided for in Section 73-24-51. (7)  Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 62.  Section 73-24-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-24-21.  (1)  The board shall grant a license to any person certified prior to July 1, 1988, as an Occupational Therapist Registered (OTR) or a Certified Occupational Therapy Assistant (COTA) by the American Occupational Therapy Association (AOTA).  The board may waive the examination, education or experience requirements and grant a license to any person certified by AOTA after July 1, 1988, if the board determines the requirements for such certification are equivalent to the requirements for licensure in this article. (2)  The board may waive the examination, education or experience requirements and grant a license to any applicant who shall present proof of current licensure as an occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant in another state, the District of Columbia or territory of the United States which requires standards for licensure considered by the board to be equivalent to the requirements for licensure of this article.  The issuance of a license by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (3)  Foreign-trained occupational therapists and occupational therapy assistants shall satisfy the examination requirements of Section 73-24-19.  The board shall require foreign-trained applicants to furnish proof of * * * good moral character and completion of educational and supervised fieldwork requirements substantially equal to those contained in Section 73-24-19 before taking the examination. SECTION 63.  Section 73-25-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-25-3.  Every person who desires to obtain a license to practice medicine must apply therefor, in writing, to the State Board of Medical Licensure at least ten (10) days before the date of the examination and must be examined by the board according to the methods deemed by it to be the most practical and expeditious to test the applicants' qualifications.  If the applicant is found by the board, upon examination, to possess sufficient learning in those branches * * * and to be of good moral character, the board shall issue him a license to practice medicine; however, no applicant shall be granted a license unless the applicant holds a diploma from a reputable medical college or college of osteopathic medicine that requires a four-year course of at least thirty-two (32) weeks for each session, or its equivalent. To qualify for a Mississippi medical license, an applicant must have successfully been cleared for licensure through an investigation that shall consist of a * * * determination as to good moral character and verification that the prospective licensee is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of licensure as set forth in Sections 73-25-29 and 73-25-83.  To assist the board in conducting its licensure investigation, all applicants shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. The board shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. This section shall not apply to applicants for a special volunteer medical license authorized under Section 73-25-18. SECTION 64.  Section 73-26-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-26-3.  (1)  The State Board of Medical Licensure shall license and regulate the practice of physician assistants in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. (2)  All physician assistants who are employed as physician assistants by a Department of Veterans Affairs health care facility, a branch of the United States military or the Federal Bureau of Prisons, and who are practicing as physician assistants in a federal facility in Mississippi on July 1, 2000, and those physician assistants who trained in a Mississippi physician assistant program and have been continuously practicing as a physician assistant in Mississippi since 1976, shall be eligible for licensure if they submit an application for licensure to the board by December 31, 2000.  Physician assistants licensed under this subsection will be eligible for license renewal so long as they meet standard renewal requirements. (3)  Before December 31, 2004, applicants for physician assistant licensure, except those licensed under subsection (2) of this section, must be graduates of physician assistant educational programs accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Educational Programs or its predecessor or successor agency, have passed the certification examination administered by the National Commission on Certification of Physician Assistants (NCCPA), have current NCCPA certification, and possess a minimum of a baccalaureate degree.  Physician assistants meeting these licensure requirements will be eligible for license renewal so long as they meet standard renewal requirements. (4)  On or after December 31, 2004, applicants for physician assistant licensure must meet all of the requirements in subsection (3) of this section and, in addition, must have obtained a minimum of a master's degree in a health-related or science field. (5)  Applicants for licensure who meet all licensure requirements except for the master's degree may be granted a temporary license by the board so long as they can show proof of enrollment in a master's program that will, when completed, meet the master's degree requirement.  The temporary license will be valid for no longer than one (1) year, and may not be renewed. (6)  For new graduate physician assistants and all physician assistants receiving initial licenses in the state, except those licensed under subsection (2) of this section, supervision shall require the on-site presence of a supervising physician for one hundred twenty (120) days. (7)  To qualify for a Mississippi physician assistant license, an applicant must have successfully been cleared for licensure through an investigation that shall consist of a * * * determination as to good moral character and verification that the prospective licensee is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of licensure.  To assist the board in conducting its licensure investigation, all applicants shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. The board shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. SECTION 65.  Section 73-27-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-27-5.  All applicants for license shall have attained the age of twenty-one (21) years, and shall * * * be of good moral character; they shall have had at least four (4) years high school and be graduates of same; they shall have at least one (1) year prepodiatry college education and be graduates of some college of podiatry recognized as being in good standing by the State Board of Medical Licensure.  No college of podiatry or chiropody shall be accredited by the board as a college of good standing that does not require for graduation a course of study of at least four (4) years (eight and one-half (8-1/2) months each) and be recognized by the Council on Education of the American Podiatry Association.  However, all podiatrists actively engaged in the practice of podiatry in the State of Mississippi, prior to January 1, 1938, whether graduates or not, shall, upon furnishing proof thereof by displaying their state privilege tax license to the Secretary of the State Board of Medical Licensure, and upon payment of fee of Ten Dollars and Twenty-five Cents ($10.25), be entitled to a license without an examination, and applications for the license shall be filed not later than sixty (60) days after February 17, 1938.  Upon payment of a fee prescribed by the State Board of Medical Licensure, not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), a license without examination may be issued to podiatrists of other states maintaining equal statutory requirements for the practice of podiatry and extending the same reciprocal privileges to this state.  The State Board of Medical Licensure may affiliate with the National Board of Chiropody or Podiatry Licensure in granting licenses to practice podiatry in Mississippi, provided the written examination covers at least two-thirds (2/3) of the subjects set forth in Section 73-27-9.  The issuance of a license by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. To qualify for a Mississippi podiatry license, an applicant must have successfully been cleared for licensure through an investigation that shall consist of a * * * determination as to good moral character and verification that the prospective licensee is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of licensure as set forth in Section 73-27-13. To assist the board in conducting its licensure investigation, all applicants shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. The board shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 66.  Section 73-27-12, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-27-12.  (1)  Except as provided in Section 33-1-39, the license of every person licensed to practice podiatry in the State of Mississippi shall be renewed annually. On or before May 1 of each year, the board shall mail a notice of renewal of license to every podiatrist to whom a license was issued or renewed during the current licensing year.  The notice shall provide instructions for obtaining and submitting applications for renewal.  The State Board of Medical Licensure is authorized to make applications for renewal available via electronic means.  The applicant shall obtain and complete the application and submit it to the board in the manner prescribed by the board in the notice before June 30 with the renewal fee of an amount established by the board, but not to exceed Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00), a portion of which fee shall be used to support a program to aid impaired podiatrists.  Upon receipt of the application and fee, the board shall verify the accuracy of the application and issue to applicant a certificate of renewal for the ensuing year, beginning July 1 and expiring June 30 of the succeeding calendar year.  That renewal shall render the holder thereof a legal practitioner as stated on the renewal form. (2)  Any podiatrist practicing in Mississippi who allows his or her license to lapse by failing to renew the license as provided in subsection (1) may be reinstated by the board on satisfactory explanation for the failure to renew, by completion of a reinstatement form, and upon payment of the renewal fee for the current year, and shall be assessed a fine of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) plus an additional fine of Five Dollars ($5.00) for each month thereafter that the license renewal remains delinquent. (3)  Any podiatrist not practicing in Mississippi who allows his or her license to lapse by failing to renew the license as provided in subsection (1) may be reinstated by the board on satisfactory explanation for the failure to renew, by completion of a reinstatement form and upon payment of the arrearages for the previous five (5) years and the renewal fee for the current year. (4)  Any podiatrist who allows his or her license to lapse shall be notified by the board within thirty (30) days of that lapse. (5)  Any person practicing as a licensed podiatrist during the time his or her license has lapsed shall be considered an illegal practitioner and shall be subject to penalties set forth in Section 73-27-17, provided that he or she has not submitted the required reinstatement form and fee within fifteen (15) days after notification by the board of the lapse. (6)  Any podiatrist practicing in the State of Mississippi whose license has lapsed and is deemed an illegal practitioner under subsection (5) of this section may petition the board for reinstatement of his or her license on a retroactive basis, if the podiatrist was unable to meet the June 30 deadline due to extraordinary or other legitimate reasons, and retroactive reinstatement of licensure shall be granted or may be denied by the board only for good cause.  Failure to advise the board of change of address shall not be considered a basis for reinstatement. (7)  Fees collected under the provisions of this section shall be used by the board to defray expenses of administering the licensure provisions of Title 73, Chapter 27, Mississippi Code of 1972, and to support a program to aid impaired podiatrists in an amount determined by the board. (8)  In order for a podiatrist whose podiatric medical license has been expired for five (5) years or more to qualify for reinstatement of license, the podiatrist must have successfully been cleared for reinstatement through an investigation that shall consist of a * * * determination as to good moral character and verification that the prospective licensee is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of licensure as set forth in Section 73-27-13.  To assist the board in conducting its licensure investigation, all applicants shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. The board shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. SECTION 67.  Section 73-27-16, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-27-16.  (1)  A person whose license to practice podiatry has been revoked or suspended may petition the Mississippi State Board of Medical Licensure to reinstate this license after a period of not less than one (1) year has elapsed from the date of the revocation or suspension.  The procedure for the reinstatement of a license that is suspended for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be. (2)  The petition shall be accompanied by two (2) or more verified recommendations from podiatrists licensed by the Board of Medical Licensure to which the petition is addressed and by two (2) or more recommendations from citizens each having personal knowledge of the activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary penalty was imposed and such facts as may be required by the board. The petition may be heard at the next regular meeting of the Board of Medical Licensure but not earlier than thirty (30) days after the petition was filed.  No petition shall be considered while the petitioner is under sentence for any criminal offense, including any period during which he is under probation or parole. The hearing may be continued from time to time as the Board of Medical Licensure finds necessary. Any final action by the board on a petition under this section shall be made with the advice of the advisory committee. (3)  In determining whether the disciplinary penalty should be set aside and the terms and conditions, if any, which should be imposed if the disciplinary penalty is set aside, the Board of Medical Licensure may investigate and consider all activities of the petitioner since the disciplinary action was taken against him, the offense for which he was disciplined, his activity during the time his certificate was in good standing, his general reputation for truth * * *, and professional ability * * * and good character; and it may require the petitioner to pass an oral examination. (4)  The Secretary-Treasurer of the Board of Medical Licensure shall enter into his records of the case all actions of the Board of Medical Licensure in setting aside a disciplinary penalty under this section and he shall certify notices to the proper court clerk.  The clerk shall make such changes on his records as may be necessary. SECTION 68.  Section 73-29-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-29-19.  An applicant who is a polygraph examiner licensed under the laws of another state or territory of the United States may be issued a license upon payment of a fee of Fifty Dollars ($50.00) and the production of satisfactory proof that: (1)  He is at least twenty-one (21) years of age; (2)  He is a citizen of the United States; * * *  (3)  He is of good moral character; ( * * *43)  The requirements for the licensing of polygraph examiners in such particular state or territory of the United States were, at the date of the applicant's licensing therein, substantially equivalent to the requirements now in force in this state; ( * * *54)  The applicant had lawfully engaged in the administration of polygraph examinations under the laws of such state or territory for at least two (2) years prior to his application for license hereunder; ( * * *65)  Such other state or territory grants similar reciprocity to license holders of this state; and ( * * *76)  He has complied with Section 73-29-17. The issuance of a license by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. SECTION 69.  Section 73-30-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-30-9.  (1)  The board shall issue a license as a provisional licensed professional counselor, without regard to race, religion, sex or national origin, to each applicant who furnishes satisfactory evidence of the following: (a)  The applicant has completed an application on a form prescribed by the board accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee of Fifty Dollars ($50.00). (b)  The applicant is at least twenty-one (21) years of age. * * *  (c)  The applicant is of good moral character. ( * * *dc)  The applicant is a citizen of the United States, or has an immigration document to verify legal alien work status in the United States.  The immigration document must be current and issued by the United States Immigration Bureau. ( * * *ed)  The applicant is not in violation of any of the provisions of this article and the rules and regulations adopted hereunder. ( * * *fe)  The applicant shall have a minimum acceptable graduate semester hour or acceptable quarter-hour master's degree as determined by the board primarily in counseling or a related counseling field from a regionally or nationally accredited college or university program in counselor education or a related counseling program subject to board approval. All applicants shall provide official transcripts of all graduate work. ( * * *gf)  The applicant must pass the examination approved by the board, as set forth in Section 73-30-7(5). ( * * *hg)  A provisional license issued under this section shall require that the individual confine one's practice to a board-approved site and accrue counseling experience under the supervision of a board-qualified supervisor. ( * * *ih)  The limited license shall be renewable for not more than four (4) years, with a nonrefundable license fee in the amount provided in Section 73-30-29.  Licensees may appeal to the board for an extension of the renewal period. ( * * *ji)  Each applicant for licensure shall apply to undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. (2)  The board shall issue a license or the privilege to practice as a licensed professional counselor, without regard to race, religion, sex or national origin, to each applicant who furnishes satisfactory evidence of the following: (a)  The applicant has completed an application on a form prescribed by the board accompanied by a nonrefundable full application fee of Fifty Dollars ($50.00). (b)  The applicant is at least twenty-one (21) years of age. * * *  (c)  The applicant is of good moral character. ( * * *dc)  The applicant is a citizen of the United States, or has an immigration document to verify legal alien work status in the United States.  The immigration document must be current and issued by the United States Immigration Bureau. ( * * *ed)  The applicant is not in violation of any of the provisions of this article and the rules and regulations adopted hereunder. ( * * *fe)  The applicant shall have a minimum acceptable graduate semester hour or acceptable quarter-hour master's degree as determined by the board primarily in counseling or a related counseling field from a regionally or nationally accredited college or university program in counselor education or a related counseling program subject to board approval. All applicants shall provide official transcripts of all graduate work. ( * * *gf)  The applicant for licensure must pass the examination approved by the board, as set forth in Section 73-30-7(5). ( * * *hg)  The applicant has had post graduate supervised experience in professional counseling acceptable to the board. Applicant shall submit verification of supervised experience. Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. ( * * *ih)  The board shall require each first-time applicant for licensure or the initial privilege to practice and may require applicants for license renewal to undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant for licensure and each renewal applicant as required by the board shall apply to undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. (3)  The board shall administer the privilege to practice in accordance with the Professional Counseling Compact. SECTION 70.  Section 73-31-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-31-13.  The board shall issue a license as a psychologist to each applicant who files an application upon a form and in the manner as the board prescribes, accompanied by the fee as is required by this article; and who furnishes evidence satisfactory to the board that he or she: (a)  Is at least twenty-one (21) years of age; and (b) * * *  Is of good moral character  Has not been convicted of a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act.  The applicant must have successfully been cleared for licensure through an investigation that consists of a determination as to good moral character and verification that the prospective licensee is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of licensure. For the purposes of this article, good moral character includes an absence of felony convictions or misdemeanor convictions involving moral turpitude as established by a criminal background check.  Applicants shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose; and (c)  Is not in violation of any of the provisions of this article and the rules and regulations adopted under this article, and is not currently under investigation by another licensure board; and (d)  Holds a doctoral degree in psychology from an institution of higher education that is: regionally accredited by an accrediting body recognized by the United States Department of Education, or authorized by Provincial statute or Royal Charter to grant doctoral degrees.  From a program accredited by the American Psychological Association, or the Canadian Psychological Association, and from a program that requires at least one (1) year of continuous, full-time residence at the educational institution granting the doctoral degree.  For graduates from newly established programs seeking accreditation or in areas where no accreditation exists, applicants for licensure shall have completed a doctoral program in psychology that meets recognized acceptable professional standards as determined by the board.  For applicants graduating from doctoral level psychology training programs outside of the United States of America or Canada, applicants for licensure shall have completed a doctoral program in psychology that meets recognized acceptable professional standards as determined by the board; and (e)  Has completed a supervised internship from a program accredited by the American Psychological Association or the Canadian Psychological Association that meet the standards of training as defined by the board.  The internship shall be comprised of at least one thousand eight hundred (1,800) hours of actual work, to include direct service, training and supervisory time; and (f)  Demonstrates professional knowledge by passing written (as used in this paragraph, the term "written" means either paper and pencil or computer-administered or computerized testing) and oral examinations in psychology prescribed by the board; except that upon examination of credentials, the board may, by unanimous consent, consider these credentials adequate evidence of professional knowledge. Upon investigation of the application and other evidence submitted, the board shall, not less than thirty (30) days before the examination, notify each applicant that the application and evidence submitted is satisfactory and accepted or unsatisfactory and rejected; if rejected, the notice shall state the reasons for the rejection. The place of examination shall be designated in advance by the board, and the examination shall be given at such time and place and under such supervision as the board may determine. The examination used by the board shall consist of written tests and oral tests, and shall fairly test the applicant's knowledge and application thereof in those areas deemed relevant by the board.  All examinations serve the purpose of verifying that a candidate for licensure has acquired a basic core of knowledge in the discipline of psychology and can apply that knowledge to the problems confronted in the practice of psychology within the applicant's area of practice. The board shall evaluate the results from both the written and oral examinations.  The passing scores for the written and oral examinations shall be established by the board in its rules and regulations.  If an applicant fails to receive a passing score on the entire examination, he or she may reapply and shall be allowed to take a later examination.  An applicant who has failed two (2) successive examinations by the board may not reapply until after two (2) years from the date of the last examination failed. The board shall keep the written examination scores, and an accurate transcript of the questions and answers relating to the oral examinations, and the grade assigned to each answer thereof, as part of its records for at least two (2) years after the date of examination. Persons licensed in another state or jurisdiction applying for the authority to practice interjurisdictional telepsychology must meet the requirements set out in the Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact provided for in Section 73-31-51. Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 71.  Section 73-33-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-33-1.  (1)  Any person residing or having a place for the regular transaction of business in the State of Mississippi * * * being of good moral character, and who shall have received from the State Board of Public Accountancy a license certifying his qualifications as a certified public accountant as hereinafter provided, shall be styled or known as a certified public accountant, and it shall be unlawful for any other person or persons to assume such title or use any letters, abbreviations or words to indicate that such person using same is a certified public accountant, unless such person qualifies for a practice privilege under Section 73-33-17, or at the discretion of the board, such person has been granted use of the title of "certified public accountant retired" by the Mississippi State Board of Public Accountancy or has received a reciprocal certified public accountant license from the State Board of Public Accountancy. (2)  A certified public accountant practicing public accounting under a Mississippi license must be associated and registered with a certified public accountant firm. (3)  The State Board of Public Accountancy shall grant and renew permits to practice as a CPA firm to applicants that demonstrate their qualifications in accordance with this section. (a)  The following shall hold a permit issued under this section:  any firm with an office in this state that practices public accountancy or that uses the title "CPA" or "CPA firm," and any firm that does not have an office in this state but performs the services described in Section 73-33-17(4) for a client having its home office in this state. (b)  A firm that does not have an office in this state may perform a review of a financial statement to be performed in accordance with Statements on Standards for Accounting and Review Services, or a compilation as defined in Section 73-33-2(d), for a client having its home office in this state and may use the title "CPA" and "CPA firm" without a permit issued under this section only if such firm has the qualifications described in subsection (4), complies with the peer review requirements set forth by board rule, and performs such services through an individual with practice privileges under Section 73-33-17. (c)  A firm that is not subject to the requirements of paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection may perform other professional services within the practice of public accountancy while using the title "CPA" and "CPA firm" in this state without a permit issued under this section only if such firm performs such services through an individual with practice privileges under Section 73-33-17 and such firm can lawfully do so in the state where the individuals with practice privileges have their principal place of business. (4)  In order to obtain and maintain a firm permit, a certified public accountant firm shall be required to show the following: (a)  It is wholly owned by natural persons and not owned in whole or in part by business entities; and (b)  A simple majority of the ownership of the firm in terms of financial interests and/or voting rights hold certified public accountant licenses in any state; however, the individuals whose principal place of business is in Mississippi and who perform professional services in this state shall hold a Mississippi certified public accountant license, and that individuals who qualify for practice privileges under Section 73-33-17 who perform services for which a firm permit is required under Section 73-33-17(4) shall not be required to obtain a certificate pursuant to Section 73-33-3 or 73-33-9. (5)  Any certified public accountant firm may include nonlicensee owners, provided that: (a)  The firm designates a licensee of this state who is responsible for the proper registration of the firm and identifies that individual to the board; or in the case of a firm without a Mississippi office which must have a permit pursuant to subsection (3)(a), the firm designates a licensee of another state who meets the requirements provided in Section 73-33-17; (b)  All nonlicensee owners are active individual participants in the certified public accountant firm or affiliated entities; and (c)  The firm complies with such other requirements as the board may impose by rule. (6)  Unless exempt from the firm permit requirement under Section 73-33-1(3), no person or persons shall engage in the practice of public accounting as defined herein as a partnership, joint venture or professional corporation, sole proprietor, or other business organization allowed by law, unless and until each business organization or office thereof located inside the State of Mississippi has registered with and been issued a firm permit by the State Board of Public Accountancy. SECTION 72.  Section 73-38-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-38-9.  (1)  To be eligible for licensure by the board as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist and to be eligible for registration as a speech-language pathology aide or audiology aide, a person shall: * * *  (a)  Be of good moral character; ( * * *ba)  ( * * *1i)  For speech-language pathologists or audiologists, possess at least a master's degree or its equivalent in the area of speech-language pathology or audiology, as the case may be, from an educational institution recognized by the board; ( * * *2ii)  For speech-language pathology aide or audiology aide, the board shall set minimum educational standards which shall be less than a bachelor's degree; ( * * *cb)  For speech-language pathologists and audiologists, submit evidence of the completion of the educational, clinical experience and employment requirements, which requirements shall be based on appropriate national standards and prescribed by the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this article; ( * * *dc)  For speech-language pathologists and audiologists licensure applicants, pass an examination approved by the board.  This examination may be taken either before or after the completion of the employment requirement specified pursuant to paragraph ( * * *cb) of this subsection; ( * * *ed)  For speech-language pathology aides and audiology aides, no examination shall be required. (2)  To be eligible for the privilege to practice, applicants must meet the requirements set out in the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact. SECTION 73.  Section 73-39-67, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-39-67.  (1) To obtain a license to practice veterinary medicine, a person shall file a written application and application fee with the board.  The application shall show that the applicant is a graduate of an accredited college of veterinary medicine or has the educational equivalence as set by the board.  The application shall also show * * * that the applicant is a person of good moral character and any other information and proof as the board may require. (2)  If the board determines that the applicant possesses the proper qualifications, it shall admit the applicant to the next examination, or if the applicant is eligible for license by endorsement, the board may grant him a license.  If an applicant is found not qualified to take the examination or for a license by endorsement, the board shall notify the applicant in writing within thirty (30) days of its finding and the grounds for its findings.  An applicant found unqualified may request a hearing before the board. (3)  The board may grant a temporary license to an applicant to practice veterinary medicine until the scheduled state board examination, if the applicant pays the application fee, provides sufficient evidence that he meets the qualifications for licensure, and provides evidence that he resides in the State of Mississippi.  The board may grant a second temporary permit, but the board may not grant more than two (2) temporary permits to any one (1) person. (4)  A person licensed by the board shall display the license in the facility in which the licensee practices. SECTION 74.  Section 73-39-71, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-39-71.  (1)  The board may issue a license by endorsement to an applicant who furnishes satisfactory proof that he is a graduate of an accredited college of veterinary medicine or the educational equivalence.  The applicant must also show that he * * * is a person of good moral character and is licensed to practice veterinary medicine in at least one (1) state, territory or district of the United States and has practiced veterinary medicine in one or more of those states without disciplinary action by any state or federal agency for at least the three (3) years immediately before filing the application. (2)  The board may examine any person qualifying for licensing under this section. (3)  The issuance of a license by endorsement to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. SECTION 75.  Section 73-53-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-53-13.  The board shall issue the appropriate license to applicants who meet the qualifications of this section. (a)  A license as a "licensed social worker" shall be issued to an applicant who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that he or she meets the following qualifications: (i)  Has a baccalaureate degree in social work from a college or university accredited by the Council on Social Work Education or Southern Association of Colleges and Schools and has satisfactorily completed the Association for Social Work Boards (ASWB) examination for this license; or (ii)  Has a comparable license or registration from another state or territory of the United States of America that imposes qualifications substantially similar to those of this article. (b)  A license as a "licensed master's social worker" shall be issued to an applicant who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that he or she meets the following qualifications: (i)  Has a doctorate or master's degree from a school of social work accredited by the Council on Social Work Education; and (ii)  Has satisfactorily completed the ASWB examination for this license; or (iii)  Has a comparable license or registration from another state or territory of the United States of America that imposes qualifications substantially similar to those of this article. (c)  A license as a "licensed certified social worker" shall be issued to an applicant who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that he or she meets the following qualifications: (i)  Is licensed under this section as a "master's social worker"; and (ii)  Has twenty-four (24) months of professional supervision and clinical or macro social work practice experience acceptable to the board, under appropriate supervision; and (iii)  Has satisfactorily completed the ASWB examination for this license; or (iv)  Has a comparable license or registration from another state or territory of the United States of America that imposes qualifications substantially similar to those of this article. (d)  In addition to the above qualifications, an applicant for any of the above licenses must prove to the board's satisfaction: (i)  Age of at least twenty-one (21) years, and * * *   (ii)  Good moral character, which is a continuing requirement for licensure, and ( * * *iiiii)  United States of America citizenship or status as a legal resident alien, and ( * * *iviii)  Absence of conviction of a * * * felony related to the practice of social work for the last ten (10) years disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. Conviction, as used in this subparagraph, includes a deferred conviction, deferred prosecution, deferred sentence, finding or verdict of guilt, an admission of guilty, or a plea of nolo contendere, and ( * * *viv)  That the applicant has not been declared mentally incompetent by any court, and if any such decree has ever been rendered, that the decree has since been changed, and ( * * *viv)  Freedom from dependency on alcohol or drugs, and ( * * *viivi)  Complete criminal history records check, including a fingerprint and an acceptable sex offender check, by appropriate governmental authorities as prescribed by the board. (e)  Only individuals licensed as "certified social workers" shall be permitted to call themselves "clinical social workers." The issuance of a license by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. Each application or filing made under this section shall include the social security number(s) of the applicant in accordance with Section 93-11-64. SECTION 76.  Section 73-54-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-54-13.  Each person desiring to obtain a license as a marriage and family therapist or marriage and family therapy associate shall make application thereof to the board in such manner as the board prescribes and with required application fees and shall furnish evidence satisfactory to the board that he or she: * * *  (a)  Is of good moral character; ( * * *ba)  Has not engaged or is not engaged in any practice or conduct which would be a ground for refusing to issue a license under Section 73-54-29 or Section 73-53-17; ( * * *cb)  Is qualified for licensure pursuant to the requirements of this chapter; and ( * * *dc)  Is at least twenty-one (21) years of age. SECTION 77.  Section 73-63-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-63-27.  (1)  (a)  Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the following shall be considered as minimum evidence satisfactory to the board that the applicant is qualified for registration as a registered professional geologist: (i)  Graduation from a course of study in geology satisfactory to the board from an accredited college or university, or from a program accredited by an organization recognized by the board, of four (4) or more years and which includes at least thirty (30) semester or forty-five (45) quarter hours of credit, with a major in geology or a geological specialty; (ii)  Demonstration through a specific record of a minimum of four (4) years of qualifying experience, after completion of the academic requirements, in geology or a specialty indicating that the applicant is competent to practice geology or a specialty.  The board may require the experience be gained under the supervision of a geologist registered in this state or any other state with at least as stringent geologic registration requirements, or under the supervision of others who, in the opinion of the board, are qualified to have responsible charge of geological work; (iii)  Successful passage of at least one (1) examination in geology as determined and prescribed by the board; and (iv)  Other requirements as may be established in rules and regulations by the board. (b)  In addition to the qualifications named in paragraph (a) of this subsection, applicants for registration as a registered professional geologist shall include with their application at least three (3) letters of reference from geologists having personal knowledge of the applicant's geologic experience. (c)  The board may give credit for a master's degree in the geological sciences or in a specialty as one (1) year of professional experience and an earned doctorate degree in the geological sciences or in a specialty as two (2) years of professional experience.  The board shall not give more than two (2) years of professional experience credit for the completion of all graduate degrees. (d)  The board may give credit for geological research or teaching of persons studying geology or a specialty at an accredited college or university level as qualifying experience, if the research or teaching, in the opinion of the board, is comparable to experience obtained in the practice of geology or a specialty. (e)  The board may adopt qualifications which, in its judgment, are equivalent to the educational and experience requirements in subsection (1)(a) of this section. * * *  (f)  No person shall be eligible for registration as a professional geologist who is not of good character and reputation. (2)  Before December 31, 1998, any applicant who applies for registration or enrollment shall be considered qualified, without written examination, if the applicant possesses the qualifications prescribed in subsection (1) or (3) of this section, as the case may be. (3)  An applicant who applies for registration before July 1, 1998, shall be qualified without written examination, if the applicant possesses the following qualifications: (a)  A bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in civil engineering with a minimum of fifteen (15) semester hours or an equivalent number of quarter hours of credit in geology or a geologically-related course, as determined by the board; (b)  A certificate of registration as a professional engineer in the State of Mississippi; and (c)  A minimum of ten (10) years of qualifying experience in geotechnical or geological engineering work demonstrated by a specific record. If the board determines after review of the academic and experience qualifications required by this subsection that the applicant is competent to practice geology, the board may issue a certificate of registration under this chapter. (4)  Applicants for enrollment as a geologist-in-training shall meet the qualifications for a registered professional geologist, except the requirement for four (4) years of experience. (5)  The board may adopt requirements for the issuance of temporary registrations.  Qualifications for temporary registrations shall be consistent with those required under this chapter. (6)  Upon written request of an applicant, the board may waive, on a case-by-case basis, any requirement for registration or enrollment, except payment of the applicable fees.  The request shall state the reasons a waiver should be granted.  The requirements waived and the basis for that waiver shall be recorded in the applicant's record and in the proceedings of the board, and any waiver may be subject to repeal or suspension as determined by the board. SECTION 78.  Section 73-67-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-67-21.  (1)  It shall be the responsibility of a massage therapy establishment to verify the current license of any and all persons practicing massage therapy at the location of or on behalf of the establishment.  Failure to comply is subject to penalty assessed by the board of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) and not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per offense. (2)  No person may advertise massage or practice massage for compensation in this state unless he is licensed as a massage therapist by the board.  No person may use the title of or represent himself to be a massage therapist or use any other title, abbreviations, letters, figures, signs or devices that indicate that the person is a massage therapist unless he is licensed to practice massage therapy under the provisions of this chapter.  A current massage therapy license issued by the board shall at all times be prominently displayed in any place where massage therapy is being practiced. (3)  The following are requirements for licensure: (a)  An applicant must be eighteen (18) years of age, or older, on the date the application is submitted. (b)  An application must provide proof of high school graduate equivalency. (c)  An applicant must be of legal status not only to receive a license, but also to work in the State of Mississippi with that license. (d)  An applicant must supply proof of current certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) and first aid of at least eight (8) hours of training, including practical testing, and supply documentation of familiarity with the Americans with Disabilities Act. (e)  All required fees for licensure must be submitted by the applicant. (f)  Any and all requirements regarding * * * good moral character and competency, as provided for in this chapter and in accepted codes of ethics, shall be met. (g)  An applicant must have completed an approved course on communicable diseases, including HIV/AIDS information and prevention. (h)  The applicant's official and certified transcript(s) from the applicant's massage therapy school.  The transcript must verify that the applicant has completed a board-approved training program of no less than the minimum requirement for massage therapy instruction and student clinic, with a minimum grade requirement of "C" or better in every course of instruction, as stated for school requirements. (4)  The following pre-act practitioners are exempt from having to take any examination for licensure, but must fulfill all other requirements as stated in this chapter, except for the requirements in subsection (3)(h) of this section: (a)  Those having more than three hundred (300) documented, board-accepted hours of massage therapy education before January 1, 2001. (b)  Those having more than five (5) years of professional massage therapy experience and a minimum of one hundred fifty (150) hours of approved massage therapy education. (c)  Those having no formal training, but who have successfully passed the National Certification Examination for Therapeutic Massage and Bodywork. (d)  All grandfathering exemption allowances as stated in this subsection (4) shall end on July 1, 2002, for nonstudents, and on June 1, 2003, for students who were enrolled in a part-time massage school curriculum on July 1, 2001.  Individuals may apply for a license until the grandfathering exemption ends, but may not practice massage beyond the allowed grace period as provided for in Section 73-67-37 unless a valid massage therapy license or provisional permit is obtained.  Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, all other pre-act practitioners and anyone not practicing massage therapy before January 1, 2001, must take and pass the licensure examination and follow the requirements in this chapter to practice massage therapy for compensation in Mississippi. (e)  Students enrolled in a massage therapy curriculum of at least five hundred (500) hours on July 1, 2001, who complete graduation from the same curriculum. (5)  Any person who has practiced massage therapy for a period of more than twenty-five (25) years before March 14, 2005, who is employed as a massage therapist by a YMCA or YWCA authorized and existing as a nonprofit corporation under the laws of this state on March 14, 2005, is exempt from having to take any examination for licensure, but must fulfill all other requirements as stated in this chapter, except for the requirements in subsection (3)(b), (d), (g) and (h) of this section. Persons exempt under this subsection may apply for a massage therapy license until January 1, 2006, but may not practice massage therapy after January 1, 2006, unless a valid license is obtained. (6)  Certificates of registration issued by the board before July 1, 2008, shall remain valid as licenses until the next renewal period. (7)  An applicant must have successfully been cleared for licensure through an investigation that shall consist of a * * * determination as to good moral character and verification that the prospective licensee is not guilty of or in violation of any statutory ground for denial of licensure as set forth in Section 73-67-27. (a)  To assist the board in conducting its licensure investigation, all applicants shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose. (b)  Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency. (c)  The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories. (d)  The board shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. SECTION 79.  Section 73-71-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-71-19.  (1)  No person shall be licensed to practice acupuncture unless he or she has passed an examination and/or has been found to have the necessary qualifications as prescribed in the regulations adopted by the board. (2)  Before any applicant is eligible for an examination or qualification, he or she shall furnish satisfactory proof that he or she: (a)  Is a citizen or permanent resident of the United States; (b)  Has demonstrated proficiency in the English language; (c)  Is at least twenty-one (21) years of age; * * *  (d)  Is of good moral character; ( * * *ed)  Has completed a program of acupuncture and has received a certificate or diploma from an institute approved by the board, according to the provisions of this chapter; ( * * *fe)  Has completed a clinical internship training as approved by the board; and ( * * *gf)  Has received training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR). (3)  The board may hold an examination at least once a year, and all applicants shall be notified in writing of the date and time of all examinations.  The board may use a NCCAOM examination if it deems that national examination to be sufficient to qualify a practitioner for licensure in this state.  In no case shall the state's own examination be less rigorous than the nationally recognized examination. (4)  In addition to the written examination, if the nationally recognized examination does not provide a suitable practical examination comparable to board standards, the board shall examine each applicant in the practical application of Oriental medical diagnostic and treatment techniques in a manner and by methods that reveal the applicant's skill and knowledge. (5)  The board shall require all qualified applicants to be examined in the following subjects: (a)  Anatomy and physiology; (b)  Pathology; (c)  Diagnosis; (d)  Hygiene, sanitation and sterilization techniques; (e)  All major acupuncture principles, practices and techniques; and (f)  Clean Needle Technique Exam. (6)  To assist the board in conducting its licensure investigation, all applicants shall undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety (department) and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose.  Any and all state or national criminal history records information obtained by the board that is not already a matter of public record shall be deemed nonpublic and confidential information restricted to the exclusive use of the board, its members, officers, investigators, agents and attorneys in evaluating the applicant's eligibility or disqualification for licensure, and shall be exempt from the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983.  Except when introduced into evidence in a hearing before the board to determine licensure, no such information or records related thereto shall, except with the written consent of the applicant or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, be released or otherwise disclosed by the board to any other person or agency.  The board shall provide to the department the fingerprints of the applicant, any additional information that may be required by the department, and a form signed by the applicant consenting to the check of the criminal records and to the use of the fingerprints and other identifying information required by the state or national repositories.  The board shall charge and collect from the applicant, in addition to all other applicable fees and costs, such amount as may be incurred by the board in requesting and obtaining state and national criminal history records information on the applicant. (7)  The board shall issue a license to every applicant whose application has been filed with and approved by the board and who has paid the required fees and who either: (a)  Has passed the board's written examination and practical examination, with a score of not less than seventy percent (70%) on each examination; or (b)  Has achieved a passing score on a board approved nationally recognized examination, which examination includes a written and practical portion, as determined by the board; or (c)  Has received certification from a board approved national certification process; or (d)  Has achieved a passing score on a board approved nationally recognized written examination and has passed the board's practical examination with a score of not less than seventy percent (70%). (8)  The board shall keep a record of all examinations held, together with the names and addresses of all persons taking examinations, and the examination results.  Within forty-five (45) days after the examination, the board shall give written notice of the results of the examination to each applicant. SECTION 80.  Section 75-27-305, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-27-305.  (1)  A citizen of the United States or a person who has declared his or her intention of becoming such a citizen, who is a resident of the State of Mississippi, not less than twenty-one (21) years of age, * * * of good moral character, who has the ability to weigh accurately and to make correct weight certificates, and who has received from the commissioner a license as a bonded weighmaster, shall be styled and authorized to act as a bonded weighmaster. (2)  The commissioner may adopt rules and regulations for determining the qualifications of the applicant for license as a bonded weighmaster.  The commissioner may pass upon the qualifications of the applicant upon the basis of the information supplied in the application, may examine such applicant orally or in writing, or both, for the purpose of determining his or her qualifications.  The commissioner shall grant licenses to such applicants as may be found to possess the qualifications required herein.  The commissioner shall keep a record of all such applications and of all licenses issued thereon. SECTION 81.  Section 75-57-49, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-57-49.  (1)  Before any person shall be granted a permit to, or shall engage in or continue in the business of the distributing, either wholesale or retail, installing, altering, extending, changing or repairing of any liquefied compressed gas system, appliance or container, or in the business of distributing and selling liquefied compressed gas, either at wholesale or retail, whether from trucks or other vessels, in cylinders or in any other manner, such person shall satisfy the State Liquefied Compressed Gas Board that he or she is * * * of good character, is competent to transact business so as to safeguard the interest of the public, and is financially responsible; and this provision as to financial responsibility shall be met by such person by filing with the State Liquefied Compressed Gas Board evidence that he or she has in force such of the hereinafter listed insurance policies on standard contract forms and written by an insurance company, or companies, qualified to do business in the State of Mississippi, as the State Liquefied Compressed Gas Board shall require, based upon those activities listed above in which such person is engaged, to wit: ANY PERSON THAT ENGAGES IN FILLING CYLINDERS AND MOTOR FUEL TANKS WITH LIQUEFIED COMPRESSED GAS ON THEIR PREMISES OR ANY PERSON WHO IS IN THE BUSINESS OF INSTALLING LC GAS CARBURETION OR APPLIANCES: Limits of Liability Each Occasion    Aggregate Manufacturers and Contractors Public Liability $100,000    $300,000 Products Liability $100,000    $300,000 Workers' Compensation and Employers' Liability Insurance                         State Statute ANY PERSON THAT ENGAGES IN ANY PHASE OF THE LIQUEFIED COMPRESSED GAS BUSINESS OTHER THAN CYLINDER-FILLING LOCATIONS: Limits of Liability Bodily Injury            Property Each Each        Damage Each Person Accident      Accident Automobile Public Liability $500,000    $1,000,000   $1,000,000 Each Occasion Aggregate Manufacturers and Contractors Public Liability $1,000,000  $1,000,000 Products Liability $1,000,000  $1,000,000 Workers' Compensation and Employers' Liability Insurance State Statute (2)  The State Liquefied Compressed Gas Board shall not require insurance coverage as specified above unless the hazard of liquefied compressed gases is involved. (3)  No policy issued under the provisions of this chapter may be cancelled before thirty (30) days from the date of receipt by the Commissioner of Insurance of written notice of intention to cancel the policy. (4)  It is expressly provided, however, that in lieu of filing with the State Liquefied Compressed Gas Board evidence that such insurance, as outlined above, is in force, any such person may file with the State Liquefied Compressed Gas Board a good and sufficient surety bond executed by a surety company licensed to do business in this state in the amount of One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00), which such bond shall be payable to the State of Mississippi and shall be conditioned to guarantee the payment of all damages which proximately result from any act of negligence on the part of such person, or their agents or employees, while engaged in any of the activities herein specified.  In lieu of the surety bond, any such person may execute and file a good and sufficient personal bond in the amount and conditioned as specified above, which such personal bond shall be secured by bonds or other obligations of the State of Mississippi or the United States government, of equal value. (5)  Upon compliance with the provisions of this section, where such compliance is required, and upon compliance with all other provisions of this chapter, the State Liquefied Compressed Gas Board shall issue to such dealer a permit to engage in such business, but not before.  All such permits shall be valid until voluntarily surrendered, or until suspended, revoked or cancelled by the State Liquefied Compressed Gas Board, the Commissioner of Insurance or the chancery or circuit court.  All permits issued under the provisions of Chapter 170, Laws of 1940, as amended, or Chapter 265, Laws of 1946, shall remain in full force and effect until the expiration date thereof at which time they must be renewed under the terms and conditions of this chapter. SECTION 82.  Section 75-60-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-60-31.  No agent permit shall be issued pursuant to Section 75-60-25 to any person found by the Commission on Proprietary School and College Registration * * * not to be of good moral character to have been convicted of a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. SECTION 83.  Section 75-60-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-60-33.  Any agent permit issued may be revoked by the Commission on Proprietary School and College Registration if the holder of the permit solicits or enrolls students through fraud, deception or misrepresentation * * *, or upon a finding that the permit holder is not of good moral character. The Commission on Proprietary School and College Registration shall hold informal conferences pursuant to Section 75-60-19 with an agent believed to be in violation of one or more of the above conditions.  If these conferences fail to eliminate the agent's objectionable practices or procedures, the commission shall hold a public hearing.  A record of such proceedings shall be taken and appeals to the commission shall be upon such record, except as may be provided by rules and regulations to be adopted by the commission.  Nothing said or done in the informal conferences shall be disclosed by the staff of the commission nor be used as evidence in any subsequent proceedings. SECTION 84.  Section 75-76-67, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-67.  (1)  Any person who the commission determines is qualified to receive a license or be found suitable under the provisions of this chapter, having due consideration for the proper protection of the health, safety, morals, good order and general welfare of the inhabitants of the State of Mississippi and the declared policy of this state, may be issued a state gaming license or found suitable.  The burden of proving his qualification to receive any license or be found suitable is on the applicant. (2)  An application to receive a license or be found suitable shall not be granted unless the commission is satisfied that the applicant is: (a)  A person of * * * good character, honesty and integrity; (b)  A person whose prior activities, criminal record, if any, reputation, habits and associations do not pose a threat to the public interest of this state or to the effective regulation and control of gaming, or create or enhance the dangers of unsuitable, unfair or illegal practices, methods and activities in the conduct of gaming or the carrying on of the business and financial arrangements incidental thereto; and (c)  In all other respects qualified to be licensed or found suitable consistent with the declared laws of the state. (3)  No person shall be granted a license or found suitable under the provisions of this chapter who has been convicted of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act in any court of this state, another state, or the United States; and no person shall be granted a license or found suitable hereunder who has been convicted of a * * * crime disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act in any court of another state or the United States which, if committed in this state, would be a * * * felony disqualifying crime; and no person shall be granted a license or found suitable under the provisions of this chapter who has been convicted of a misdemeanor in any court of this state or of another state, when such conviction was for gambling, sale of alcoholic beverages to minors, prostitution, or procuring or inducing individuals to engage in prostitution. (4)  A license to operate a gaming establishment shall not be granted unless the applicant has satisfied the commission that: (a)  He has adequate business probity, competence and experience, in gaming or generally; and (b)  The proposed financing of the entire operation is: (i)  Adequate for the nature of the proposed operation; and (ii)  From a suitable source.  Any lender or other source of money or credit which the commission finds does not meet the standards set forth in subsection (2) may be deemed unsuitable. (5)  An application to receive a license or be found suitable constitutes a request for a determination of the applicant's general * * * character, integrity and ability to participate or engage in, or be associated with gaming.  Any written or oral statement made in the course of an official proceeding of the commission or the executive director or any witness testifying under oath which is relevant to the purpose of the proceeding is absolutely privileged and does not impose liability for defamation or constitute a ground for recovery in any civil action. (6)  The commission may, in its discretion, grant a license to a corporation which has complied with the provisions of this chapter. (7)  The commission may, in its discretion, grant a license to a limited partnership which has complied with the provisions of this chapter. (8)  No limited partnership, except one whose sole limited partner is a publicly traded corporation which has registered with the commission, or business trust or organization or other association of a quasi-corporate character is eligible to receive or hold any license under this chapter unless all persons having any direct or indirect interest therein of any nature whatsoever, whether financial, administrative, policymaking or supervisory, are individually qualified to be licensed under the provisions of this chapter. (9)  The commission may, by regulation, limit the number of persons who may be financially interested and the nature of their interest in any corporation or other organization or association licensed under this chapter, and may establish such other qualifications of licenses as the commission, in its discretion, deems to be in the public interest and consistent with the declared policy of the state. SECTION 85.  Section 81-18-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 81-18-9.  (1)  Applicants for a license shall apply in a form as prescribed by the commissioner.  Each such form shall contain content as set forth by rule, regulation, instruction or procedure of the commissioner and may be changed or updated as necessary by the commissioner in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter. (2)  The mortgage broker and mortgage lender application through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry shall include, but is not limited to, the following: (a)  The legal name, residence and business address of the applicant and, if applicable, the legal name, residence and business address of every principal and executive officer, together with the résumé of the applicant and of every principal and executive officer of the applicant.  In addition, an independent credit report obtained from a consumer-reporting agency described in Section 603(p) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act and information related to any administrative, civil or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction of every principal and executive officer. (b)  The legal name of the mortgage broker or mortgage lender in addition to the name under which the applicant will conduct business in the state, neither of which may be already assigned to a licensed mortgage broker or mortgage lender. (c)  The complete address of the applicant's principal place of business, branch office(s) and any other locations at which the applicant will engage in any business activity covered by this chapter.  All locations shall be within the United States of America or a territory of the United States of America, including Puerto Rico and the U.S. Virgin Islands. (d)  A copy of the certificate of incorporation, if a Mississippi corporation. (e)  Documentation satisfactory to the department as to a certificate of existence of authority to transact business lawfully in Mississippi from the Mississippi Secretary of State's office, if a limited liability company, partnership, trust or any other group of persons, however organized.  This paragraph does not pertain to applicants organized as an individual or as a sole proprietorship. (f)  If a foreign entity, a copy of a certificate of authority to conduct business in Mississippi and the address of the principal place of business of the foreign entity. (g)  Documentation of a minimum of two (2) years' experience directly related to mortgage activities by a person named as the qualifying individual of the company.  The qualifying individual shall be primarily responsible for the operations of the licensed mortgage broker or mortgage lender.  Only one (1) qualifying individual shall be named for Mississippi and this person shall be the qualifying individual for only one (1) licensee.  Evidence of experience shall include, where applicable: (i)  Copies of business licenses issued by governmental agencies. (ii)  Employment history of the person filing the application for at least two (2) years before the date of the filing of an application, including, but not limited to, job descriptions, length of employment, names, addresses and phone numbers for past employers. (iii)  Any other data and pertinent information as the department may require with respect to the applicant, its directors, principals, trustees, officers, members, contractors or agents.  A resume alone shall not be sufficient proof of employment history. (3)  The mortgage broker and mortgage lender applications shall be filed on the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry together with the following: (a)  The license fee specified in Section 81-18-15; (b)  An original or certified copy of a surety bond in favor of the State of Mississippi for the use, benefit and indemnity of any person who suffers any damage or loss as a result of the company's breach of contract or of any obligation arising therefrom or any violation of law; (c)  A set of fingerprints from any local law enforcement agency from the following applicants: (i)  All persons operating as a sole proprietorship that plan to conduct a mortgage-brokering or lending business in the State of Mississippi; (ii)  Partners in a partnership or principal owners of a limited liability company that own at least ten percent (10%) of the voting shares of the company; (iii)  Any shareholders owning ten percent (10%) or more of the outstanding shares of the corporation; (iv)  All executive officers of the applicant; (v)  All loan originators; and (vi)  The named qualifying individual of the company as required in Section 81-18-9(2)(g).  The applicant shall name only one (1) individual as the qualifying individual for the State of Mississippi; and (d)  At least one (1) individual shall be licensed as a loan originator at a licensed location. (4)  In connection with an application for licensing as a mortgage broker or lender under this chapter, the required stockholders, owners, directors and executive officers of the applicant shall, at a minimum, furnish to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry information concerning the individual's identity, including: (a)  Fingerprints from any local law enforcement agency for submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation and any governmental entity authorized to receive that information for a state, national and/or international criminal history background check; and (b)  Personal history and experience in a form prescribed by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, including the submission of authorization for the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry and the commissioner to obtain: (i)  An independent credit report obtained from a consumer-reporting agency described in Section 603(p) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act; and (ii)  Information related to any administrative, civil or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction. (5)  Upon receipt of an application for licensure, the department or designated third party shall conduct an investigation as it deems necessary to determine that the applicant and its officers, directors and principals are of good * * * character and ethical reputation; that the applicant demonstrates reasonable financial responsibility; and that the applicant has reasonable policies and procedures to receive and process customer grievances and inquiries promptly and fairly. (6)  The commissioner shall not license an applicant unless he is satisfied that the applicant will operate its mortgage activities in compliance with the laws, rules and regulations of this state and the United States. (7)  If an applicant satisfies the requirements of this chapter for a mortgage broker or mortgage lender license, the commissioner shall issue the license unless the commissioner finds any of the following: (a)  The applicant has had a mortgage lender, mortgage broker or mortgage servicer license revoked in any governmental jurisdiction, except that a subsequent formal vacation of the revocation shall not be deemed a revocation; or (b)  The applicant or its controlling persons has been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to, (i) a * * * felony in a domestic, foreign or military court during the seven‑year period preceding the date of application for licensing disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; or (ii) at any time preceding the date of application if such * * * felony crime involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, a breach of trust, or money laundering.  However, any pardon or expungement of a conviction shall not be a conviction for purposes of this subsection. (8)  Applicants for a mortgage loan originator license shall apply in a form as prescribed by the commissioner and shall be filed on the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.  Each such form shall contain content as set forth by rules, regulations, instructions or procedures of the commissioner and may be changed or updated as necessary by the commissioner in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter.  The initial license of a mortgage loan originator shall be accompanied by a fee of Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00), to be paid to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, and any additional fees as required by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry.  The commissioner shall not issue a mortgage loan originator license unless the commissioner makes at a minimum the following findings: (a)  The applicant has never had a mortgage loan originator license revoked in any governmental jurisdiction, except that a later formal vacation of that revocation shall not be deemed a revocation. (b)  The applicant has not been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to, (i) a * * * felony in a domestic, foreign or military court during the seven‑year period preceding the date of application for licensing disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; or (ii) at any time preceding the date of application if such * * * felony crime involved an act of fraud, dishonesty, a breach of trust or money laundering.  However, any pardon or expungement of a conviction shall not be a conviction for purposes of this subsection. (c)  The applicant has demonstrated financial responsibility, character and general fitness such as to command the confidence of the community and to warrant a determination that the mortgage loan originator will operate honestly, fairly and efficiently within the purposes of this chapter. (d)  The applicant has completed the prelicensing education requirement described in Section 81-18-14(1). (e)  The applicant has passed a written test that meets the test requirement described in Section 81-18-14(7). (f)  The applicant has met the surety bond requirement as provided in Section 81-18-11. (g)  This individual must work or be exclusively engaged to perform mortgage loan origination activities for a Mississippi licensed company and work or perform mortgage loan origination activities from the location licensed with the department or a remote location.  If the licensed loan originator resides and works or performs mortgage loan origination activities in Mississippi, then he or she may work or perform mortgage loan origination activities from any licensed location of the licensed company within the State of Mississippi or a remote location.  However, an owner of a minimum of ten percent (10%) of a licensed company or the named qualifying individual on file with the department, who is a licensed loan originator with the department, may work from any licensed location of the licensed company within the State of Mississippi in the capacity of a loan originator as described in this chapter. (9)  In order to fulfill the purposes of this chapter, the commissioner is authorized to establish relationships or contracts with the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry or other entities designated by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry to collect and maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or other persons subject to this chapter. (10)  In connection with an application for licensing as a mortgage loan originator, the applicant shall, at a minimum, furnish to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry information concerning the applicant's identity, including: (a)  Fingerprints for submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and any governmental agency or entity authorized to receive that information for a state, national and/or international criminal history background check; and (b)  Personal history and experience in a form prescribed by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, including the submission of authorization for the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry and the commissioner to obtain: (i)  An independent credit report obtained from a consumer-reporting agency described in Section 603(p) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act; and (ii)  Information related to any administrative, civil or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction. (11)  For the purposes of this section and in order to reduce the points of contact which the Federal Bureau of Investigation may have to maintain for purposes of subsection (10)(a) and (b)(ii) of this section, the commissioner may use the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from and distributing information to the Department of Justice or any governmental agency. (12)  For the purposes of this section and in order to reduce the points of contact which the commissioner may have to maintain for purposes of subsection (10)(b)(i) and (ii) of this section, the commissioner may use the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry as a channeling agent for requesting and distributing information to and from any source so directed by the commissioner. SECTION 86.  Section 83-17-75, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-17-75.  (1)  An insurance producer shall not act as an agent of an insurer unless the insurance producer becomes an appointed agent of that insurer.  An insurance producer who is not acting as an agent of an insurer is not required to become appointed. (2)  To appoint a producer as its agent, the appointing insurer shall file, in a format approved by the commissioner, a notice of appointment within fifteen (15) days from the date the agency contract is executed or the first insurance application is submitted.  An insurer may also elect to appoint a producer to all or some insurers within the insurer's holding company system or group by the filing of a single appointment request. (3)  Upon receipt of the notice of appointment, the commissioner shall verify within a reasonable time not to exceed thirty (30) days that the insurance producer is eligible for appointment.  If the insurance producer is determined to be ineligible for appointment, the commissioner shall notify the insurer within five (5) days of its determination. (4)  An insurer shall pay an appointment fee, in the amount and method of payment set forth in Section 83-5-73 for each insurance producer appointed by the insurer. (5)  An insurer shall remit, in a manner prescribed by the commissioner, a renewal appointment fee in the amount set forth in Section 83-5-73. (6)  Before the issuance of a license or certificate of authority, the commissioner shall require the company requesting appointment of the applicant as producer for the first time to furnish a certificate to the commissioner, verified by an executive officer or managing general or special agent of such company, that the company has duly investigated the * * * character and record of such person and has satisfied itself that such person is * * * of good moral character and is qualified, fit and trustworthy to act as its producer.  The Commissioner of Insurance may at any time require any company to obtain a credit report on a producer if the commissioner deems such request advisable.  Should such credit report reflect information regarding an offense or violation in relation to which the Department of Insurance has taken action, such information shall not render the applicant ineligible for a license if applicant has complied with the order of the commissioner regarding such offense. SECTION 87.  Section 83-39-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-39-9.  The department upon receipt of the license application, the required fee * * *, and proof of good moral character and, in the case of a professional bail agent, an approved qualification bond in the required amount, shall issue to the applicant a license to do business as a professional bail agent, soliciting bail agent or bail enforcement agent as the case may be. No licensed professional bail agent shall have in his employ in the bail bond business any person who could not qualify for a license under this chapter, nor shall any licensed professional bail agent have as a partner or associate in such business any person who could not so qualify. SECTION 88.  Section 73-69-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-69-7.  (1)  The State Fire Marshal shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter and shall have the authority to promulgate and adopt such rules and regulations as may be necessary for such proper administration and enforcement.  The Electronic Protection Advisory Licensing Board created in Section 73-69-21 shall advise the State Fire Marshal with respect to the rules and regulations of the provisions of this chapter.  The State Fire Marshal shall have the authority to approve written training programs or acceptable equivalents for meeting the training requirements of this licensing law.  The State Fire Marshal may also accept, as such an equivalent, licensure of a company or person by a jurisdiction outside this state, which has standards and requirements of practice which substantially conform to the provisions of this chapter.  The State Fire Marshal shall also establish continuing education requirements. (2)  Application for a Class A license.  In order to engage in alarm contracting, a company shall apply for and obtain a Class A license for each operating location doing business in the state.  A Class A license shall authorize a company to engage in any type of alarm contracting.  An applicant for a Class A license shall submit the following to the State Fire Marshal: (a)  Documentation that the company is an entity duly authorized to conduct business within this state. (b)  Documentation that the company holds a general liability and errors and omissions insurance policy, or a surety bond, in an amount not less than Three Hundred Thousand Dollars ($300,000.00). (c)  Documentation that the company carries a current and valid workers' compensation insurance policy as required by state law. (d)  The name of the person who will serve as the designated agent of the company. (e)  For a company applying for a Class A license, evidence that the company has at least one (1) employee who holds a Class B license at each of its operating locations. (f)  A statement that no officer or principal has been convicted of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, has received a first-time offender pardon for a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, or has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a * * * felony charge disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (g)  The application fee authorized by this chapter. (h)  Documentation that the company is located within the physical boundaries of the state. (i)  Beginning on July 1, 2014, in order to assist the Office of the State Fire Marshal in determining an applicant's suitability for a license under this chapter, a Class A applicant, upon request from the State Fire Marshal, shall submit a set of fingerprints for all officers and principals with the submission of an application for license or at such time as deemed necessary by the State Fire Marshal.  The Office of the State Fire Marshal shall forward the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety for the purpose of conducting a criminal history record check.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Department of Public Safety to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check. Fees related to the criminal history record check shall be paid by the applicant to the State Fire Marshal and the monies from such fees shall be deposited in the special fund in the State Treasury designated as the Electronic Protection Licensing Fund. (j)  The name of each company providing monitoring services. (3)  If the action by the State Fire Marshal is to nonrenew or to deny an application for license, the State Fire Marshal shall notify the applicant or licensee and advise, in writing, the applicant or licensee of the reason for the denial or nonrenewal of the applicant's or licensee's license.  The applicant or licensee may make written demand upon the State Fire Marshal within ten (10) days for a hearing before the State Fire Marshal to determine the reasonableness of the State Fire Marshal's action.  The hearing shall be held within thirty (30) days. SECTION 89.  Section 73-69-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-69-11.  (1)  Any person employed by an alarm contracting company shall hold an individual license issued by the State Fire Marshal.  Such license shall authorize its holder to engage in alarm contracting, only to the extent of the terms as further provided in this chapter. (2)  Such application shall be accompanied by: (a)  Two (2) suitable photographs of the applicant acceptable to the State Fire Marshal.  The State Fire Marshal shall keep one (1) photograph on file and shall make the other photograph a part of any license subsequently issued to the applicant. (b)  Documentation that the applicant meets educational requirements applicable to the type of license for which he is applying, as follows: (i)  For a Class B license:  a minimum of Electronic Security Association, Level 2 A and Level 2 B Burglar Alarm training course or the Electronic Security Association, Fire Alarm Installation Methods and Advanced Intrusion Systems training courses, or equivalent training approved by the State Fire Marshal, and documentation proving residency within a radius of one hundred fifty (150) miles of the office to which he is assigned. (ii)  For a Class C license:  a minimum of Electronic Security Association Level 1 Certified Alarm/Security Technician training course, or equivalent training approved by the State Fire Marshal. (iii)  For a Class D license:  a minimum of Electronic Security Association, Understanding Electronic Security Systems training course, or equivalent training approved by the State Fire Marshal. (iv)  For a Class H license:  application by a Class B or Class C license holder that they will provide direct supervision of the Class H licensee. (c)  (i)  A statement by the applicant that he has not been convicted of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, received a first-time offender pardon for a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, or entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a * * * felony charge disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. * * *  A felony that has been dismissed pursuant to the Mississippi Criminal Code or equivalent judicial dismissal shall not apply to this paragraph. (ii)  A conviction or a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a * * * felony charge disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act or receipt of a first-time offender pardon shall not constitute an automatic disqualification as otherwise required pursuant to subparagraph (i) if ten (10) or more years have elapsed between the date of application and the successful completion or service of any sentence, deferred adjudication or period of probation or parole. (iii)  Subparagraph (ii) shall not apply to any person convicted of a felony crime of violence or a sex offense as defined within the Mississippi Criminal Code. (d)  The State Fire Marshal shall have the authority to conduct criminal history verification on a local, state or national level.  Beginning on July 1, 2014, in order to assist the Office of the State Fire Marshal in determining an applicant's suitability for a license under this chapter, an applicant shall submit a set of fingerprints with the submission of an application for license.  The Office of the State Fire Marshal shall forward the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety for the purpose of conducting a criminal history record check. If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Department of Public Safety to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check.  Fees related to the criminal history record check shall be paid by the applicant to the State Fire Marshal and the monies from such fees shall be deposited in the special fund in the State Treasury designated as the Electronic Protection Licensing Fund. (e)  The application fee authorized by this chapter. (3)  The State Fire Marshal shall have the authority to determine if information submitted by an applicant is in a form acceptable to him.  The State Fire Marshal shall verify or have another entity verify information submitted by each applicant. (4)  If the State Fire Marshal finds that an applicant has met the applicable requirements of the alarm licensing law, he shall issue the appropriate type of license to the applicant upon payment of the license fee authorized by this chapter. (5)  Each individual license holder shall maintain his license on his person while engaging in any type of alarm contracting as applicable.  Each such license holder shall present his license for inspection upon demand by an employee of the Office of the State Fire Marshal or a law enforcement officer. (6)  Each individual license holder shall notify the State Fire Marshal, on a form specified and provided by the State Fire Marshal, within ten (10) days of the following: (a)  Any change in business or home address. (b)  Any separation from an employer or change in employer. (c)  Any conviction for a * * * felony or entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a felony charge or receipt of a first‑time offender pardon disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (7)  No individual licensed under this chapter shall contract for his services as an independent contractor or agent without applying for and being issued a Class A license per Section 73-69-9.  No alarm contracting company shall contract for the independent services of a holder of an individual license under this section. (8)  The State Fire Marshal may enter into reciprocal agreements with other states for mutual recognition of individual license holders, if the State Fire Marshal has established the criteria for acceptance of reciprocal agreements by rule or regulation.  The issuance of a license by reciprocity to a military-trained applicant, military spouse or person who establishes residence in this state shall be subject to the provisions of Section 73-50-1 or 73-50-2, as applicable. (9)  If the action by the State Fire Marshal is to nonrenew or to deny an application for license, the State Fire Marshal shall notify the applicant or licensee and advise, in writing, the applicant or licensee of the reason for the denial or nonrenewal of the applicant's or licensee's license.  The applicant or licensee may make written demand upon the State Fire Marshal within ten (10) days for a hearing before the State Fire Marshal to determine the reasonableness of the State Fire Marshal's action.  The hearing shall be held within thirty (30) days. SECTION 90.  Section 75-67-323, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-67-323.  (1)  To be eligible for a pawnbroker license, an applicant shall: (a)  Operate lawfully and fairly within the purposes of this article; (b)  Not have been convicted of a * * * felony in the last ten (10) years disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act or be active as a beneficial owner for someone who has been convicted of a * * * felony in the last ten (10) years disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (c)  File with the commissioner a bond with good security in the penal sum of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), payable to the State of Mississippi for the faithful performance by the licensee of the duties and obligations pertaining to the business so licensed and the prompt payment of any judgment which may be recovered against such licensee on account of damages or other claim arising directly or collaterally from any violation of the provisions of this article; such bond shall not be valid until it is approved by the commissioner; such applicant may file, in lieu thereof, cash, a certificate of deposit, or government bonds in the amount of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00); such deposit shall be filed with the commissioner and is subject to the same terms and conditions as are provided for in the surety bond required herein; any interest or earnings on such deposits are payable to the depositor; (d)  File with the commissioner an application accompanied by the initial license fee required in this article; (e)  Submit a set of fingerprints from any local law enforcement agency.  In order to determine the applicant's suitability for license, the commissioner shall forward the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety; and if no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Department of Public Safety to the FBI for a national criminal history record check. (2)  Every licensee shall post his license in a conspicuous place at each place of business. (3)  Every licensee shall post and display a sign which measures at least twenty (20) inches by twenty (20) inches in a conspicuous place and in easy view of all persons who enter the place of business.  The sign shall display bold, blocked letters, easily readable, with the following information:  "This pawnshop is licensed and regulated by the Mississippi Department of Banking and Consumer Finance.  If you encounter any unresolved problem with a transaction at this location, you are entitled to assistance.  Please call or write:  Mississippi Department of Banking and Consumer Finance, Post Office Drawer 23729, Jackson, MS 39225-3729; Phone 1-800-844-2499." (4)  From and after December 1, 2010, each application for an initial license shall include evidence of the satisfactory completion of at least six (6) hours of approved prelicensing education, and each application for renewal shall include evidence of the satisfactory completion of at least six (6) hours of approved continuing education, by the owners or designated representative in pawnbroker transactions.  Two (2) of the six (6) hours shall consist of instruction on the Mississippi Pawnshop Act and shall be approved by the department once the course is approved by the Mississippi Pawnbrokers Association or the National Pawnbrokers Association. SECTION 91.  Section 75-67-421, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-67-421.  (1)  To be eligible for a title pledge lender license, an applicant shall: (a)  Operate lawfully and fairly within the purposes of this article; (b)  Not have been convicted of a * * * felony in the last ten (10) years disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act or be active as a beneficial owner for someone who has been convicted of a * * * felony in the last ten (10) years disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (c)  File with the commissioner a bond with good security in the penal sum of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) for each location at which the applicant proposes to engage in the business of title pledge lending, but in no event shall the aggregate amount of the bond for all locations per applicant exceed Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) and no more than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) shall be payable or recoverable on the bond for each location; the bond shall be payable to the State of Mississippi for the faithful performance by the licensee of the duties and obligations pertaining to the business so licensed and the prompt payment of any judgment which may be recovered against the licensee on account of damages or other claim arising directly or collaterally from any violation of the provisions of this article; the bond shall not be valid until it is approved by the commissioner; the applicant may file, in lieu thereof, cash, a certificate of deposit or government bonds in the amount of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) for each location at which the applicant proposes to engage in the business of title pledge lending, but in no event shall the aggregate amount of the cash, certificate of deposit or government bonds for all locations per applicant exceed Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) and no more than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) shall be payable or recoverable on the cash, certificate of deposit or government bonds for each location; the deposit of the cash, certificate of deposit or government bonds shall be filed with the commissioner and is subject to the same terms and conditions as are provided for in the surety bond required herein; any interest or earnings on such deposits are payable to the depositor * * *.; (d)  File with the commissioner an application accompanied by a set of fingerprints from any local law enforcement agency, and the initial license fee required in this article. In order to determine the applicant's suitability for license, the commissioner shall forward the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety; and if no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Department of Public Safety to the FBI for a national criminal history record check. (2)  Upon the filing of an application in a form prescribed by the commissioner, accompanied by the fee and documents required in this article, the department shall investigate to ascertain whether the qualifications prescribed by this article have been satisfied.  If the commissioner finds that the qualifications have been satisfied and, if he approves the documents so filed by the applicant, he shall issue to the applicant a license to engage in the business of title pledge lending in this state. (3)  Complete and file with the commissioner an annual renewal application accompanied by the renewal fee required in this article. (4)  The license shall be kept conspicuously posted in the place of business of the licensee. SECTION 92.  Section 75-67-509, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-67-509.  To be eligible for a check casher license, an applicant shall: (a)  Operate lawfully and fairly within the purposes of this article. (b)  Not have been convicted of a * * * felony in the last ten (10) years disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act or be active as a beneficial owner for someone who has been convicted of a * * * felony in the last ten (10) years disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (c)  File with the commissioner a bond with good security in the penal sum of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), payable to the State of Mississippi for the faithful performance by the licensee of the duties and obligations pertaining to the business so licensed and the prompt payment of any judgment which may be recovered against the licensee on account of charges or other claims arising directly or collectively from any violation of the provisions of this article.  The bond shall not be valid until it is approved by the commissioner.  The applicant may file, in lieu of the bond, cash, a certificate of deposit or government bonds in the amount of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00).  Those deposits shall be filed with the commissioner and are subject to the same terms and conditions as are provided for in the surety bond required in this paragraph.  Any interest or earnings on those deposits are payable to the depositor. (d)  File with the commissioner an application for a license and the initial license fee required in this article.  If applicant's application is approved, a check casher license will be issued within thirty (30) days. (e)  Submit a set of fingerprints from any local law enforcement agency.  In order to determine the applicant's suitability for license, the commissioner shall forward the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety; and if no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Department of Public Safety to the FBI for a national criminal history record check. (f)  Complete and file with the commissioner an annual renewal application for a license accompanied by the renewal fee required in this article. SECTION 93.  Section 75-67-609, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-67-609.  To be eligible for a credit availability license, an applicant shall: (a)  Operate lawfully and fairly within the purposes of this article. (b)  Not have been convicted in the last ten (10) years or be active as a beneficial owner for someone who has been convicted in the last ten (10) years of a disqualifying crime * * * that the commissioner finds directly relates to the duties and responsibilities of the business of offering credit availability transactions as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (c)  File with the commissioner a bond with good security in the penal sum of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), payable to the State of Mississippi, for the faithful performance by the licensee of the duties and obligations pertaining to the business so licensed and the prompt payment of any judgment which may be recovered against the licensee on account of charges or other claims arising directly or collectively from any violation of the provisions of this article.  The bond shall not be valid until the commissioner approves it.  The applicant may file, in lieu of the bond, cash, a certificate of deposit or government bonds in the amount of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00).  Those deposits shall be filed with the commissioner and are subject to the same terms and conditions as are provided for in the surety bond required in this paragraph.  Any interest or earnings on those deposits are payable to the depositor.  Applicants applying for multiple licenses may submit a single bond for all licenses, provided that the total value of the bond is equal to Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per license applied for. (d)  File with the commissioner an application for a license and the initial license fee required in this article.  If applicant's application is approved, a credit availability license will be issued within thirty (30) days. (e)  File with the commissioner a set of fingerprints from any local law enforcement agency for each owner of a sole proprietorship, partners in a partnership or principal owners of a limited liability company that own at least ten percent (10%) of the voting shares of the company, shareholders owning ten percent (10%) or more of the outstanding shares of the corporation, except * * * publically publicly traded corporations and their subsidiaries, and any other executive officer with significant oversight duties of the business.  In order to determine the applicant's suitability for license, the commissioner shall forward the fingerprints to the Department of Public Safety; and if no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the Department of Public Safety shall forward the fingerprints to the FBI for a national criminal history record check. (f)  Complete and file with the commissioner an annual renewal application for a license accompanied by the renewal fee required in this article. SECTION 94.  Section 27-115-55, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-115-55.  (1)  The Legislature hereby recognizes that to conduct a successful lottery, the corporation must develop and maintain a statewide network of lottery retailers that will serve the public convenience and promote the sale of tickets, while ensuring the integrity of the lottery operations, games and activities. (2)  To govern the selection of lottery retailers, the board shall, by administrative rules and regulations, develop a list of objective criteria upon which the selection of lottery retailers shall be based.  In developing these criteria, the board shall consider such factors as the applicant's financial responsibility, location and security of the applicant's place of business or activity, integrity, and reputation; however, the board shall not consider political affiliation, activities or monetary contributions to political organizations or candidates for any public office.  The criteria shall include, but not be limited to, the following: (a)  The applicant shall be current in payment of all taxes, interest and penalties owed to any taxing political subdivision where the lottery retailer will sell lottery tickets. (b)  The applicant shall be current in filing all applicable tax returns and in payment of all taxes, interest and penalties owed to the State of Mississippi, excluding items under formal appeal pursuant to applicable statutes, before a license is issued and before each renewal. (c)  No person shall be selected as a lottery retailer for the sale of lottery tickets who: (i)  Has been convicted of a criminal offense related to the security or integrity of the lottery in this or any other jurisdiction. (ii)  Has been convicted of any illegal gambling activity, false statements, false swearing or perjury in this or any other jurisdiction, or convicted of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (iii)  Has been found to have violated the provisions of this chapter or any administrative rules and regulations adopted under this chapter, unless either ten (10) years have passed since the violation, or the president and the board find the violation both minor and unintentional in nature. (iv)  Is a vendor or an employee or agent of any vendor doing business with the corporation. (v)  Resides in the same household as an officer or board member of the corporation. (vi)  Has made a statement of material fact to the corporation, knowing such statement to be false. SECTION 95.  Section 37-13-89, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-13-89.  (1)  In each school district within the state, there shall be employed the number of school attendance officers determined by the Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement to be necessary to adequately enforce the provisions of the Mississippi Compulsory School Attendance Law; however, this number shall not exceed one hundred fifty-three (153) school attendance officers at any time. From and after July 1, 1998, all school attendance officers employed pursuant to this section shall be employees of the State Department of Education.  The State Department of Education shall employ all persons employed as school attendance officers by district attorneys before July 1, 1998, and shall assign them to school attendance responsibilities in the school district in which they were employed before July 1, 1998.  The first twelve (12) months of employment for each school attendance officer shall be the probationary period of state service. (2)  (a)  The State Department of Education shall obtain current criminal records background checks and current child abuse registry checks on all persons applying for the position of school attendance officer after July 2, 2002.  The criminal records information and registry checks must be kept on file for any new hires.  In order to determine an applicant's suitability for employment as a school attendance officer, the applicant must be fingerprinted.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the Department of Public Safety shall forward the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) for a national criminal history record check.  The applicant shall pay the fee, not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00), for the fingerprinting and criminal records background check; however, the State Department of Education, in its discretion, may pay the fee for the fingerprinting and criminal records background check on behalf of any applicant.  Under no circumstances may a member of the State Board of Education, employee of the State Department of Education or any person other than the subject of the criminal records background check disseminate information received through any such checks except insofar as required to fulfill the purposes of this subsection. (b)  If the fingerprinting or criminal records check discloses a * * * felony conviction, guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere to a felony of possession or sale of drugs, murder, manslaughter, armed robbery, rape, sexual battery, sex offense listed in Section 45‑33‑23(h), child abuse, arson, grand larceny, burglary, gratification of lust or aggravated assault which has not been reversed on appeal or for which a pardon has not been granted disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, the applicant is not eligible to be employed as a school attendance officer.  Any employment of an applicant pending the results of the fingerprinting and criminal records check is voidable if the new hire receives a disqualifying criminal records check.  However, the State Board of Education, in its discretion, may allow an applicant aggrieved by an employment decision under this subsection to appear before the board, or before a hearing officer designated for that purpose, to show mitigating circumstances that may exist and allow the new hire to be employed as a school attendance officer.  The State Board of Education may grant waivers for mitigating circumstances, which may include, but are not necessarily limited to:  (i) age at which the crime was committed; (ii) circumstances surrounding the crime; (iii) length of time since the conviction and criminal history since the conviction; (iv) work history; (v) current employment and character references; and (vi) other evidence demonstrating the ability of the person to perform the responsibilities of a school attendance officer competently and that the person does not pose a threat to the health or safety of children. (c)  A member of the State Board of Education or employee of the State Department of Education may not be held liable in any employment discrimination suit in which an allegation of discrimination is made regarding an employment decision authorized under this section. (3)  Each school attendance officer shall possess a college degree with a major in a behavioral science or a related field or shall have no less than three (3) years combined actual experience as a school teacher, school administrator, law enforcement officer possessing such degree, and/or social worker; however, these requirements shall not apply to persons employed as school attendance officers before January 1, 1987.  School attendance officers also shall satisfy any additional requirements that may be established by the State Personnel Board for the position of school attendance officer. (4)  It shall be the duty of each school attendance officer to: (a)  Cooperate with any public agency to locate and identify all compulsory-school-age children who are not attending school; (b)  Cooperate with all courts of competent jurisdiction; (c)  Investigate all cases of nonattendance and unlawful absences by compulsory-school-age children not enrolled in a nonpublic school; (d)  Provide appropriate counseling to encourage all school-age children to attend school until they have completed high school; (e)  Attempt to secure the provision of social or welfare services that may be required to enable any child to attend school; (f)  Contact the home or place of residence of a compulsory-school-age child and any other place in which the officer is likely to find any compulsory-school-age child when the child is absent from school during school hours without a valid written excuse from school officials, and when the child is found, the officer shall notify the parents and school officials as to where the child was physically located; (g)  Contact promptly the home of each compulsory-school-age child in the school district within the officer's jurisdiction who is not enrolled in school or is not in attendance at public school and is without a valid written excuse from school officials; if no valid reason is found for the nonenrollment or absence from the school, the school attendance officer shall give written notice to the parent, guardian or custodian of the requirement for the child's enrollment or attendance; (h)  Collect and maintain information concerning absenteeism, dropouts and other attendance-related problems, as may be required by law or the Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement; and (i)  Perform all other duties relating to compulsory school attendance established by the State Department of Education or district school attendance supervisor, or both. (5)  While engaged in the performance of his duties, each school attendance officer shall carry on his person a badge identifying him as a school attendance officer under the Office of Compulsory School Attendance Enforcement of the State Department of Education and an identification card designed by the State Superintendent of Public Education and issued by the school attendance officer supervisor. Neither the badge nor the identification card shall bear the name of any elected public official. (6)  The State Personnel Board shall develop a salary scale for school attendance officers as part of the variable compensation plan.  The various pay ranges of the salary scale shall be based upon factors including, but not limited to, education, professional certification and licensure, and number of years of experience.  School attendance officers shall be paid in accordance with this salary scale.  The minimum salaries under the scale shall be no less than the following: (a)  For school attendance officers holding a bachelor's degree or any other attendance officer who does not hold such a degree, the annual salary shall be based on years of experience as a school attendance officer or related field of service or employment, no less than as follows: Years of Experience Salary 0 - 4 years             $24,528.29 5 - 8 years 26,485.29 9 - 12 years 28,050.89 13 - 16 years 29,616.49 Over 17 years 31,182.09 (b)  For school attendance officers holding a license as a social worker, the annual salary shall be based on years of experience as a school attendance officer or related field of service or employment, no less than as follows: Years of Experience Salary 0 - 4 years             $25,558.29 5 - 8 years 27,927.29 9 - 12 years 29,822.49 13 - 16 years 31,717.69 17 - 20 years 33,612.89 Over 21 years 35,415.39 (c)  For school attendance officers holding a master's degree in a behavioral science or a related field, the annual salary shall be based on years of experience as a school attendance officer or related field of service or employment, no less than as follows: Years of Experience Salary 0 - 4 years             $26,382.29 5 - 8 years 29,008.79 9 - 12 years 31,109.99 13 - 16 years 33,211.19 17 - 20 years 35,312.39 Over 21 years 37,413.59 (7)  (a)  Each school attendance officer employed by a district attorney on June 30, 1998, who became an employee of the State Department of Education on July 1, 1998, shall be awarded credit for personal leave and major medical leave for his continuous service as a school attendance officer under the district attorney, and if applicable, the youth or family court or a state agency.  The credit for personal leave shall be in an amount equal to one-third (1/3) of the maximum personal leave the school attendance officer could have accumulated had he been credited with such leave under Section 25-3-93 during his employment with the district attorney, and if applicable, the youth or family court or a state agency.  The credit for major medical leave shall be in an amount equal to one-half (1/2) of the maximum major medical leave the school attendance officer could have accumulated had he been credited with such leave under Section 25-3-95 during his employment with the district attorney, and if applicable, the youth or family court or a state agency. However, if a district attorney who employed a school attendance officer on June 30, 1998, certifies, in writing, to the State Department of Education that the school attendance officer had accumulated, pursuant to a personal leave policy or major medical leave policy lawfully adopted by the district attorney, a number of days of unused personal leave or major medical leave, or both, which is greater than the number of days to which the school attendance officer is entitled under this paragraph, the State Department of Education shall authorize the school attendance officer to retain the actual unused personal leave or major medical leave, or both, certified by the district attorney, subject to the maximum amount of personal leave and major medical leave the school attendance officer could have accumulated had he been credited with such leave under Sections 25-3-93 and 25-3-95. (b)  For the purpose of determining the accrual rate for personal leave under Section 25-3-93 and major medical leave under Section 25-3-95, the State Department of Education shall give consideration to all continuous service rendered by a school attendance officer before July 1, 1998, in addition to the service rendered by the school attendance officer as an employee of the department. (c)  In order for a school attendance officer to be awarded credit for personal leave and major medical leave or to retain the actual unused personal leave and major medical leave accumulated by him before July 1, 1998, the district attorney who employed the school attendance officer must certify, in writing, to the State Department of Education the hire date of the school attendance officer.  For each school attendance officer employed by the youth or family court or a state agency before being designated an employee of the district attorney who has not had a break in continuous service, the hire date shall be the date that the school attendance officer was hired by the youth or family court or state agency.  The department shall prescribe the date by which the certification must be received by the department and shall provide written notice to all district attorneys of the certification requirement and the date by which the certification must be received. (8)  (a)  School attendance officers shall maintain regular office hours on a year-round basis; however, during the school term, on those days that teachers in all of the school districts served by a school attendance officer are not required to report to work, the school attendance officer also shall not be required to report to work.  (For purposes of this subsection, a school district's school term is that period of time identified as the school term in contracts entered into by the district with licensed personnel.)  A school attendance officer shall be required to report to work on any day recognized as an official state holiday if teachers in any school district served by that school attendance officer are required to report to work on that day, regardless of the school attendance officer's status as an employee of the State Department of Education, and compensatory leave may not be awarded to the school attendance officer for working during that day.  However, a school attendance officer may be allowed by the school attendance officer's supervisor to use earned leave on such days. (b)  The State Department of Education annually shall designate a period of six (6) consecutive weeks in the summer between school years during which school attendance officers shall not be required to report to work.  A school attendance officer who elects to work at any time during that period may not be awarded compensatory leave for such work and may not opt to be absent from work at any time other than during the six (6) weeks designated by the department unless the school attendance officer uses personal leave or major medical leave accrued under Section 25-3-93 or 25-3-95 for such absence. (9)  The State Department of Education shall provide all continuing education and training courses that school attendance officers are required to complete under state law or rules and regulations of the department. SECTION 96.  Section 37-9-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-9-17.  (1)  On or before April 1 of each year, the principal of each school shall recommend to the superintendent of the local school district the licensed employees or noninstructional employees to be employed for the school involved except those licensed employees or noninstructional employees who have been previously employed and who have a contract valid for the ensuing scholastic year.  If such recommendations meet with the approval of the superintendent, the superintendent shall recommend the employment of such licensed employees or noninstructional employees to the local school board, and, unless good reason to the contrary exists, the board shall elect the employees so recommended. If, for any reason, the local school board shall decline to elect any employee so recommended, additional recommendations for the places to be filled shall be made by the principal to the superintendent and then by the superintendent to the local school board as provided above.  The school board of any local school district shall be authorized to designate a personnel supervisor or another principal employed by the school district to recommend to the superintendent licensed employees or noninstructional employees; however, this authorization shall be restricted to no more than two (2) positions for each employment period for each school in the local school district.  Any noninstructional employee employed upon the recommendation of a personnel supervisor or another principal employed by the local school district must have been employed by the local school district at the time the superintendent was elected or appointed to office; a noninstructional employee employed under this authorization may not be paid compensation in excess of the statewide average compensation for such noninstructional position with comparable experience, as established by the State Department of Education.  The school board of any local school district shall be authorized to designate a personnel supervisor or another principal employed by the school district to accept the recommendations of principals or their designees for licensed employees or noninstructional employees and to transmit approved recommendations to the local school board; however, this authorization shall be restricted to no more than two (2) positions for each employment period for each school in the local school district. When the licensed employees have been elected as provided in the preceding paragraph, the superintendent of the district shall enter into a contract with such persons in the manner provided in this chapter. If, at the commencement of the scholastic year, any licensed employee shall present to the superintendent a license of a higher grade than that specified in such individual's contract, such individual may, if funds are available from the total funding formula funds of the district as provided for in Sections 37-151-200 through 37-151-215, or from district funds, be paid from such funds the amount to which such higher grade license would have entitled the individual, had the license been held at the time the contract was executed. (2) Superintendents/directors of schools under the purview of the State Board of Education, the superintendent of the local school district and any private firm under contract with the local public school district to provide substitute teachers to teach during the absence of a regularly employed schoolteacher shall require, through the appropriate governmental authority, that current criminal records background checks and current child abuse registry checks are obtained, and that such criminal record information and registry checks are on file for any new hires applying for employment as a licensed or nonlicensed employee at a school and not previously employed in such school under the purview of the State Board of Education or at such local school district prior to July 1, 2000.  In order to determine the applicant's suitability for employment, the applicant shall be fingerprinted.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Department of Public Safety to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check.  The fee for such fingerprinting and criminal history record check shall be paid by the applicant, not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00); however, the State Board of Education, the school board of the local school district or a private firm under contract with a local school district to provide substitute teachers to teach during the temporary absence of the regularly employed schoolteacher, in its discretion, may elect to pay the fee for the fingerprinting and criminal history record check on behalf of any applicant.  Under no circumstances shall a member of the State Board of Education, superintendent/director of schools under the purview of the State Board of Education, local school district superintendent, local school board member or any individual other than the subject of the criminal history record checks disseminate information received through any such checks except insofar as required to fulfill the purposes of this section.  Any nonpublic school which is accredited or approved by the State Board of Education may avail itself of the procedures provided for herein and shall be responsible for the same fee charged in the case of local public schools of this state.  The determination whether the applicant has a disqualifying crime, as set forth in subsection (3) of this section, shall be made by the appropriate governmental authority, and the appropriate governmental authority shall notify the private firm whether a disqualifying crime exists. (3)  If such fingerprinting or criminal record checks disclose a * * * felony conviction, guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere to a felony of possession or sale of drugs, murder, manslaughter, armed robbery, rape, sexual battery, sex offense listed in Section 45‑33‑23(h), child abuse, arson, grand larceny, burglary, gratification of lust or aggravated assault which has not been reversed on appeal or for which a pardon has not been granted disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, the new hire shall not be eligible to be employed at such school.  Any employment contract for a new hire executed by the superintendent of the local school district or any employment of a new hire by a superintendent/director of a new school under the purview of the State Board of Education or by a private firm shall be voidable if the new hire receives a disqualifying criminal record check.  However, the State Board of Education or the school board may, in its discretion, allow any applicant aggrieved by the employment decision under this section to appear before the respective board, or before a hearing officer designated for such purpose, to show mitigating circumstances which may exist and allow the new hire to be employed at the school.  The State Board of Education or local school board may grant waivers for such mitigating circumstances, which shall include, but not be limited to:  (a) age at which the crime was committed; (b) circumstances surrounding the crime; (c) length of time since the conviction and criminal history since the conviction; (d) work history; (e) current employment and character references; (f) other evidence demonstrating the ability of the person to perform the employment responsibilities competently and that the person does not pose a threat to the health or safety of the children at the school. (4)  No local school district, local school district employee, member of the State Board of Education or employee of a school under the purview of the State Board of Education shall be held liable in any employment discrimination suit in which an allegation of discrimination is made regarding an employment decision authorized under this Section 37-9-17. (5)  The provisions of this section shall be fully applicable to licensed employees of the Mississippi School of the Arts (MSA), established in Section 37-140-3. SECTION 97.  Section 37-29-232, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-29-232.  (1)  For the purposes of this section: (a)  "Health care professional/vocational technical academic program" means an academic program in medicine, nursing, dentistry, occupational therapy, physical therapy, social services, nutrition services, speech therapy, or other allied-health professional whose purpose is to prepare professionals to render patient care services. (b)  "Health care professional/vocational technical student" means a student enrolled in a health care professional/vocational technical academic program. (2)  The dean or director of the health care professional/vocational technical academic program is authorized to ensure that criminal history record checks and fingerprinting are obtained on their students before the students begin any clinical rotation in a licensed health care entity and that the criminal history record check information and registry checks are on file at the academic institution.  In order to determine the student's suitability for the clinical rotation, the student shall be fingerprinted.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded by the Department of Public Safety, the Department of Health, or any other legally authorized entity to the FBI for a national criminal history record check.  The fee for the fingerprinting and criminal history record check shall be paid by the applicant, not to exceed Fifty Dollars ($50.00); however, the academic institution in which the student is enrolled, in its discretion, may elect to pay the fee for the fingerprinting and criminal history record check on behalf of any applicant.  Under no circumstances shall the academic institution representative or any individual other than the subject of the criminal history record checks disseminate information received through any such checks except insofar as required to fulfill the purposes of this section. (3)  If the fingerprinting or criminal history record checks disclose a * * * felony conviction, guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere to a felony of possession or sale of drugs, murder, manslaughter, armed robbery, rape, sexual battery, sex offense listed in Section 45‑33‑23(h), child abuse, arson, grand larceny, burglary, gratification of lust or aggravated assault, or felonious abuse and/or battery of a vulnerable adult that has not been reversed on appeal or for which a pardon has not been granted disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, the student shall not be eligible to be admitted to the health care professional/vocational technical academic program of study.  Any preadmission agreement executed by the health care professional/vocational technical academic program shall be voidable if the student receives a disqualifying criminal history record check.  However, the administration of the health care professional/vocational technical academic program may, in its discretion, allow any applicant aggrieved by the admissions decision under this section to appear before an appeals committee or before a hearing officer designated for that purpose, to show mitigating circumstances that may exist and allow the student to be admitted to or continue in the program of study.  The health care professional/vocational technical academic program may grant waivers for those mitigating circumstances, which shall include, but not be limited to:  (a) age at which the crime was committed; (b) circumstances surrounding the crime; (c) length of time since the conviction and criminal history since the conviction; (d) work history; (e) current employment and character references; (f) other evidence demonstrating the ability of the student to perform the clinical responsibilities competently and that the student does not pose a threat to the health or safety of patients in the licensed health care entities in which they will be conducting clinical experiences.  The health care professional/vocational technical academic program shall provide assurance to the licensed health care entity in which the clinical rotation is planned that the results of a health care professional/vocational technical student's criminal history record check would not prohibit the student from being able to conduct his or her clinical activities in the facility, institution, or organization.  The criminal history record check shall be valid for the course of academic study, provided that annual disclosure statements are provided to the health care professional/vocational technical academic program regarding any criminal activity that may have occurred during the student's tenure with the health care professional/vocational technical academic program.  The criminal history record check may be repeated at the discretion of the health care professional/vocational technical academic program based on information obtained during the annual disclosure statements.  In extenuating circumstances, if a criminal history record check is initiated and the results are not available at the time the clinical rotation begins, the academic institution in which the student is enrolled, at its discretion, may require a signed affidavit from the student assuring compliance with this section.  The affidavit will be considered void within sixty (60) days of its signature. (4)  Criminal history record checks that are done as part of the requirements for participation in the health care professional/vocational technical academic program may not be used for any other purpose than those activities associated with their program of study.  Students who may be employed as health care professionals outside of their program of study may be required to obtain additional criminal history record checks as part of their employment agreement. (5)  No health care professional/vocational technical academic program or academic program employee shall be held liable in any admissions discrimination suit in which an allegation of discrimination is made regarding an admissions decision authorized under this section. SECTION 98.  Section 73-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-3-41.  Every person who has been or shall hereafter be convicted of * * * felony a disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act in a court of this or any other state or a court of the United States, manslaughter or a violation of the Internal Revenue Code excepted, shall be incapable of obtaining a license to practice law.  Any court of the State of Mississippi in which a licensed attorney shall have been convicted of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act, other than manslaughter or a violation of the Internal Revenue Code, shall enter an order disbarring the attorney. SECTION 99.  Section 73-4-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-4-25.  (1)  The commission may refuse to issue or renew a license, place a licensee on probation or administrative supervision, suspend or revoke any license, or may reprimand or take any other action in relation to a license, including the imposition of a fine not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for each violation upon a licensee, or applicant for licensure, under this chapter for any of the following reasons: (a)  Knowingly filing or causing to be filed a false application. (b)  Failure to enter into a written contract with a seller or consignor prior to placing or permitting advertising for an auction sale to be placed. (c)  Failure by the licensee to give the seller or consignor a signed receipt for items received for sale at auction, either by item or lot number at the time the goods are received, unless the goods are to remain in the possession of the seller or consignor. (d)  Failure to give the seller or consignor a statement or lot description, selling price, purchaser's identity and the net proceeds due to the seller or consignor. (e)  Failure to place funds received from an auction sale in an escrow or trust account, and failure to make timely settlement on escrowed funds.  Absent a written agreement to the contrary, five (5) business days shall be deemed timely for settlement on personal property. (f)  Permitting an unlicensed auctioneer to call for bids in an auction sale. (g)  Having been convicted of or pled guilty to a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act in the courts of this state or any other state, territory or country.  Conviction, as used in this paragraph, shall include a deferred conviction, deferred prosecution, deferred sentence, finding or verdict of guilt, an admission of guilt or a plea of nolo contendere. (h)  Any course of intentional, willful or wanton conduct by a licensee or such licensee's employees which misleads or creates a false impression among the seller, buyer, bidders and the auctioneer in the advertising, conducting and closing of an auction sale. (i)  A continued and flagrant course of misrepresentation or making false promises, either by the licensee, an employee of the licensee, or by someone acting on behalf of and with the licensee's consent. (j)  Any failure to account for or to pay over within a reasonable time funds belonging to another which have come into the licensee's possession through an auction sale. (k)  Any false, misleading or untruthful advertising. (l)  Any act of conduct in connection with a sales transaction which demonstrates bad faith or dishonesty. (m)  Knowingly using false bidders, cappers or pullers, or knowingly making a material false statement or representation. (n)  Commingling the funds or property of a client with the licensee's own or failing to maintain and deposit in a trust or escrow account in an insured bank or savings and loan association located in Mississippi funds received for another person through sale at auction. (o)  Failure to give full cooperation to the commission and/or its designees, agents or other representatives in the performance of official duties of the commission.  Such failure to cooperate includes, but is not limited to: (i)  Failure to properly make any disclosures or to provide documents or information required by this chapter or by the commission; (ii)  Not furnishing, in writing, a full and complete explanation covering the matter contained in a complaint filed with the commission; (iii)  Failure, without good cause, to cooperate with any request by the board to appear before it; (iv)  Not providing access, as directed by the commission, for its authorized agents or representatives seeking to perform reviews, audits or inspections at facilities or places utilized by the license holder in the auction business; (v)  Failure to provide information within the specified time allotted and as required by the board and/or its representatives or designees; (vi)  Failure to cooperate with the board or its designees or representatives in the investigation of any alleged misconduct or willfully interfering with a board investigation. (p)  A demonstrated lack of financial responsibility. (q)  Having had a license for the practice of auctioneering or the auction business suspended or revoked in any jurisdiction, having voluntarily surrendered a license in any jurisdiction, having been placed on probation in any jurisdiction, having been placed under disciplinary order(s) or other restriction in any manner for auctioneering or the auction business (a certified copy of the order of suspension, revocation, probation or disciplinary action shall be prima facie evidence of such action). (r)  Any violation of this chapter or any violation of a rule or regulation duly adopted by the commission. (2)  In addition to the acts specified in subsection (1) of this section, the commission shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 100.  Section 73-6-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-6-19.  (1)  The board shall refuse to grant a certificate of licensure to any applicant or may cancel, revoke or suspend the certificate upon the finding of any of the following facts regarding the applicant or licensed practitioner: (a)  Failure to comply with the rules and regulations adopted by the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners; (b)  Violation of any of the provisions of this chapter or any of the rules and regulations of the State Board of Health pursuant to this chapter with regard to the operation and use of x-rays; (c)  Fraud or deceit in obtaining a license; (d)  Addiction to the use of alcohol, narcotic drugs, or anything which would seriously interfere with the competent performance of his professional duties; (e)  Conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction of a * * * felony, other than manslaughter or any violation of the United States Internal Revenue Code disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (f)  Unprofessional and unethical conduct; (g)  Contraction of a contagious disease which may be carried for a prolonged period; (h)  Failure to report to the Mississippi Department of Human Services or the county attorney any case wherein there are reasonable grounds to believe that a child or vulnerable adult has been abused by its parent or person responsible for such person's welfare; (i)  Advising a patient to use drugs, prescribing or providing drugs for a patient, or advising a patient not to use a drug prescribed by a licensed physician or dentist; (j)  Professional incompetency in the practice of chiropractic; (k)  Having disciplinary action taken by his peers within any professional chiropractic association or society; (l)  Offering to accept or accepting payment for services rendered by assignment from any third-party payor after offering to accept or accepting whatever the third-party payor covers as payment in full, if the effect of the offering or acceptance is to eliminate or give the impression of eliminating the need for payment by an insured of any required deductions applicable in the policy of the insured; (m)  Associating his practice with any chiropractor who does not hold a valid chiropractic license in Mississippi, or teach chiropractic manipulation to nonqualified persons under Section 73-6-13; (n)  Failure to make payment on chiropractic student loans; (o)  Failure to follow record-keeping requirements prescribed in Section 73-6-18; (p)  If the practitioner is certified to provide animal chiropractic treatment, failure to follow guidelines approved by the Mississippi Board of Veterinary Medicine; or (q)  Violation(s) of the provisions of Sections 41-121-1 through 41-121-9 relating to deceptive advertisement by health care practitioners. (2)  Any holder of such certificate or any applicant therefor against whom is preferred any of the designated charges shall be furnished a copy of the complaint and shall receive a formal hearing in Jackson, Mississippi, before the board, at which time he may be represented by counsel and examine witnesses.  The board is authorized to administer oaths as may be necessary for the proper conduct of any such hearing.  In addition, the board is authorized and empowered to issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and papers.  The process issued by the board shall extend to all parts of the state.  Where in any proceeding before the board any witness shall fail or refuse to attend upon subpoena issued by the board, shall refuse to testify, or shall refuse to produce any books and papers, the production of which is called for by the subpoena, the attendance of such witness and the giving of his testimony and the production of the books and papers shall be enforced by any court of competent jurisdiction of this state in the manner provided for the enforcement of attendance and testimony of witnesses in civil cases in the courts of this state. (3)  In addition to any other investigators the board employs, the board shall appoint one or more licensed chiropractors to act for the board in investigating the conduct relating to the competency of a chiropractor, whenever disciplinary action is being considered for professional incompetence and unprofessional conduct. (4)  Whenever the board finds any person unqualified to practice chiropractic because of any of the grounds set forth in subsection (1) of this section, after a hearing has been conducted as prescribed by this section, the board may enter an order imposing one or more of the following: (a)  Deny his application for a license or other authorization to practice chiropractic; (b)  Administer a public or private reprimand; (c)  Suspend, limit or restrict his license or other authorization to practice chiropractic for up to five (5) years; (d)  Revoke or cancel his license or other authorization to practice chiropractic; (e)  Require him to submit to care, counseling or treatment by physicians or chiropractors designated by the board, as a condition for initial, continued or renewal of licensure or other authorization to practice chiropractic; (f)  Require him to participate in a program of education prescribed by the board; or (g)  Require him to practice under the direction of a chiropractor designated by the board for a specified period of time. (5)  Any person whose application for a license or whose license to practice chiropractic has been cancelled, revoked or suspended by the board within thirty (30) days from the date of such final decision shall have the right of a de novo appeal to the circuit court of his county of residence or the Circuit Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi.  If there is an appeal, such appeal may, in the discretion of and on motion to the circuit court, act as a supersedeas.  The circuit court shall dispose of the appeal and enter its decision promptly. The hearing on the appeal may, in the discretion of the circuit judge, be tried in vacation.  Either party shall have the right of appeal to the Supreme Court as provided by law from any decision of the circuit court. (6)  In a proceeding conducted under this section by the board for the revocation, suspension or cancellation of a license to practice chiropractic, after a hearing has been conducted as prescribed by this section, the board shall have the power and authority for the grounds stated in subsection (1) of this section, with the exception of paragraph (c) thereof, to assess and levy upon any person licensed to practice chiropractic in the state a monetary penalty in lieu of such revocation, suspension or cancellation, as follows: (a)  For the first violation, a monetary penalty of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each violation. (b)  For the second and each subsequent violation, a monetary penalty of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) for each violation. The power and authority of the board to assess and levy such monetary penalties under this section shall not be affected or diminished by any other proceeding, civil or criminal, concerning the same violation or violations.  A licensee shall have the right of appeal from the assessment and levy of a monetary penalty as provided in this section to the circuit court under the same conditions as a right of appeal is provided for in this section for appeals from an adverse ruling, or order, or decision of the board.  Any monetary penalty assessed and levied under this section shall not take effect until after the time for appeal has expired, and an appeal of the assessment and levy of such a monetary penalty shall act as a supersedeas. (7)  In addition to the grounds specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  Actions taken by the board in suspending a license when required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 are not actions from which an appeal may be taken under this section.  Any appeal of a license suspension that is required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 shall be taken in accordance with the appeal procedure specified in Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, rather than the procedure specified in this section.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 101.  Section 73-7-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-7-27.  (1)  Any complaint may be filed with the board by a member or agent of the board or by any person charging any licensee of the board with the commission of any of the offenses enumerated in subsection (2) of this section.  Such complaint shall be in writing, signed by the accuser or accusers, and verified under oath, and such complaints shall be investigated as set forth in Section 73-7-7.  After the investigation, the board may dismiss the complaint if the board, through its administrative review agents, determines that there is not substantial justification to believe that the accused licensee has committed any of the offenses enumerated or, the board may prepare a formal complaint proceeding against the licensee as hereinafter provided.  When used with reference to any complaint filed against a licensee herein, the term "not substantial justification" means a complaint that is frivolous, groundless in fact or law, or vexatious, as determined by unanimous vote of the board.  In the event of a dismissal, the person filing the accusation and the accused licensee shall be given written notice of the board's determination.  If the board determines there is reasonable cause to believe the accused has committed any of those offenses, the secretary of the board or the executive director shall give written notice of such determination to the accused licensee and set a day for a hearing as provided in subsection (3) of this section. (2)  The board shall have the power to revoke, suspend or refuse to issue or renew any license or certificate provided for in this chapter, and to fine, place on probation and/or otherwise discipline an applicant, student, licensee or holder of a certificate, upon proof that such person:  (a) has not complied with or has violated any of the rules and regulations promulgated by the board; (b) has not complied with an order, decision, or ruling of the board; (c) has committed fraud or dishonest conduct in the taking of the examination herein provided for; (d) has been convicted of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (e) has committed grossly unprofessional or dishonest conduct; (f) is addicted to the excessive use of intoxicating liquors or to the use of drugs to such an extent as to render him or her unfit to practice in any of the practices or occupations set forth in this chapter; (g) has advertised by means of knowingly false or deceptive statements; (h) has failed to display the license or certificate issued to him or her as provided for in this chapter; or (i) has been convicted of violating any of the provisions of this chapter.  A conviction of violating any of the provisions of this chapter shall be grounds for automatic suspension of the license or certificate of such person. (3)  (a)  The board shall not revoke, suspend or refuse to issue or renew any license or certificate, or fine, place on probation or otherwise discipline any applicant, licensee or holder of a certificate in a disciplinary matter except after a hearing of which the applicant or licensee or holder of the certificate affected shall be given at least twenty (20) days' notice in writing, specifying the reason or reasons for denying the applicant a license or certificate of registration, or in the case of any other disciplinary action, the offense or offenses of which the licensee or holder of a certificate of registration is charged.  Such notice may be served by mailing a copy thereof by United States first-class certified mail, postage prepaid, to the last-known residence or business address of such applicant, licensee or holder of a certificate.  The hearing on such charges shall be at such time and place as the board may prescribe.  The provisions of this paragraph (a) shall not apply to the board's collection of a civil penalty or fine imposed by the board under paragraph (b) of this subsection. (b)  Any civil penalty or fine imposed by the board under this chapter resulting from an inspection or audit shall become due and payable when the applicant, licensee or holder of a certificate incurring the penalty receives a notice in writing from the board of the penalty.  The notice shall be sent by registered or certified mail or by personal service.  The person to whom the notice is addressed shall have thirty (30) days from the date of the notice in which to make written application for a hearing.  Any person who makes the application for a hearing shall be entitled to a hearing.  The hearing shall be conducted as a contested case hearing.  When an order assessing a civil penalty under this section becomes final by operation of law or on appeal, unless the amount of penalty is paid within thirty (30) days after the order becomes final, it may be recorded with the circuit clerk in any county of this state.  The clerk shall then record the name of the person incurring the penalty and the amount of the penalty in his lien record book. (c)  The board may temporarily suspend a license under this chapter without any hearing, simultaneously with the institution of proceedings under this section, if it finds that the evidence in support of the board's determination is clear, competent and unequivocal that the licensee's continuation in practice would constitute an imminent danger to public health and safety. (4)  At such hearings, all witnesses shall be sworn by a court reporter, and stenographic notes of the proceedings shall be taken.  Any party to the proceedings, at the request of such party, shall be furnished with a copy of such stenographic notes upon payment to the board of such fees as it shall prescribe, not exceeding, however, the actual costs of transcription. (5)  The board is authorized and empowered to issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and papers.  The process issued by the board shall extend to all parts of the state and such process shall be served by any person designated by the board for such service.  The person serving such process shall receive such compensation as may be allowed by the board, not to exceed the fee prescribed by law for similar services.  All witnesses who shall be subpoenaed, and who shall appear in any proceedings before the board, shall receive the same fees and mileage as allowed by law. (6)  Where in any proceeding before the board any witness shall fail or refuse to attend upon subpoena issued by the board, shall refuse to testify, or shall refuse to produce any books and papers, the production of which is called for by the subpoena, the attendance of such witness and the giving of his testimony and the production of the books and papers shall be enforced by any court of competent jurisdiction of this state, in the same manner as are enforced for the attendance and testimony of witnesses in civil cases in the courts of this state. (7)  The board shall conduct the hearing in an orderly and continuous manner, granting continuances only when the ends of justice may be served.  The board shall, within sixty (60) days after conclusion of the hearing, reduce its decision to writing and forward an attested true copy thereof to the last-known residence or business address of such applicant, licensee or holder of a certificate, by way of United States first-class certified mail, postage prepaid. (8)  Any and all parties to the hearing shall have the right of appeal from an adverse ruling, or order, or decision of the board to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, upon forwarding notice of appeal to the board within thirty (30) days after the decision of the board is mailed in the manner here contemplated.  The appellant shall, together with the notice of appeal, first pay the costs for the transcription of the record of the hearing(s) and proceeding(s) before the board in which the adverse ruling, order or decision of the board was made.  Any fine imposed by the board under the provisions of this chapter shall not take effect until after the time for appeal has expired, and an appeal of the imposition of such a fine shall act as a supersedeas bond.  The appeal shall thereupon be heard in due course by the court, which shall review the record and make its determination thereon. (9)  The board, in its discretion, may assess and charge any part or all of the costs of any disciplinary proceedings conducted under this section against the accused if the accused is found guilty of the charges. (10)  Any fine imposed by the board upon a licensee or holder of a certificate shall be in accordance with the following class designation of fines: (a)  Class A - No violations or the violations are minor health and safety violations that are detrimental to public safety and welfare.  Violations under this class shall be set at no less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) but no more than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00); (b)  Class B - Class B violations are major health and safety concerns that are detrimental to public safety and welfare and shall be set at no less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) but no more than Seven Hundred Fifty Dollars ($750.00); (c)  Class C - Class C violations shall be set at no less than Eight Hundred Dollars ($800.00) but no more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) and are violations specific to the following: (i)  Unlicensed practice or the use of fraudulent statements to obtain any benefits or privileges under this chapter or practicing one (1) of the professions regulated by the board without a license.  These violations will be handled in accordance with the requirements of Section 73-7-27 or Section 73-7-37 when applicable; and (ii)  Extremely dangerous to the health and safety of the public. The power and authority of the board to impose such fines under this section shall not be affected or diminished by any other proceeding, civil or criminal, concerning the same violation or violations. (11)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (2) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  Actions taken by the board in suspending a license when required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 are not actions from which an appeal may be taken under this section.  Any appeal of a license suspension that is required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 shall be taken in accordance with the appeal procedure specified in Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, rather than the procedure specified in this section.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 102.  Section 73-17-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-17-15.  (1)  (a)  The board is authorized to investigate, either on the basis of complaints filed with it or on its own initiative, instances of suspected violations of this chapter of any nature, including, but not limited to:  performing the duties of a nursing home administrator without a license; the providing of false information to the board either incident to an application for a license, incident to a hearing, or otherwise; maladministration; unethical conduct; incompetence; the conviction of a licensee of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; the misappropriation of funds; or of any other matter reflecting unfavorably upon the holder of a license under this chapter or an applicant therefor.  On the basis of information developed during such an investigation, the board may (i) revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew any license issued by the board, (ii) deny an application for a license, or (iii) reprimand, place on probation, and/or take any other action in relation to a license, as the board may deem proper under the circumstances.  Whenever the results of such an investigation are filed, the executive director of the board shall set a day for a hearing and shall notify the licensee that on the day fixed for hearing he or she may appear and show cause, if any, why his or her license should not be revoked, suspended, or other action taken in relation to his or her license.  The notice shall be transmitted to the licensee by certified United States mail to the address of the licensee appearing of record with the board. (b)  In cases where violations of this chapter have been substantiated, the board may assess a monetary penalty for those reasonable costs that are expended by the board in the investigation and conduct of a proceeding for licensure revocation, suspension or restriction, including, but not limited to, the cost of process service, court reporters, expert witnesses and investigations. (2)  The board, upon finding and determining that any person represents himself or herself to be a nursing home administrator or performs any or all of the services, acts or duties of a nursing home administrator as defined in this chapter without a license, is authorized to petition the chancery court of the county in which the unauthorized acts have been, are being or may be committed, for writ or writs of injunction prohibiting the unauthorized acts.  This provision is supplemental and in addition to the penal provisions set forth in Section 73-17-13. (3)  Any licensee whose license has been revoked or suspended, or who has been placed on probation or reprimanded after a contested hearing, may appeal that action of the board to the chancery court of the county in which the nursing home administrator is practicing, which appeal shall not be a de novo appeal but shall be determined upon an official transcript of the record of the contested hearing.  Appeals to the chancery court shall be taken within ten (10) days from the date of the board's order and shall be taken, perfected, heard and determined either in termtime or in vacation, and the appeals shall be heard and disposed of promptly by the court.  Appeals from the board shall be taken and perfected by the filing of a bond in the sum of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) with two (2) sureties, or with a surety company qualified to do business in Mississippi as surety, conditioned to pay the costs of the appeal.  The bond shall be payable to the state and shall be approved by the clerk of the chancery court. The bond may be enforced in its name as other judicial bonds filed in the chancery court, and judgment may be entered upon those bonds and process and execution shall issue upon those judgments as provided by law in other cases. Upon approval of the bond by the clerk of the chancery court, the clerk shall give notice to the board of the appeal from the decision of the board.  It thereupon shall be the duty of the board through its duly authorized representative to promptly transmit to the clerk of the chancery court in which the appeal is pending a certified copy of the order of the board and all documents filed relating to the board's action against the licensee, together with a transcript of the testimony, both oral and documentary, introduced for consideration by the board both in support of and in opposition to the action, which appeal shall be docketed by the clerk and shall be determined by the court based upon the record.  If there is an appeal, the appeal may, in the discretion of and on motion to the chancery court, act as a supersedeas.  The chancery court shall dispose of the appeal and enter its decision promptly. The hearing on the appeal may, in the discretion of the chancellor, be tried in vacation. (4)  Appeals from the decision of the chancery court may be taken by either the board or the licensee to the Supreme Court as in the case of appeals generally from the chancery court to the Supreme Court. (5)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  Actions taken by the board in revoking a license when required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 are not actions from which an appeal may be taken under this section.  Any appeal of a license suspension that is required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 shall be taken in accordance with the appeal procedure specified in Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, rather than the procedure specified in this section.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 103.  Section 73-23-59, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-23-59.  (1)  Licensees subject to this chapter shall conduct their activities, services and practice in accordance with this chapter and any rules promulgated pursuant hereto.  The board, upon satisfactory proof and in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations of the board, may suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew any license hereunder, or revoke or suspend any privilege to practice,  censure or reprimand any licensee, restrict or limit a license, and take any other action in relation to a license or privilege to practice as the board may deem proper under the circumstances upon any of the following grounds: (a)  Negligence in the practice or performance of professional services or activities; (b)  Engaging in dishonorable, unethical or unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public in the course of professional services or activities; (c)  Perpetrating or cooperating in fraud or material deception in obtaining or renewing a license or attempting the same or obtaining a privilege to practice; (d)  Being convicted of any crime which has a substantial relationship to the licensee's activities and services or an essential element of which is misstatement, fraud or dishonesty; (e)  Having been convicted of or pled guilty to a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act in the courts of this state or any other state, territory or country.  Conviction, as used in this paragraph, shall include a deferred conviction, deferred prosecution, deferred sentence, finding or verdict of guilt, an admission of guilty, or a plea of nolo contendere; (f)  Engaging in or permitting the performance of unacceptable services personally or by others working under the licensee's supervision due to the licensee's deliberate or negligent act or acts or failure to act, regardless of whether actual damage or damages to the public is established; (g)  Continued practice although the licensee has become unfit to practice as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant due to:  (i) failure to keep abreast of current professional theory or practice; or (ii) physical or mental disability; the entry of an order or judgment by a court of competent jurisdiction that a licensee is in need of mental treatment or is incompetent shall constitute mental disability; or (iii) addiction or severe dependency upon alcohol or other drugs which may endanger the public by impairing the licensee's ability to practice; (h)  Having disciplinary action taken against the licensee's license in another state; (i)  Making differential, detrimental treatment against any person because of race, color, creed, sex, religion or national origin; (j)  Engaging in lewd conduct in connection with professional services or activities; (k)  Engaging in false or misleading advertising; (l)  Contracting, assisting or permitting unlicensed persons to perform services for which a license is required under this chapter or privilege to practice is required under Section 73-23-101; (m)  Violation of any probation requirements placed on a license or privilege to practice by the board; (n)  Revealing confidential information except as may be required by law; (o)  Failing to inform clients of the fact that the client no longer needs the services or professional assistance of the licensee; (p)  Charging excessive or unreasonable fees or engaging in unreasonable collection practices; (q)  For treating or attempting to treat ailments or other health conditions of human beings other than by physical therapy as authorized by this chapter; (r)  Except as authorized in Section 73-23-35(3) and (4), for applying or offering to apply physical therapy, exclusive of initial evaluation or screening and exclusive of education or consultation for the prevention of physical and mental disability within the scope of physical therapy, other than upon the referral from a licensed physician, dentist, osteopath, podiatrist, chiropractor, physician assistant or nurse practitioner; or for acting as a physical therapist assistant other than under the direct, on-site supervision of a licensed physical therapist; (s)  Failing to adhere to the recognized standards of ethics of the physical therapy profession as established by rules of the board; (t)  Failing to complete continuing competence requirements as established by board rule; (u)  Failing to supervise physical therapist assistants in accordance with this chapter and/or board rules; (v)  Engaging in sexual misconduct.  For the purpose of this paragraph, sexual misconduct includes, but is not necessarily limited to: (i)  Engaging in or soliciting sexual relationships, whether consensual or nonconsensual, while a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant/patient relationship exists. (ii)  Making sexual advances, requesting sexual favors or engaging in other verbal conduct or physical contact of a sexual nature with patients or clients. (iii) Intentionally viewing a completely or partially disrobed patient in the course of treatment if the viewing is not related to patient diagnosis or treatment under current practice standards; (w)  The erroneous issuance of a license or privilege to practice to any person; (x)  Violations of any provisions of this chapter, board rules or regulations or a written order or directive of the board; (y)  Failing to maintain adequate patient records.  For the purposes of this paragraph, "adequate patient records" means legible records that contain at minimum sufficient information to identify the patient, an evaluation of objective findings, a diagnosis, a plan of care, a treatment record and a discharge plan; (z)  Failing to report to the board any unprofessional, incompetent or illegal acts that appear to be in violation of this law or any rules established by the board. (2)  The board may order a licensee to submit to a reasonable physical or mental examination if the licensee's physical or mental capacity to practice safely is at issue in a disciplinary proceeding. (3)  Failure to comply with a board order to submit to a physical or mental examination shall render a licensee subject to the summary suspension procedures described in Section 73-23-64. (4)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license or privilege to practice of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153. The procedure for suspension of a license or privilege to practice for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license or privilege to practice suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license or privilege to practice suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 104.  Section 73-30-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-30-21.  (1)  The board may, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, suspend, revoke or refuse to issue or renew a license or the privilege to practice or may reprimand the license holder or holder of the privilege to practice, upon a determination by the board that such license holder or holder of the privilege to practice or applicant for licensure or the privilege to practice has: (a)  Been adjudged by any court to be mentally incompetent or have had a guardian of person appointed; (b)  Been convicted of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (c)  Sworn falsely under oath or affirmation; (d)  Obtained a license or certificate or the privilege to practice by fraud, deceit or other misrepresentation; (e)  Engaged in the conduct of professional counseling in a grossly negligent or incompetent manner; (f)  Intentionally violated any provision of this article; (g)  Violated any rules or regulations of the board; or (h)  Aided or assisted another in falsely obtaining a license or the privilege to practice under this article. With regard to a refusal to issue a privilege to practice, such refusal by the board shall be in accordance with the terms of the Professional Counseling Compact instead of this subsection (1). (2)  Appeals from disciplinary action are to be brought in the circuit court in the county of residence of the practitioner.  In the event the practitioner resides out of state the appeal should be brought in Hinds County Circuit Court. (3)  The board may assess and levy upon any licensee, practitioner or applicant for licensure or the privilege to practice the costs incurred or expended by the board in the investigation and prosecution of any licensure, privilege to practice or disciplinary action, including, but not limited to, the costs of process service, court reporters, expert witnesses, investigators and attorney's fees. (4)  No revoked license or privilege to practice may be reinstated within twelve (12) months after such revocation.  Reinstatement thereafter shall be upon such conditions as the board may prescribe, which may include, without being limited to, successful passing of the examination required by this article. (5)  A license or privilege to practice certificate issued by the board is the property of the board and must be surrendered on demand. (6)  The chancery court is hereby vested with the jurisdiction and power to enjoin the unlawful practice of counseling and/or the false representation as a licensed counselor in a proceeding brought by the board or any members thereof or by any citizen of this state. (7)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this article, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 105.  Section 73-38-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-38-27.  (1)  With regard to a refusal to issue a privilege to practice, such refusal by the board shall be in accordance with terms of the Audiology and Speech-Language Pathology Interstate Compact.  The board may refuse to issue or renew a license, or may suspend or revoke a license where the licensee or applicant for a license has been guilty of unprofessional conduct which has endangered or is likely to endanger the health, welfare or safety of the public.  Such unprofessional conduct may result from: (a)  Negligence in the practice or performance of professional services or activities; (b)  Engaging in dishonorable, unethical or unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public in the course of professional services or activities; (c)  Perpetrating or cooperating in fraud or material deception in obtaining or renewing a license or attempting the same; (d)  Being convicted of any crime which has a substantial relationship to the licensee's activities and services or an essential element of which is misstatement, fraud or dishonesty; (e)  Being convicted of any crime which is a * * * felony under the laws of this state or the United States disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (f)  Engaging in or permitting the performance of unacceptable services personally or by others working under the licensee's supervision due to the licensee's deliberate or negligent act or acts or failure to act, regardless of whether actual damage or damages to the public is established; (g)  Continued practice although the licensee has become unfit to practice as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist due to:  (i) failure to keep abreast of current professional theory or practice; or (ii) physical or mental disability; the entry of an order or judgment by a court of competent jurisdiction that a licensee is in need of mental treatment or is incompetent shall constitute mental disability; or (iii) addiction or severe dependency upon alcohol or other drugs which may endanger the public by impairing the licensee's ability to practice; (h)  Having disciplinary action taken against the licensee's license in another state; (i)  Making differential, detrimental treatment against any person because of race, color, creed, sex, religion or national origin; (j)  Engaging in lewd conduct in connection with professional services or activities; (k)  Engaging in false or misleading advertising; (l)  Contracting, assisting or permitting unlicensed persons to perform services for which a license is required under this article; (m)  Violation of any probation requirements placed on a license by the board; (n)  Revealing confidential information except as may be required by law; (o)  Failing to inform clients of the fact that the client no longer needs the services or professional assistance of the licensee; (p)  Charging excessive or unreasonable fees or engaging in unreasonable collection practices; (q)  For treating or attempting to treat ailments or other health conditions of human beings other than by speech or audiology therapy as authorized by this article; (r)  For applying or offering to apply speech or audiology therapy, exclusive of initial evaluation or screening and exclusive of education or consultation for the prevention of physical and mental disability within the scope of speech or audiology therapy, or for acting as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist, or speech-language pathologist or audiologist aide other than under the direct, on-site supervision of a licensed speech-language pathologist or audiologist; (s)  Violations of the current codes of conduct for speech-language pathologists or audiologists, and speech-language pathologist or audiologist assistants adopted by the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association; (t)  Violations of any rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to this article. (2)  The board may order a licensee to submit to a reasonable physical or mental examination if the licensee's physical or mental capacity to practice safely is at issue in a disciplinary proceeding. (3)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this article, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 106.  Section 73-53-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-53-17.  (1)  Individuals licensed by the board shall conduct their activities, services and practice in accordance with the laws governing their professional practice and any rules promulgated by the board.  Licensees and applicants may be subject to the exercise of the sanctions enumerated in Section 73-53-23 if the board finds that a licensee or applicant has committed any of the following: (a)  Negligence in the practice or performance of professional services or activities; (b)  Engaging in dishonorable, unethical or unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive, defraud or harm the public in the course of professional services or activities; (c)  Perpetrating or cooperating in fraud or material deception in obtaining or renewing a license or attempting the same; (d)  Violating the rules and regulations established by the board; (e)  Violating the National Association of Social Workers Code of Ethics or the American Association for Marriage and Family Therapy Code of Ethics; (f)  Being convicted of any crime which has a substantial relationship to the licensee's activities and services or an essential element of which is misstatement, fraud or dishonesty; (g)  Being convicted of any crime which is a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act under the laws of this state or of the United States of America; (h)  Engaging in or permitting the performance of unacceptable services personally due to the licensee's deliberate or grossly negligent act or acts or failure to act, regardless of whether actual damage or damages to the public is established, or assuming responsibility for another's work by signing documents without personal knowledge of the work as established by board rule; (i)  Continued practice although the licensee has become unfit to practice social work due to:  (i) failure to keep abreast of current professional theory or practice; or (ii) physical or mental disability; the entry of an order or judgment by a court of competent jurisdiction that a licensee is in need of mental treatment or is incompetent shall constitute mental disability; or (iii) addiction or severe dependency upon alcohol or other drugs which may endanger the public by impairing the licensee's ability to practice; (j)  Continued practice although the individual failed to renew and has a lapsed license; (k)  Having disciplinary action taken against the licensee's license in another state; (l)  Making differential, detrimental treatment against any person because of race, color, creed, sex, religion or national origin; (m)  Engaging in lewd conduct in connection with professional services or activities; (n)  Engaging in false or misleading advertising; (o)  Contracting, assisting or permitting unlicensed persons to perform services for which a license is required under this article; (p)  Violation of any probation requirements placed on a licensee by the board; (q)  Revealing confidential information except as may be required by law; (r)  Failing to inform clients of the fact that the client no longer needs the services or professional assistance of the licensee; (s)  Charging excessive or unreasonable fees or engaging in unreasonable collection practices. (2)  The board may order a licensee to submit to a reasonable physical or mental examination if the licensee's physical or mental capacity to practice safely is at issue in a disciplinary proceeding. (3)  Failure to comply with a board order to submit to a physical or mental examination shall render a licensee subject to the summary suspension procedures described in Section 73-53-23. (4)  In addition to the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the board shall be authorized to suspend the license of any licensee for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153.  The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be.  If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this article, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control. SECTION 107.  Section 73-60-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-60-31.  The Appraisal Board may refuse to issue, renew, or may revoke or suspend, a license or may place on probation, censure, reprimand or take other disciplinary action with regard to any license issued under this chapter, including the issuance of fines for each violation, for any one (1) or combination of the following causes: (a)  Violations of this chapter or the Appraisal Board's rules promulgated pursuant hereto; (b)  Violation of terms of license probation; (c)  Conviction of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act or making a plea of guilty or nolo contendere within five (5) years prior to the date of application; (d)  Operating without adequate insurance coverage required for licensees; (e)  Fraud in the procurement or performance of a contract to conduct a home inspection; and (f)  Failure to submit to or pass a background investigation pursuant to Section 73-60-47. SECTION 108.  Section 73-67-27, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-67-27.  (1)  The board may refuse to issue or renew or may deny, suspend or revoke any license held or applied for under this chapter upon finding that the holder of a license or applicant: (a)  Is guilty of fraud, deceit or misrepresentation in procuring or attempting to procure any license provided for in this chapter; (b)  Attempted to use as his own the license of another; (c)  Allowed the use of his license by another; (d)  Has been adjudicated as mentally incompetent by regularly constituted authorities; (e)  Has been convicted of a crime, or has charges or disciplinary action pending that directly relates to the practice of massage therapy or to the ability to practice massage therapy.  Any plea of nolo contendere shall be considered a conviction for the purposes of this section; (f)  Is guilty of unprofessional or unethical conduct as defined by the code of ethics; (g)  Is guilty of false, misleading or deceptive advertising, or is guilty of aiding or assisting in the advertising or practice of any unlicensed or unpermitted person in the practice of massage therapy; (h)  Is grossly negligent or incompetent in the practice of massage therapy; (i)  Has had rights, credentials or one or more license(s) to practice massage therapy revoked, suspended or denied in any jurisdiction, territory or possession of the United States or another country for acts of the licensee similar to acts described in this section.  A certified copy of the record of the jurisdiction making such a revocation, suspension or denial shall be conclusive evidence thereof; or (j)  Has been convicted of any * * * felony, other than a violation of federal or state tax laws disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (2)  Investigative proceedings may be implemented by a complaint by any person, including members of the board. (3)  (a)  Any person(s) found guilty of prostitution using as any advertisement, claim or insignia of being an actual licensed massage therapist or to be practicing massage therapy by using the word "massage" or any other description indicating the same, whether or not the person(s) have one or more license for the person(s) or establishment(s), shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or imprisonment of up to six (6) months, or both, per offense, per person. (b)  Any person who knowingly participates in receiving illegal service(s) of any person found guilty as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or imprisonment for up to one (1) month, or both.  Persons officially designated to investigate complaints are exempt. (c)  Any person who violates any provision of this chapter, other than violation(s) of paragraph (a) of this subsection, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or imprisonment for up to one (1) month in jail, or both, per offense. (d)  The board, in its discretion, may assess and tax any part or all of the costs of any disciplinary proceedings conducted against either the accused, the charging party, or both, as it may elect. SECTION 109.  Section 73-75-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-75-13.  To be eligible for licensure by the board as a behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst, a person shall: (a)  Submit to the board an application, upon such form and in such manner as the board shall prescribe, along with the applicable fee and personal references; (b)  Certify that the applicant has not been convicted of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act as defined by the laws of the State of Mississippi; (c)  Undergo a fingerprint-based criminal history records check of the Mississippi central criminal database and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history database.  Each applicant shall submit a full set of the applicant's fingerprints in a form and manner prescribed by the board, which shall be forwarded to the Mississippi Department of Public Safety and the Federal Bureau of Investigation Identification Division for this purpose; and (d)  For a behavior analyst: (i)  Possess at least a master's degree, or its equivalent, from an educational institution recognized by the board; (ii)  Have current and active certification by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board as a Board Certified Behavior Analyst (BCBA) or Board Certified Behavior Analyst-Doctoral (BCBA-D), verified by the board; and (iii)  Comply with such other requirements of the board. (e)  For an assistant behavior analyst: (i)  Possess a bachelor's degree, or its equivalent, from an educational institution recognized by the board; (ii)  Have current and active certification by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board as a Board Certified Assistant Behavior Analyst (BCABA), verified by the board; and (iii)  Provide proof of ongoing supervision by a licensed behavior analyst. (f)  All licenses issued pursuant to this section shall be for a term of three (3) years, but shall not exceed the expiration of the licensee's certification by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board. SECTION 110.  Section 75-60-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-60-19.  (1)  The Commission on Proprietary School and College Registration may suspend, revoke or cancel a certificate of registration for any one (1) or any combination of the following causes: (a)  Violation of any provision of the sections of this chapter or any regulation made by the commission; (b)  The furnishing of false, misleading or incomplete information requested by the commission; (c)  The signing of an application or the holding of a certificate of registration by a person who has pleaded guilty or has been found guilty of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act or has pleaded guilty or been found guilty of any other * * * indictable offense disqualifying crime; (d)  The signing of an application or the holding of a certificate of registration by a person who is addicted to the use of any narcotic drug, or who is found to be mentally incompetent; (e)  Violation of any commitment made in an application for a certificate of registration; (f)  Presentation to prospective students of misleading, false or fraudulent information relating to the course of instruction, employment opportunity, or opportunities for enrollment in accredited institutions of higher education after entering or completing courses offered by the holder of a certificate of registration; (g)  Failure to provide or maintain premises or equipment for offering courses of instruction in a safe and sanitary condition; (h)  Refusal by an agent to display his agent permit upon demand of a prospective student or other interested person; (i)  Failure to maintain financial resources adequate for the satisfactory conduct of courses of study as presented in the plan of operation or to retain a sufficient number and qualified staff of instruction; however nothing in this chapter shall require an instructor to be certificated by the Commission on Proprietary School and College Registration or to hold any type of post-high school degree; (j)  Offering training or courses of instruction other than those presented in the application; however, schools may offer special courses adapted to the needs of individual students where the special courses are in the subject field specified in the application; (k)  Accepting the services of an agent not licensed in accordance with Sections 75-60-23 through 75-60-37, inclusive; (l)  Conviction or a plea of nolo contendere on the part of any owner, operator or director of a registered school of any * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act under Mississippi law or the law of another jurisdiction; (m)  Continued employment of a teacher or instructor who has been convicted of or entered a plea of nolo contendere to any * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act under Mississippi law or the law of another jurisdiction; (n)  Incompetence of any owner or operator to operate a school. (2)  (a)  Any person who believes he has been aggrieved by a violation of this section shall have the right to file a written complaint within two (2) years of the alleged violation.  The commission shall maintain a written record of each complaint that is made.  The commission shall also send to the complainant a form acknowledging the complaint and requesting further information if necessary and shall advise the director of the school that a complaint has been made and, where appropriate, the nature of the complaint. (b)  The commission shall within twenty (20) days of receipt of such written complaint commence an investigation of the alleged violation and shall, within ninety (90) days of the receipt of such written complaint, issue a written finding.  The commission shall furnish such findings to the person who filed the complaint and to the chief operating officer of the school cited in the complaint.  If the commission finds that there has been a violation of this section, the commission shall take appropriate action. (c)  Schools shall disclose in writing to all prospective and current students their right to file a complaint with the commission. (d)  The existence of an arbitration clause in no way negates the student's right to file a complaint with the commission. (e)  The commission may initiate an investigation without a complaint. (3)  Hearing procedures. (a)  Upon a finding that there is good cause to believe that a school, or an officer, agent, employee, partner or teacher, has committed a violation of subsection (1) of this section, the commission shall initiate proceedings by serving a notice of hearing upon each and every such party subject to the administrative action.  The school or such party shall be given reasonable notice of hearing, including the time, place and nature of the hearing and a statement sufficiently particular to give notice of the transactions or occurrences intended to be proved, the material elements of each cause of action and the civil penalties and/or administrative sanctions sought. (b)  Opportunity shall be afforded to the party to respond and present evidence and argument on the issues involved in the hearing including the right of cross-examination.  In a hearing, the school or such party shall be accorded the right to have its representative appear in person or by or with counsel or other representative. Disposition may be made in any hearing by stipulation, agreed settlement, consent order, default or other informal method. (c)  The commission shall designate an impartial hearing officer to conduct the hearing, who shall be empowered to: (i)  Administer oaths and affirmations; and (ii)  Regulate the course of the hearings, set the time and place for continued hearings, and fix the time for filing of briefs and other documents; and (iii)  Direct the school or such party to appear and confer to consider the simplification of the issues by consent; and (iv)  Grant a request for an adjournment of the hearing only upon good cause shown. The strict legal rules of evidence shall not apply, but the decision shall be supported by substantial evidence in the record. (4)  The commission, acting by and through its hearing officer, is hereby authorized and empowered to issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of books and papers at such hearing.  Process issued by the commission shall extend to all parts of the state and shall be served by any person designated by the commission for such service.  Where, in any proceeding before the hearing officer, any witness fails or refuses to attend upon a subpoena issued by the commission, refuses to testify, or refuses to produce any books and papers the production of which is called for by a subpoena, the attendance of such witness, the giving of his testimony or the production of the books and papers shall be enforced by any court of competent jurisdiction of this state in the manner provided for the enforcement of attendance and testimony of witnesses in civil cases in the courts of this state. (5)  Decision after hearing.  The hearing officer shall make written findings of fact and conclusions of law, and shall also recommend in writing to the commission a final decision, including penalties.  The hearing officer shall mail a copy of his findings of fact, conclusions of law and recommended penalty to the party and his attorney, or representative.  The commission shall make the final decision, which shall be based exclusively on evidence and other materials introduced at the hearing.  If it is determined that a party has committed a violation, the commission shall issue a final order and shall impose penalties in accordance with this section.  The commission shall send by certified mail, return receipt requested, a copy of the final order to the party and his attorney, or representative.  The commission shall, at the request of the school or such party, furnish a copy of the transcript or any part thereof upon payment of the cost thereof. (6)  Civil penalties and administrative sanctions.  (a)  A hearing officer may recommend, and the commission may impose, a civil penalty not to exceed Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) for any violation of this section.  In the case of a second or further violation committed within the previous five (5) years, the liability shall be a civil penalty not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) for each such violation. (b)  Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection, a hearing officer may recommend and the commission may impose a civil penalty not to exceed Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) for any of the following violations: (i) operation of a school without a registration in violation of this chapter; (ii) operation of a school knowing that the school's registration has been suspended or revoked; (iii) use of false, misleading, deceptive or fraudulent advertising; (iv) employment of recruiters on the basis of a commission, bonus or quota, except as authorized by the commission; (v) directing or authorizing recruiters to offer guarantees of jobs upon completion of a course; (vi) failure to make a tuition refund when such failure is part of a pattern of misconduct; or (vii) violation of any other provision of this chapter, or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant thereto, when such violation constitutes part of a pattern of misconduct which significantly impairs the educational quality of the program or programs being offered by the school. For each enumerated offense, a second or further violation committed within the previous five (5) years shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) for each such violation. (c)  In addition to the penalties authorized in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, a hearing officer may recommend and the commission may impose any of the following administrative sanctions:  (i) a cease and desist order; (ii) a mandatory direction; (iii) a suspension or revocation of a certificate of registration; (iv) a probation order; or (v) an order of restitution. (d)  The commission may suspend a registration upon the failure of a school to pay any fee, fine or penalty as required by this chapter unless such failure is determined by the commission to be for good cause. (e)  All civil penalties, fines and settlements received shall accrue to the credit of the Commission on Proprietary School and College Registration. (7)  Any penalty or administrative sanction imposed by the commission under this section may be appealed by the school, college or other person affected to the Mississippi Community College Board as provided in Section 75-60-4(3), which appeal shall be on the record previously made before the commission's hearing officer.  All appeals from the Mississippi Community College Board shall be on the record and shall be filed in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi. SECTION 111.  Section 75-76-137, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 75-76-137.  (1)  If any gaming employee is convicted of any violation of this chapter or if in investigating an alleged violation of this chapter by any licensee the executive director or the commission finds that a gaming employee employed by the licensee has been guilty of cheating, the commission shall, after a hearing as provided in Sections 75-76-103 through 75-76-119, inclusive, revoke the employee's work permit. (2)  The commission may revoke a work permit if it finds after a hearing as provided in Sections 75-76-103 through 75-76-119, inclusive, that the gaming employee has failed to disclose, misstated or otherwise misled the commission with respect to any fact contained within any application for a work permit, or subsequent to being issued a work permit: (a)  Committed, attempted or conspired to do any of the acts prohibited by this chapter; (b)  Knowingly possessed or permitted to remain in or upon any licensed premises any cards, dice, mechanical device or any other cheating device whatever the use of which is prohibited by statute or ordinance; (c)  Concealed or refused to disclose any material fact in any investigation by the executive director or the commission; (d)  Committed, attempted or conspired to commit larceny or embezzlement against a gaming licensee or upon the premises of a licensed gaming establishment; (e)  Been convicted in any jurisdiction other than Mississippi of any offense involving or relating to gambling; (f)  Accepted employment without prior commission approval in a position for which he or she could be required to be licensed under this chapter after having been denied a license for a reason involving personal unsuitability or after failing to apply for licensing when requested to do so by the commission or the executive director; (g)  Been refused the issuance of any license, permit or approval to engage in or be involved with gaming in any jurisdiction other than Mississippi, or had any such license, permit or approval revoked or suspended; (h)  Been prohibited under color of governmental authority from being present upon the premises of any gaming establishment for any reason relating to improper gambling activities or any illegal act; (i)  Contumaciously defied any legislative investigative committee or other officially constituted bodies acting on behalf of the United States or any state, county or municipality which seeks to investigate crimes relating to gaming, corruption of public officials, or any organized criminal activities; or (j)  Been convicted of any * * * felony or misdemeanor, other than one constituting a violation of this chapter disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. (3)  A work permit shall not be issued to a person whose work permit has previously been revoked pursuant to this section or to whom the issuance or renewal of a work permit has been denied, except with the unanimous approval of the commission members. (4)  A gaming employee whose work permit has been revoked pursuant to this section is entitled to judicial review of the commission's action in the manner prescribed by Sections 75-76-121 through 75-76-127, inclusive. SECTION 112.  Section 77-8-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 77-8-25. (1)  Before allowing an individual to accept trip requests through a transportation network company's digital platform as a transportation network company driver: (a) The individual shall submit an application to the transportation network company, which includes information regarding his or her address, age, driver's license, motor vehicle registration, automobile liability insurance, and other information required by the transportation network company; (b) The transportation network company shall conduct, or have a third party conduct, a local and national criminal background check for each applicant that shall include: (i) Multistate/multijurisdiction criminal records locator or other similar commercial nationwide database with validation (primary source search); and (ii) United States Department of Justice National Sex Offender Public Website * * *;. (2)  The transportation network company shall review, or have a third party review, a driving history research report for such individual. (3)  The transportation network company shall not permit an individual to act as a transportation network company driver on its digital platform who: (a) Has had more than three (3) moving violations in the prior three-year period, or one (1) of the following major violations in the prior three-year period: (i) Attempting to evade the police; (ii) Reckless driving; or (iii) Driving on a suspended or revoked license; (b) Has been convicted, within the past seven (7) years, of (i) Any * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; or (ii) Misdemeanor driving under the influence, reckless driving, hit and run, or any other driving-related offense or any misdemeanor violent offense or sexual offense; (c) Is a match in the United States Department of Justice National Sex Offender Public Website; (d) Does not possess a valid driver's license; (e) Does not possess proof of registration for the motor vehicle used to provide prearranged rides; (f) Does not possess proof of automobile liability insurance for the motor vehicle used to provide prearranged rides; or (g) Is not at least nineteen (19) years of age. SECTION 113.  Section 83-1-191, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-1-191.  (1)  There is established within the Department of Insurance a Comprehensive Hurricane Damage Mitigation Program.  This section does not create an entitlement for property owners or obligate the state in any way to fund the inspection or retrofitting of residential property or commercial property in this state.  Implementation of this program is subject to the availability of funds that may be appropriated by the Legislature for this purpose.  The program may develop and implement a comprehensive and coordinated approach for hurricane damage mitigation that may include the following: (a)  Cost-benefit study on wind hazard mitigation construction measures.  The performance of a cost-benefit study to establish the most appropriate wind hazard mitigation construction measures for both new construction and the retrofitting of existing construction for both residential and commercial facilities within the wind-borne debris regions of Mississippi as defined by the International Building Code.  The recommended wind construction techniques shall be based on both the newly adopted Mississippi building code sections for wind load design and the wind-borne debris region.  The list of construction measures to be considered for evaluation in the cost-benefit study shall be based on scientifically established and sound, but common, construction techniques that go above and beyond the basic recommendations in the adopted building codes. This allows residents to utilize multiple options that will further reduce risk and loss and still be awarded for their endeavors with appropriate wind insurance discounts.  It is recommended that existing accepted scientific studies that validate the wind hazard construction techniques benefits and effects be taken into consideration when establishing the list of construction techniques that homeowners and business owners can employ.  This will ensure that only established construction measures that have been studied and modeled as successful mitigation measures will be considered to reduce the chance of including risky or unsound data that will cost both the property owner and state unnecessary losses.  The cost-benefit study shall be based on actual construction cost data collected for several types of residential construction and commercial construction materials, building techniques and designs that are common to the region.  The study shall provide as much information as possible that will enhance the data and options provided to the public, so that homeowners and business owners can make informed and educated decisions as to their level of involvement.  Based on the construction data, modeling shall be performed on a variety of residential and commercial designs, so that a broad enough representative spectrum of data can be obtained.  The data from the study will be utilized in a report to establish tables reflecting actuarially appropriate levels of wind insurance discounts (in percentages) for each mitigation construction technique/combination of techniques.  This report will be utilized as a guide for the Department of Insurance and the insurance industry for developing actuarially appropriate discounts, credits or other rate differentials, or appropriate reductions in deductibles, for properties on which fixtures or construction techniques demonstrated to reduce the amount of loss in a windstorm have been installed or implemented.  Additional data that will enhance the program, such as studies to reflect property value increases for retrofitting or building to the established wind hazard mitigation construction techniques and cost comparison data collected to establish the value of this program against the investment required to include the mitigation measures, also may be provided. (b)  Wind certification and hurricane mitigation inspections. (i)  Home-retrofit inspections of site-built, residential property, including single-family, two-family, three-family or four-family residential units, and a set of representative commercial facilities may be offered to determine what mitigation measures are needed and what improvements to existing residential properties are needed to reduce the property's vulnerability to hurricane damage.  A state program may be established within the Department of Insurance to provide homeowners and business owners wind certification and hurricane mitigation inspections.  The inspections provided to homeowners and business owners, at a minimum, must include: 1.  A home inspection and report that summarizes the results and identifies corrective actions a homeowner may take to mitigate hurricane damage. 2.  A range of cost estimates regarding the mitigation features. 3.  Insurer-specific information regarding premium discounts correlated to recommended mitigation features identified by the inspection. 4.  A hurricane resistance rating scale specifying the home's current as well as projected wind resistance capabilities. This data may be provided by trained and certified inspectors in standardized reporting formats and forms to ensure all data collected during inspections is equivalent in style and content that allows construction data, estimates and discount information to be easily assimilated into a database.  Data pertaining to the number of inspections and inspection reports may be stored in a state database for evaluation of the program's success and review of state goals in reducing wind hazard loss in the state. (ii)  To qualify for selection by the department as a provider of wind certification and hurricane mitigation inspections services, the entity shall, at a minimum, and on a form and in the manner prescribed by the commissioner: 1.  Use wind certification and hurricane mitigation inspectors who: a.  Have prior experience in residential and/or commercial construction or inspection and have received specialized training in hurricane mitigation procedures through the state certified program.  In order to qualify for training in the inspection process, the individual should be either a licensed building code official, a licensed contractor or inspector in the State of Mississippi, or a civil engineer. b.  Have undergone drug testing and background checks. c.  Have been certified through a state mandated training program, in a manner satisfactory to the department, to conduct the inspections. d.  Have not been convicted of a * * * felony crime of violence or of a sexual offense disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; have not received a first-time offender pardon or nonadjudication order for a  * * *felony crime of violence or of a sexual offense disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; or have not entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a * * * felony charge of violence or of a sexual offense disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. e. Submit a statement authorizing the Commissioner of Insurance to order fingerprint analysis or any other analysis or documents deemed necessary by the commissioner for the purpose of verifying the criminal history of the individual.  The commissioner shall have the authority to conduct criminal history verification on a local, state or national level, and shall have the authority to require the individual to pay for the costs of such criminal history verification. 2.  Provide a quality assurance program including a reinspection component. 3.  Have data collection equipment and computer systems, so that data can be submitted electronically to the state's database of inspection reports, insurance certificates, and other industry information related to this program.  It is mandatory that all inspectors provide original copies to the property owner of any inspection reports, estimates, etc., pertaining to the inspection and keep a copy of all inspection materials on hand for state audits. (c) Financial grants to retrofit properties.  Financial grants may be used to encourage single-family, site-built, owner-occupied, residential property owners or commercial property owners to retrofit their properties to make them less vulnerable to hurricane damage.  No financial grant made under this section shall exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per recipient. (d)  Education and consumer awareness.  Multimedia public education, awareness and advertising efforts designed to specifically address mitigation techniques may be employed, as well as a component to support ongoing consumer resources and referral services.  In addition, all insurance companies shall provide notification to their clients regarding the availability of this program, participation details, and directions to the state website promoting the program, along with appropriate contact phone numbers to the state agency administrating the program.  The notification to the clients must be sent by the insurance company within thirty (30) days after filing their insurance discount schedules with the Department of Insurance. (e)  Advisory council.  There is created an advisory council to provide advice and assistance to the program administrator with regard to his or her administration of the program.  The advisory council shall consist of: (i)  An agent, selected by the Independent Insurance Agents of Mississippi. (ii)  Two (2) representatives of residential property insurers, selected by the Department of Insurance. (iii)  One (1) representative of homebuilders, selected by the Home Builders Association of Mississippi. (iv)  The Chairman of the House Insurance Committee, or his designee. (v)  The Chairman of the Senate Insurance Committee, or his designee. (vi)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Windstorm Underwriting Association, or his designee. (vii)  The Director of the Mississippi Emergency Management Agency, or his designee. Members appointed under subparagraphs (i) and (ii) shall serve at the pleasure of the Department of Insurance.  All other members shall serve as voting ex officio members. Members of the advisory council who are not legislators, state officials or state employees shall be compensated at the per diem rate authorized by Section 25-3-69, and shall be reimbursed in accordance with Section 25-3-41, for mileage and actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. Legislative members of the advisory council shall be paid from the contingent expense funds of their respective houses in the same manner as provided for committee meetings when the Legislature is not in session; however, no per diem or expense for attending meetings of the advisory council may be paid while the Legislature is in session.  No advisory council member may incur per diem, travel or other expenses unless previously authorized by vote, at a meeting of the council, which action shall be recorded in the official minutes of the meeting.  Nonlegislative members shall be paid from any funds made available to the advisory council for that purpose. (f)  Rules and regulations.  The Department of Insurance may adopt rules and regulations governing the Comprehensive Hurricane Damage Mitigation Program.  The department also may adopt rules and regulations establishing priorities for grants provided under this section based on objective criteria that gives priority to reducing the state's probable maximum loss from hurricanes. However, pursuant to this overall goal, the department may further establish priorities based on the insured value of the dwelling, whether or not the dwelling is insured by the Mississippi Windstorm Underwriting Association and whether or not the area under consideration has sufficient resources and the ability to perform the retrofitting required. (2)  Nothing in this section shall prohibit the Department of Insurance from entering into an agreement with any other appropriate state agency to assist with or perform any of the duties set forth hereunder. (3)  The Department of Insurance shall issue a request for proposals to contract with a third party for the administration of the Comprehensive Hurricane Damage Mitigation Program.  The contract for the third-party administrator shall be funded from monies in the Comprehensive Hurricane Damage Mitigation Program Fund created in subsection (4) of this section, and that amount shall not exceed one percent (1%) of the funds appropriated to the Department of Insurance for the program. If the third-party administrator selected through the request for proposals is replaced or is otherwise changed, the Department of Insurance shall notify the Chairs of the House and Senate Appropriations and Insurance Committees. (4)  There is created a special fund in the State Treasury to be known as the Comprehensive Hurricane Damage Mitigation Program Fund.  The fund shall consist of any monies from any source that are designated or made available for deposit into the fund.  The Department of Insurance may apply for any federal or private grants to provide additional funds for the special fund.  Monies in the fund shall be expended by the Department of Insurance, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes as provided in this section.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into such fund. (5)  This section shall stand repealed from and after July 1, 2028. SECTION 114.  Section 83-17-71, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-17-71.  (1)  The commissioner may place on probation, suspend, revoke or refuse to issue or renew an insurance producer's license or may levy a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per violation and such penalty shall be deposited into the special fund of the State Treasury designated as the "Insurance Department Fund" for any one or more of the following causes: (a)  Providing incorrect, misleading, incomplete or materially untrue information in the license application; (b)  Violating any insurance laws, or violating any regulation, subpoena or order of the commissioner or of another state's commissioner; (c)  Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license through misrepresentation or fraud; (d)  Improperly withholding, misappropriating or converting any monies or properties received in the course of doing insurance business; (e)  Intentionally misrepresenting the terms of an actual or proposed insurance contract or application for insurance; (f)  Having been convicted of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (g)  Having admitted or been found to have committed any insurance unfair trade practice or fraud; (h)  Using fraudulent, coercive or dishonest practices or demonstrating incompetence, untrustworthiness or financial irresponsibility in the conduct of business in this state or elsewhere; (i)  Having an insurance producer license, or its equivalent, denied, suspended or revoked in any other state, province, district or territory; (j)  Forging another's name to an application for insurance or to any document related to an insurance transaction; (k)  Improperly using notes or any other reference material to complete an examination for an insurance license; (l)  Knowingly accepting insurance business from an individual who is not licensed; (m)  Failing to comply with an administrative or court order imposing a child support obligation; or (n)  Failing to pay state income tax or comply with any administrative or court order directing payment of state income tax. (2)  If the action by the commissioner is to nonrenew or to deny an application for a license, the commissioner shall notify the applicant or licensee and advise, in writing, the applicant or licensee of the reason for the denial or nonrenewal of the applicant's or licensee's license.  The applicant or licensee may make written demand upon the commissioner within ten (10) days for a hearing before the commissioner to determine the reasonableness of the commissioner's action.  The hearing shall be held within thirty (30) days. (3)  The license of a business entity may be suspended, revoked or refused if the commissioner finds, after hearing, that an individual licensee's violation was known or should have been known by one or more of the partners, officers or managers acting on behalf of the partnership or corporation and the violation was neither reported to the commissioner nor corrective action taken. (4)  In addition to, or in lieu of, any applicable denial, suspension or revocation of a license, a person may, after hearing, be subject to a civil fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per violation and such fine shall be deposited into the special fund in the State Treasury designated as the "Insurance Department Fund." (5)  The commissioner shall retain the authority to enforce the provisions of and impose any penalty or remedy authorized by this article and Title 83, Mississippi Code of 1972, against any person who is under investigation for or charged with a violation of this article or Title 83, Mississippi Code of 1972, even if the person's license or registration has been surrendered or has lapsed by operation of law. (6)  No licensee whose license has been revoked hereunder shall be entitled to file another application for a license as a producer within one (1) year from the effective date of such revocation or, if judicial review of such revocation is sought, within one (1) year from the date of final court order or decree affirming such revocation.  Such application, when filed, may be refused by the commissioner unless the applicant shows good cause why the revocation of his license shall not be deemed a bar to the issuance of a new license. (7)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this article to the contrary, a person licensed in this state as a nonresident producer whose license is denied, suspended or revoked in his or her home state shall also have his or her nonresident license denied, suspended or revoked in this state without prior notice or hearing. (8)  From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law. (9)  From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section. SECTION 115.  Section 83-17-421, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-17-421.  (1)  A license may be refused, or a license duly issued may be suspended or revoked or the renewal thereof refused by the commissioner if, after notice and hearing as hereinafter provided, he or she finds that the applicant for, or holder of, such license: (a)  Has * * * wilfully willfully violated any provision of the insurance laws of this state; or (b)  Has intentionally made a material misstatement in the application for such license; or (c)  Has obtained, or attempted to obtain, such license by fraud or misrepresentation; or (d)  Has misappropriated or converted to his or her own use or illegally withheld money belonging to an insurer or beneficiary; or (e)  Has otherwise demonstrated lack of trustworthiness or competence to act as an adjuster; or (f)  Has been guilty of fraudulent or dishonest practices or has been convicted of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Act; or (g)  Has materially misrepresented the terms and conditions of insurance policies or contracts; or * * * wilfully willfully exaggerated prospective returns on investment features of policies or fails to identify himself or herself as an adjuster and in so doing receives a compensation for his or her participation in the sale of insurance; or (h)  Has made or issued, or caused to be made or issued, any statement misrepresenting or making incomplete comparisons regarding the terms or conditions of any insurance or annuity contract legally issued by any insurer, for the purpose of inducing or attempting to induce the owner of such contract to forfeit or surrender such contract or allow it to lapse for the purpose of replacing such contract with another; or (i)  Has obtained or attempted to obtain such license, not for the purpose of holding himself or herself out to the general public as an adjuster, but primarily for the purpose of soliciting, negotiating or procuring insurance or annuity contracts covering himself or herself or members of his or her family. (2)  Before any license shall be refused (except for failure to pass a required written examination) or suspended or revoked or the renewal thereof refused hereunder, the commissioner shall give notice of his or her intention so to do, by registered mail, to the applicant for or holder of such license and the insurer whom he or she represents or who desires that he or she be licensed, and shall set a date not less than twenty (20) days from the date of mailing such notice when the applicant or licensee and a duly authorized representative of the insurer may appear to be heard and produce evidence.  Such notice shall constitute automatic suspension of license if the person involved is a licensed adjuster.  In the conduct of such hearing, the commissioner or any regular salaried employee specially designated by him or her for such purpose shall have power to administer oaths, to require the appearance of and examine any person under oath and to require the production of books, records or papers relevant to the inquiry upon his or her own initiative or upon the request of the applicant or licensee.  Upon the termination of such hearing, findings shall be reduced to writing and, upon approval by the commissioner, shall be filed in his or her office; and notice of the findings shall be sent by registered mail to the applicant or licensee and the insurer concerned. (3)  Where the grounds set out in subsection (1)(d) or (1)(g) are the grounds for any hearing, the commissioner may, in his or her discretion in lieu of the hearing provided for in subsection (2) of this section, file a petition to suspend or revoke any license authorized hereunder in a court of competent jurisdiction of the county or district in which the alleged offense occurred.  In such cases, subpoenas may be issued for witnesses, and mileage and witness fees paid as in other cases.  All costs of such cause shall be paid by the defendant, if found guilty, and if costs cannot be made and collected from the defendant, such costs shall be assessed against the company issuing the contract involved in such cause. (4)  No licensee whose license has been revoked hereunder shall be entitled to file another application for a license as an adjuster within one (1) year from the effective date of such revocation or, if judicial review of such revocation is sought, within one (1) year from the date of final court order or decree affirming such revocation.  Such application, when filed, may be refused by the commissioner unless the applicant shows good cause why the revocation of his or her license shall not be deemed a bar to the issuance of a new license. SECTION 116.  Section 83-17-519, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-17-519.  (1)  A license may be refused, or a license duly issued may be suspended or revoked or the renewal thereof refused by the commissioner, or the commissioner may levy a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per violation, or both, and any such penalty shall be deposited into the special fund of the State Treasury designated as the "Insurance Department Fund," if, after notice and hearing as hereinafter provided, he finds that the applicant for, or holder of, such license: (a)  Has intentionally made a material misstatement in the application for such license; or (b)  Has obtained, or attempted to obtain, such license by fraud or misrepresentation; or (c)  Has misappropriated or converted to his own use or illegally withheld money belonging to another person or entity; or (d)  Has otherwise demonstrated lack of trustworthiness or competence to act as a public adjuster; or (e)  Has been guilty of fraudulent or dishonest practices or has been convicted of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; or (f)  Has materially misrepresented the terms and conditions of insurance policies or contracts or failed to identify himself as a public adjuster; or (g)  Has obtained or attempted to obtain such license for a purpose other than holding himself out to the general public as a public adjuster; or (h)  Has violated any insurance laws, or any regulation, subpoena or order of the commissioner or of another state's commissioner of insurance. (2)  Before any license shall be refused (except for failure to pass a required written examination) or suspended or revoked or the renewal thereof refused hereunder, the commissioner shall give notice of his intention so to do, by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the applicant for or holder of such license, and shall set a date not less than twenty (20) days from the date of mailing such notice when the applicant or licensee may appear to be heard and produce evidence in opposition to such refusal, suspension or revocation.  Such notice shall constitute automatic suspension of license if the person involved is a licensed public adjuster.  In the conduct of such hearing, the commissioner or any regular salaried employee of the department specially designated by him for such purpose shall have the power to administer oaths, to require the appearance of and examine any person under oath, and to require the production of books, records or papers relevant to the inquiry upon his own initiative or upon the request of the applicant or licensee.  Upon the termination of such hearing, findings shall be reduced to writing and, upon approval by the commissioner, shall be filed in his office; and notice of the findings shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the applicant or licensee. (3)  Where the grounds set out in subsection (1)(c) or (1)(f) of this section are the grounds for any hearing, the commissioner may, in his discretion in lieu of the hearing provided for in subsection (2) of this section, file a petition requesting the court to suspend or revoke any license authorized hereunder in a court of competent jurisdiction of the county or district in which the alleged offense occurred.  In such cases, subpoenas may be issued for witnesses, and mileage and witness fees paid as in other cases.  All costs of such cause shall be paid by the defendant, if the finding of the court be against him. (4)  No licensee whose license has been revoked hereunder shall be entitled to file another application for a license as a public adjuster within one (1) year from the effective date of such revocation or, if judicial review of such revocation is sought, within one (1) year from the date of final court order or decree affirming such revocation.  An application filed after such one-year period shall be refused by the commissioner unless the applicant shows good cause why the revocation of his license shall not be deemed a bar to the issuance of a new license. (5)  From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law. (6)  From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section. SECTION 117.  Section 83-21-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-21-19.  (1)  Surplus lines insurance may be placed by a surplus lines insurance producer if: (a)  Each insurer is an eligible surplus lines insurer; (b)  Each insurer is authorized to write the line of insurance in its domiciliary jurisdiction; and (c)  All other requirements as set forth by law are met. (2)  The Commissioner of Insurance, upon the biennial payment of a fee of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) and submission of a completed license application on a form approved by the commissioner, may issue a surplus lines insurance producer license to a qualified holder of an insurance producer license with a property, casualty and/or personal lines line of authority, who is regularly commissioned to represent a fire and casualty insurance company licensed to do business in the state. (3)  The privilege license shall continue from the date of issuance until the last day of the month of the licensee's birthday in the second year following issuance or renewal of the license, with a minimum term of twelve (12) months. (4)  A nonresident person shall receive a surplus lines insurance producer license if: (a)  The person is currently licensed as a surplus lines insurance producer or equivalent and in good standing in his or her home state; (b)  The person has submitted the proper request for licensure and has paid the biennial fee of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00); and (c)  The person's home state awards nonresident surplus lines licenses to residents of this state on the same basis. (5)  The commissioner may verify a person's licensing status through the National Producer Database maintained by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, its affiliates or subsidiaries. (6)  A nonresident surplus lines insurance producer licensee who moves from one (1) state to another state, or a resident surplus lines licensee who moves from this state to another state, shall file a change of address and provide certification from the new resident state within thirty (30) days of the change of legal residence.  No fee or license application is required. (7)  The commissioner may deny, suspend, revoke or refuse the license of a surplus lines insurance producer licensee and/or levy a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) per violation, after notice and hearing as provided hereunder, for one or more of the following grounds: (a)  Providing incorrect, misleading, incomplete or materially untrue information in the license application; (b)  Violating any insurance laws, or violating any regulation, subpoena or order of the commissioner or of another state's commissioner; (c)  Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license through misrepresentation or fraud; (d)  Improperly withholding, misappropriating or converting any monies or properties received in the course of doing the business of insurance; (e)  Intentionally misrepresenting the terms of an actual or proposed insurance contract or application for insurance; (f)  Having been convicted of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (g)  Having admitted or been found to have committed any insurance unfair trade practice or fraud; (h)  Using fraudulent, coercive or dishonest practices or demonstrating incompetence, untrustworthiness or financial irresponsibility in the conduct of business in this state or elsewhere; (i)  Having an insurance producer license, or its equivalent, denied, suspended or revoked in any other state, province, district or territory; (j)  Forging another's name to an application for insurance or to any document related to an insurance transaction; (k)  Improperly using notes or any other reference material to complete an examination for an insurance license; (l)  Knowingly accepting insurance business from an individual who is not licensed; (m)  Failing to comply with an administrative or court order imposing a child support obligation; or (n)  Failing to pay state income tax or comply with any administrative or court order directing payment of state income tax. (8)  If the action by the commissioner is to nonrenew, suspend, revoke or to deny an application for a license, the commissioner shall notify the applicant or licensee and advise, in writing, the applicant or licensee of the reason for the denial or nonrenewal of the applicant's or licensee's license.  The applicant or licensee may make written demand upon the commissioner within ten (10) days for a hearing before the commissioner to determine the reasonableness of the commissioner's action.  The hearing shall be held within thirty (30) days. (9)  Every surplus lines insurance contract procured and delivered according to Sections 83-21-17 through 83-21-31 shall have stamped upon it in bold ten-point type, and bear the name of the surplus lines insurance producer who procured it, the following:  "NOTE:  This insurance policy is issued pursuant to Mississippi law covering surplus lines insurance.  The company issuing the policy is not licensed by the State of Mississippi, but is authorized to do business in Mississippi as a nonadmitted company.  The policy is not protected by the Mississippi Insurance Guaranty Association in the event of the insurer's insolvency."  No diminution of the license fee herein provided shall occur as to any license effective after January 1 of any year. SECTION 118.  Section 83-49-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 83-49-11.  The commissioner may revoke or suspend or refuse to renew the license of any sponsor or representative of such sponsor when and if after investigation the commissioner finds that: (a)  Any license issued to such sponsor or representative of such sponsor was obtained by fraud; (b)  There was any misrepresentation in the application for the license; (c)  The sponsor or representative of such sponsor has otherwise shown itself untrustworthy or incompetent to act as a sponsor or representative of such sponsor; (d)  Such sponsor or representative of such sponsor has violated any of the provisions of this chapter or of the rules and regulations of the commissioner; (e)  The sponsor or representative of such sponsor has misappropriated, converted, illegally withheld, or refused to pay over upon proper demand any monies entrusted to the sponsor or representative of such sponsor in its fiduciary capacity belonging to an insurer or insured; (f)  The sponsor or representative of such sponsor is found to be in an unsound condition or in such condition as to render the future transaction of business in this state hazardous to the public; or (g)  The sponsor or representative of such sponsor is found guilty of fraudulent, deceptive, unfair or dishonest practices as defined in Section 83-5-35 or 83-5-45, Mississippi Code of 1972, or has been convicted of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act. Before any license shall be refused, suspended, revoked or the renewal thereof refused hereunder, the commissioner shall give notice of his intention so to do, by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the applicant for or holder of such license and to any sponsor whom such representative represents or who desires that he be licensed, and shall set a date not less than twenty (20) days from the date of mailing such notice when the applicant or licensee and a duly authorized representative of the sponsor may appear to be heard and produce evidence.  In the conduct of such hearing, the commissioner or any regular salaried employee specially designated by him for such purposes shall have power to administer oaths, to require the appearance of and examine any person under oath, and to require the production of books, records or papers relevant to the inquiry upon his own initiative or upon the request of the applicant or licensee.  Upon the termination of such hearing, findings shall be reduced to writing and, upon approval by the commissioner, shall be filed in his office; and notice of the findings shall be sent by certified mail to the applicant or licensee and the sponsor concerned. No licensee whose license has been revoked hereunder shall be entitled to file another application for a license as a sponsor or a representative of any sponsor within one (1) year from the effective date of such revocation.  Such application, when filed, may be refused by the commissioner unless the applicant shows good cause why the revocation of his license shall not be deemed a bar to the issuance of a new license. In lieu of revoking, suspending or refusing to renew the license for any of the causes enumerated in this section, after hearing as herein provided, the commissioner may place the sponsor on probation for a period of time not to exceed one (1) year, or may fine such sponsor not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each offense, or both, when in his judgment he finds that the public interest would not be harmed by the continued operation of the sponsor.  The amount of any such penalty shall be paid by such sponsor to the commissioner for the use of the state.  At any hearing provided by this section, the commissioner shall have authority to administer oaths to witnesses.  Anyone testifying falsely, after having been administered such oath, shall be subject to the penalty of perjury. Any action of the commissioner taken pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be subject to review as may be provided in Section 83-17-125. SECTION 119.  Section 97-33-315, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 97-33-315.  (1)  The executive director shall make appropriate investigations: (a)  To determine whether there has been any violation of Sections 97-33-301 through 97-33-317 or of any regulations adopted thereunder. (b)  To determine any facts, conditions, practices or matters which it may deem necessary or proper to aid in the enforcement of any such law or regulation. (c)  To aid in adopting regulations. (d)  To secure information as a basis for recommending legislation relating to Sections 97-33-301 through 97-33-317. (e)  To determine annual compliance with Sections 97-33-301 through 97-33-317. (2)  If after any investigation the executive director is satisfied that a license should be limited, conditioned, suspended or revoked, he shall initiate a hearing by filing a complaint with the commission and transmit therewith a summary of evidence in his possession bearing on the matter and the transcript of testimony at any investigative hearing conducted by or on behalf of the executive director to the licensee. (3)  Upon receipt of the complaint of the executive director, the commission shall review all matter presented in support thereof and shall appoint a hearing examiner to conduct further proceedings. (4)  After proceedings required by Sections 97-33-301 through 97-33-317, the hearing examiner may recommend that the commission take any or all of the following actions: (a)  As to operations at a licensed gaming establishment under Section 97-33-307(5): (i)  Limit, condition, suspend or revoke the license of any licensed gaming establishment or the individual license of any licensee without affecting the license of the establishment; and (ii)  Order an operator to exclude an individual licensee from the operation of the registered business or not to pay the licensee any remuneration for services or any profits, income or accruals on his investment in the licensed gaming establishment; (b)  Limit, condition, suspend or revoke any license granted to any applicant by the commission; (c)  Fine each licensee for any act or transaction for which commission approval was required or permitted, as provided in Section 97-33-309. (5)  The hearing examiner shall prepare a written decision containing his recommendation to the commission and shall serve it on all parties.  Any party disagreeing with the hearing examiner's recommendation may ask the commission to review the recommendation within ten (10) days of service of the recommendation.  The commission may hold a hearing to consider the recommendation whether there has been a request to review the recommendation or not. (6)  If the commission decides to review the recommendation, it shall give notice of that fact to all parties within thirty (30) days of the recommendation and shall schedule a hearing to review the recommendation.  The commission's review shall be de novo but shall be based upon the evidence presented before the hearing examiner. The commission may remand the case to the hearing examiner for the presentation of additional evidence upon a showing of good cause why the evidence could not have been presented at the previous hearing. (7)  If the commission does not decide to review the recommendation within thirty (30) days, the recommendation becomes the final order of the commission. (8)  If the commission limits, conditions, suspends or revokes any license, or imposes a fine, it shall issue its written order therefor after causing to be prepared and filed the hearing examiner's written decision upon which the order is based. (9)  Any limitation, condition, revocation, suspension or fine is effective until reversed upon judicial review, except that the commission may stay its order pending a rehearing or judicial review upon such terms and conditions as it deems proper. (10)  Judicial review of an order or decision of the commission may be had to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, as a case in equity. (11)  A license * * * is automatically may be revoked if the individual is convicted of a * * * felony in any court of this state, another state, or the United States or if the individual is convicted of a crime in any court of another state or the United States which, if committed in this state, would be a felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act.  An appeal from the conviction shall not act as a supersedeas to the revocation required by this subsection. SECTION 120.  Section 73-66-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-66-17.  (1)  The board may sanction a licensee for any of the following acts: (a)  Ineligibility for licensure, including, but not limited to, falsification of information submitted for licensure or failure to maintain status as a board-certified music therapist; (b)  Failure to pay fees when due; (c)  Failure to provide requested information in a timely manner; (d)  Conviction of a * * * felony disqualifying crime as provided in the Fresh Start Act; (e)  Conviction of any crime that reflects an inability to practice music therapy with due regard for the health and safety of clients and patients, or with due regard for the truth in filing claims with Medicare, Medicaid or any third-party payor; (f)  Inability or failure to practice music therapy with reasonable skill and consistent with the welfare of clients and patients, including, but not limited to, negligence in the practice of music therapy; intoxication; incapacity; and abuse of or engaging in sexual contact with a client or patient; and (g)  Disciplinary action by another jurisdiction. (2)  The department is authorized to conduct investigations into allegations of conduct described in subsection (1) of this section. (3)  The board may impose one or more of the following sanctions upon a licensee for a violation of this chapter: (a)  Suspension of a license; (b)  Revocation of a license; (c)  Denial of a license; (d)  Refusal to renew a license; (e)  Probation with conditions; (f)  Reprimand; or (g)  A fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) or more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each violation. SECTION 121.  Section 73-15-201, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 73-15-201.  The Nurse Licensure Compact is enacted into law and entered into by this state with any and all states legally joining in the compact in accordance with its term, in the form substantially as follows: ARTICLE I. Findings and declaration of purpose. (a) The party states find that: 1. The health and safety of the public are affected by the degree of compliance with and the effectiveness of enforcement activities related to state nurse licensure laws; 2. Violations of nurse licensure and other laws regulating the practice of nursing may result in injury or harm to the public; 3. The expanded mobility of nurses and the use of advanced communication technologies as part of our nation's health care delivery system require greater coordination and cooperation among states in the areas of nurse licensure and regulation; 4. New practice modalities and technology make compliance with individual state nurse licensure laws difficult and complex; 5. The current system of duplicative licensure for nurses practicing in multiple states is cumbersome and redundant for both nurses and states; and 6. Uniformity of nurse licensure requirements throughout the states promotes public safety and public health benefits. (b) The general purposes of this compact are to: 1. Facilitate the states' responsibility to protect the public's health and safety; 2. Ensure and encourage the cooperation of party states in the areas of nurse licensure and regulation; 3. Facilitate the exchange of information between party states in the areas of nurse regulation, investigation and adverse actions; 4. Promote compliance with the laws governing the practice of nursing in each jurisdiction; 5. Invest all party states with the authority to hold a nurse accountable for meeting all state practice laws in the state in which the patient is located at the time care is rendered through the mutual recognition of party state licenses; 6. Decrease redundancies in the consideration and issuance of nurse licenses; and 7. Provide opportunities for interstate practice by nurses who meet uniform licensure requirements. ARTICLE II. Definitions. As used in this compact: (a) "Adverse action" means any administrative, civil, equitable or criminal action permitted by a state's laws which is imposed by a licensing board or other authority against a nurse, including actions against an individual's license or multistate licensure privilege such as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the licensee, limitation on the licensee's practice, or any other encumbrance on licensure affecting a nurse's authorization to practice, including issuance of a cease and desist action. (b) "Alternative program" means a nondisciplinary monitoring program approved by a licensing board. (c) "Coordinated licensure information system" means an integrated process for collecting, storing and sharing information on nurse licensure and enforcement activities related to nurse licensure laws that is administered by a nonprofit organization composed of and controlled by licensing boards. (d) "Current significant investigative information" means: 1. Investigative information that a licensing board, after a preliminary inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity for the nurse to respond, if required by state law, has reason to believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would indicate more than a minor infraction; or 2. Investigative information that indicates that the nurse represents an immediate threat to public health and safety regardless of whether the nurse has been notified and had an opportunity to respond. (e) "Encumbrance" means a revocation or suspension of, or any limitation on, the full and unrestricted practice of nursing imposed by a licensing board. (f) "Home state" means the party state which is the nurse's primary state of residence. (g) "Licensing board" means a party state's regulatory body responsible for issuing nurse licenses. (h) "Multistate license" means a license to practice as a registered or a licensed practical/vocational nurse (LPN/VN) issued by a home state licensing board that authorizes the licensed nurse to practice in all party states under a multistate licensure privilege. (i) "Multistate licensure privilege" means a legal authorization associated with a multistate license permitting the practice of nursing as either a registered nurse (RN) or LPN/VN in a remote state. (j) "Nurse" means RN or LPN/VN, as those terms are defined by each party state's practice laws. (k) "Party state" means any state that has adopted this compact. (l) "Remote state" means a party state, other than the home state. (m) "Single-state license" means a nurse license issued by a party state that authorizes practice only within the issuing state and does not include a multistate licensure privilege to practice in any other party state. (n) "State" means a state, territory or possession of the United States and the District of Columbia. (o) "State practice laws" means a party state's laws, rules and regulations that govern the practice of nursing, define the scope of nursing practice, and create the methods and grounds for imposing discipline. "State practice laws" do not include requirements necessary to obtain and retain a license, except for qualifications or requirements of the home state. ARTICLE III. General provisions and jurisdiction. (a) A multistate license to practice registered or licensed practical/vocational nursing issued by a home state to a resident in that state will be recognized by each party state as authorizing a nurse to practice as a registered nurse (RN) or as a licensed practical/vocational nurse (LPN/VN), under a multistate licensure privilege, in each party state. (b) A state must implement procedures for considering the criminal history records of applicants for initial multistate license or licensure by endorsement.  Such procedures shall include the submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information by applicants for the purpose of obtaining an applicant's criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that state's criminal records. (c) Each party state shall require the following for an applicant to obtain or retain a multistate license in the home state: 1. Meets the home state's qualifications for licensure or renewal of licensure, as well as, all other applicable state laws; 2. (i)  Has graduated or is eligible to graduate from a licensing board-approved RN or LPN/VN prelicensure education program; or (ii) Has graduated from a foreign RN or LPN/VN prelicensure education program that (a) has been approved by the authorized accrediting body in the applicable country and (b) has been verified by an independent credentials review agency to be comparable to a licensing board-approved prelicensure education program; 3. Has, if a graduate of a foreign prelicensure education program not taught in English or if English is not the individual's native language, successfully passed an English proficiency examination that includes the components of reading, speaking, writing and listening; 4. Has successfully passed a National Council Licensure Examination-Registered Nurse (NCLEX-RN®) or National Council Licensure Examination-Practical Nurse (NCLEX-PN®) Examination or recognized predecessor, as applicable; 5. Is eligible for or holds an active, unencumbered license; 6. Has submitted, in connection with an application for initial licensure or licensure by endorsement, fingerprints or other biometric data for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for retaining that state's criminal records; 7. Has not been convicted or found guilty, or has entered into an agreed disposition, of a felony offense under applicable state or federal criminal law; 8. Has not been convicted or found guilty, or has entered into an agreed disposition, of a misdemeanor offense related to the practice of nursing as determined on a case-by-case basis; 9. Is not currently enrolled in an alternative program; 10. Is subject to self-disclosure requirements regarding current participation in an alternative program; and 11. Has a valid United States social security number. (d) All party states shall be authorized, in accordance with existing state due process law, to take adverse action against a nurse's multistate licensure privilege such as revocation, suspension, probation or any other action that affects a nurse's authorization to practice under a multistate licensure privilege, including cease and desist actions.  If a party state takes such action, it shall promptly notify the administrator of the coordinated licensure information system.  The administrator of the coordinated licensure information system shall promptly notify the home state of any such actions by remote states. (e) A nurse practicing in a party state must comply with the state practice laws of the state in which the client is located at the time service is provided.  The practice of nursing is not limited to patient care, but shall include all nursing practice as defined by the state practice laws of the party state in which the client is located.  The practice of nursing in a party state under a multistate licensure privilege will subject a nurse to the jurisdiction of the licensing board, the courts and the laws of the party state in which the client is located at the time service is provided. (f) Individuals not residing in a party state shall continue to be able to apply for a party state's single-state license as provided under the laws of each party state.  However, the single-state license granted to these individuals will not be recognized as granting the privilege to practice nursing in any other party state.  Nothing in this compact shall affect the requirements established by a party state for the issuance of a single-state license. (g) Any nurse holding a home state multistate license, on the effective date of this compact, may retain and renew the multistate license issued by the nurse's then-current home state, provided that: 1. A nurse, who changes primary state of residence after this compact's effective date, must meet all applicable Article III(c) requirements to obtain a multistate license from a new home state. 2. A nurse who fails to satisfy the multistate licensure requirements in subsection (c) of this article due to a disqualifying event occurring after this compact's effective date shall be ineligible to retain or renew a multistate license, and the nurse's multistate license shall be revoked or deactivated in accordance with applicable rules adopted by the Interstate Commission of Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators ("commission"). ARTICLE IV. Applications for licensure in a party state. (a) Upon application for a multistate license, the licensing board in the issuing party state shall ascertain, through the coordinated licensure information system, whether the applicant has ever held, or is the holder of, a license issued by any other state, whether there are any encumbrances on any license or multistate licensure privilege held by the applicant, whether any adverse action has been taken against any license or multistate licensure privilege held by the applicant and whether the applicant is currently participating in an alternative program. (b) A nurse may hold a multistate license, issued by the home state, in only one (1) party state at a time. (c) If a nurse changes primary state of residence by moving between two (2) party states, the nurse must apply for licensure in the new home state, and the multistate license issued by the prior home state will be deactivated in accordance with applicable rules adopted by the commission. 1. The nurse may apply for licensure in advance of a change in primary state of residence. 2. A multistate license shall not be issued by the new home state until the nurse provides satisfactory evidence of a change in primary state of residence to the new home state and satisfies all applicable requirements to obtain a multistate license from the new home state. (d) If a nurse changes primary state of residence by moving from a party state to a nonparty state, the multistate license issued by the prior home state will convert to a single-state license, valid only in the former home state. ARTICLE V. Additional authorities invested in party state licensing boards. (a) In addition to the other powers conferred by state law, a licensing board shall have the authority to: 1. Take adverse action against a nurse's multistate licensure privilege to practice within that party state. (i) Only the home state shall have the power to take adverse action against a nurse's license issued by the home state. (ii) For purposes of taking adverse action, the home state licensing board shall give the same priority and effect to reported conduct received from a remote state as it would if such conduct had occurred within the home state. In so doing, the home state shall apply its own state laws to determine appropriate action. 2. Issue cease and desist orders or impose an encumbrance on a nurse's authority to practice within that party state. 3. Complete any pending investigations of a nurse who changes primary state of residence during the course of such investigations.  The licensing board shall also have the authority to take appropriate action(s) and shall promptly report the conclusions of such investigations to the administrator of the coordinated licensure information system.  The administrator of the coordinated licensure information system shall promptly notify the new home state of any such actions. 4. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the attendance and testimony of witnesses, as well as, the production of evidence. Subpoenas issued by a licensing board in a party state for the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence from another party state shall be enforced in the latter state by any court of competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and procedure of that court applicable to subpoenas issued in proceedings pending before it.  The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, mileage and other fees required by the service statutes of the state in which the witnesses or evidence are located. 5. Obtain and submit, for each nurse licensure applicant, fingerprint or other biometric-based information to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for criminal background checks, receive the results of the Federal Bureau of Investigation record search on criminal background checks and use the results in making licensure decisions. 6. If otherwise permitted by state law, recover from the affected nurse the costs of investigations and disposition of cases resulting from any adverse action taken against that nurse. 7. Take adverse action based on the factual findings of the remote state, provided that the licensing board follows its own procedures for taking such adverse action. (b) If adverse action is taken by the home state against a nurse's multistate license, the nurse's multistate licensure privilege to practice in all other party states shall be deactivated until all encumbrances have been removed from the multistate license.  All home state disciplinary orders that impose adverse action against a nurse's multistate license shall include a statement that the nurse's multistate licensure privilege is deactivated in all party states during the pendency of the order. (c) Nothing in this compact shall override a party state's decision that participation in an alternative program may be used in lieu of adverse action. The home state licensing board shall deactivate the multistate licensure privilege under the multistate license of any nurse for the duration of the nurse's participation in an alternative program. ARTICLE VI. Coordinated licensure information system and exchange of information. (a) All party states shall participate in a coordinated licensure information system of all licensed registered nurses (RNs) and licensed practical/vocational nurses (LPNs/VNs).  This system will include information on the licensure and disciplinary history of each nurse, as submitted by party states, to assist in the coordination of nurse licensure and enforcement efforts. (b) The commission, in consultation with the administrator of the coordinated licensure information system, shall formulate necessary and proper procedures for the identification, collection and exchange of information under this compact. (c) All licensing boards shall promptly report to the coordinated licensure information system any adverse action, any current significant investigative information, denials of applications (with the reasons for such denials) and nurse participation in alternative programs known to the licensing board regardless of whether such participation is deemed nonpublic or confidential under state law. (d) Current significant investigative information and participation in nonpublic or confidential alternative programs shall be transmitted through the coordinated licensure information system only to party state licensing boards. (e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all party state licensing boards contributing information to the coordinated licensure information system may designate information that may not be shared with nonparty states or disclosed to other entities or individuals without the express permission of the contributing state. (f) Any personally identifiable information obtained from the coordinated licensure information system by a party state licensing board shall not be shared with nonparty states or disclosed to other entities or individuals except to the extent permitted by the laws of the party state contributing the information. (g) Any information contributed to the coordinated licensure information system that is subsequently required to be expunged by the laws of the party state contributing that information shall also be expunged from the coordinated licensure information system. (h) The compact administrator of each party state shall furnish a uniform data set to the compact administrator of each other party state, which shall include, at a minimum: 1. Identifying information; 2. Licensure data; 3. Information related to alternative program participation; and 4. Other information that may facilitate the administration of this compact, as determined by commission rules. (i) The compact administrator of a party state shall provide all investigative documents and information requested by another party state. ARTICLE VII. Establishment of the Interstate Commission of Nurse Licensure Compact administrators. (a) The party states hereby create and establish a joint public entity known as the Interstate Commission of Nurse Licensure Compact Administrators. 1. The commission is an instrumentality of the party states. 2. Venue is proper, and judicial proceedings by or against the commission shall be brought solely and exclusively, in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the commission is located.  The commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. 3. Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity. (b) Membership, voting and meetings. 1. Each party state shall have and be limited to one (1) administrator.  The head of the state licensing board or designee shall be the administrator of this compact for each party state.  Any administrator may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the law of the state from which the administrator is appointed.  Any vacancy occurring in the commission shall be filled in accordance with the laws of the party state in which the vacancy exists. 2. Each administrator shall be entitled to one (1) vote with regard to the promulgation of rules and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate in the business and affairs of the commission.  An administrator shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the bylaws.  The bylaws may provide for an administrator's participation in meetings by telephone or other means of communication. 3. The commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws or rules of the commission. 4. All meetings shall be open to the public, and public notice of meetings shall be given in the same manner as required under the rulemaking provisions in Article VIII. 5. The commission may convene in a closed, nonpublic meeting if the commission must discuss: (i) Noncompliance of a party state with its obligations under this compact; (ii) The employment, compensation, discipline or other personnel matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees or other matters related to the commission's internal personnel practices and procedures; (iii) Current, threatened or reasonably anticipated litigation; (iv) Negotiation of contracts for the purchase or sale of goods, services or real estate; (v) Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person; (vi) Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or confidential; (vii) Disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy; (viii) Disclosure of investigatory records compiled for law enforcement purposes; (ix) Disclosure of information related to any reports prepared by or on behalf of the commission for the purpose of investigation of compliance with this compact; or (x) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or state statute. 6. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant to this provision, the commission's legal counsel or designee shall certify that the meeting may be closed and shall reference each relevant exempting provision.  The commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefor, including a description of the views expressed.  All documents considered in connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes.  All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority vote of the commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction. (c) The commission shall, by a majority vote of the administrators, prescribe bylaws or rules to govern its conduct as may be necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and exercise the powers of this compact, including, but not limited to: 1. Establishing the fiscal year of the commission; 2. Providing reasonable standards and procedures: (i) For the establishment and meetings of other committees; and (ii) Governing any general or specific delegation of any authority or function of the commission; 3. Providing reasonable procedures for calling and conducting meetings of the commission, ensuring reasonable advance notice of all meetings and providing an opportunity for attendance of such meetings by interested parties, with enumerated exceptions designed to protect the public's interest, the privacy of individuals, and proprietary information, including trade secrets.  The commission may meet in closed session only after a majority of the administrators vote to close a meeting in whole or in part.  As soon as practicable, the commission must make public a copy of the vote to close the meeting revealing the vote of each administrator, with no proxy votes allowed; 4. Establishing the titles, duties and authority and reasonable procedures for the election of the officers of the commission; 5. Providing reasonable standards and procedures for the establishment of the personnel policies and programs of the commission.  Notwithstanding any civil service or other similar laws of any party state, the bylaws shall exclusively govern the personnel policies and programs of the commission; and 6. Providing a mechanism for winding up the operations of the commission and the equitable disposition of any surplus funds that may exist after the termination of this compact after the payment or reserving of all of its debts and obligations; (d) The commission shall publish its bylaws and rules, and any amendments thereto, in a convenient form on the website of the commission. (e) The commission shall maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws. (f) The commission shall meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this compact and the bylaws. (g) The commission shall have the following powers: 1. To promulgate uniform rules to facilitate and coordinate implementation and administration of this compact.  The rules shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in all party states; 2. To bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of the commission, provided that the standing of any licensing board to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected; 3. To purchase and maintain insurance and bonds; 4. To borrow, accept or contract for services of personnel, including, but not limited to, employees of a party state or nonprofit organizations; 5. To cooperate with other organizations that administer state compacts related to the regulation of nursing, including, but not limited to, sharing administrative or staff expenses, office space or other resources; 6. To hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of this compact, and to establish the commission's personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel and other related personnel matters; 7. To accept any and all appropriate donations, grants and gifts of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services, and to receive, utilize and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest; 8. To lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of, or otherwise to own, hold, improve or use, any property, whether real, personal or mixed; provided that at all times the commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety; 9. To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon or otherwise dispose of any property, whether real, personal or mixed; 10. To establish a budget and make expenditures; 11. To borrow money; 12. To appoint committees, including advisory committees comprised of administrators, state nursing regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and consumer representatives, and other such interested persons; 13. To provide and receive information from, and to cooperate with, law enforcement agencies; 14. To adopt and use an official seal; and 15. To perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this compact consistent with the state regulation of nurse licensure and practice. (h) Financing of the commission. 1. The commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization and ongoing activities. 2. The commission may also levy on and collect an annual assessment from each party state to cover the cost of its operations, activities and staff in its annual budget as approved each year.  The aggregate annual assessment amount, if any, shall be allocated based upon a formula to be determined by the commission, which shall promulgate a rule that is binding upon all party states. 3. The commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the commission pledge the credit of any of the party states, except by, and with the authority of, such party state. 4. The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established under its bylaws.  However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the commission shall be audited yearly by a certified or licensed public accountant, and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the commission. (i) Qualified immunity, defense and indemnification. 1. The administrators, officers, executive director, employees and representatives of the commission shall be immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred, within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury or liability caused by the intentional, willful or wanton misconduct of that person. 2. The commission shall defend any administrator, officer, executive director, employee or representative of the commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining his or her own counsel; and provided further that the actual or alleged act, error or omission did not result from that person's intentional, willful or wanton misconduct. 3. The commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any administrator, officer, executive director, employee or representative of the commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error or omission did not result from the intentional, willful or wanton misconduct of that person. ARTICLE VIII. Rulemaking. (a) The commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth in this article and the rules adopted thereunder.  Rules and amendments shall become binding as of the date specified in each rule or amendment and shall have the same force and effect as provisions of this compact. (b) Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the commission. (c) Prior to promulgation and adoption of a final rule or rules by the commission, and at least sixty (60) days in advance of the meeting at which the rule will be considered and voted upon, the commission shall file a notice of proposed rulemaking: 1. On the website of the commission; and 2. On the website of each licensing board or the publication in which each state would otherwise publish proposed rules. (d) The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include: 1. The proposed time, date and location of the meeting in which the rule will be considered and voted upon; 2. The text of the proposed rule or amendment, and the reason for the proposed rule; 3. A request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested person; and 4. The manner in which interested persons may submit notice to the commission of their intention to attend the public hearing and any written comments. (e) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the commission shall allow persons to submit written data, facts, opinions and arguments, which shall be made available to the public. (f) The commission shall grant an opportunity for a public hearing before it adopts a rule or amendment. (g) The commission shall publish the place, time and date of the scheduled public hearing. 1. Hearings shall be conducted in a manner providing each person who wishes to comment a fair and reasonable opportunity to comment orally or in writing. All hearings will be recorded, and a copy will be made available upon request. 2. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing on each rule.  Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the commission at hearings required by this section. (h) If no one appears at the public hearing, the commission may proceed with promulgation of the proposed rule. (i) Following the scheduled hearing date, or by the close of business on the scheduled hearing date if the hearing was not held, the commission shall consider all written and oral comments received. (j) The commission shall, by majority vote of all administrators, take final action on the proposed rule and shall determine the effective date of the rule, if any, based on the rulemaking record and the full text of the rule. (k) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule without prior notice, opportunity for comment or hearing, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures provided in this compact and in this section shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the rule.  For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to: 1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety or welfare; 2. Prevent a loss of commission or party state funds; or 3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule that is required by federal law or rule. (l) The commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted rule or amendment for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency or grammatical errors.  Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the commission.  The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting.  The revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision results in a material change to a rule.  A challenge shall be made in writing, and delivered to the commission, prior to the end of the notice period.  If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect without further action.  If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect without the approval of the commission. ARTICLE IX. Oversight, dispute resolution and enforcement. (a) Oversight: 1. Each party state shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate this compact's purposes and intent. 2. The commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any proceeding that may affect the powers, responsibilities or actions of the commission, and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes.  Failure to provide service of process in such proceeding to the commission shall render a judgment or order void as to the commission, this compact or promulgated rules. (b) Default, technical assistance and termination: 1. If the commission determines that a party state has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact or the promulgated rules, the commission shall: (i) Provide written notice to the defaulting state and other party states of the nature of the default, the proposed means of curing the default or any other action to be taken by the commission; and (ii) Provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default. 2. If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state's membership in this compact may be terminated upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the administrators, and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred by this compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination.  A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default. 3. Termination of membership in this compact shall be imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted.  Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the commission to the Governor of the defaulting state and to the executive officer of the defaulting state's licensing board and each of the party states. 4. A state whose membership in this compact has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination. 5. The commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in default or whose membership in this compact has been terminated unless agreed upon in writing between the commission and the defaulting state. 6. The defaulting state may appeal the action of the commission by petitioning the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district in which the commission has its principal offices.  The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorneys' fees. (c) Dispute resolution: 1. Upon request by a party state, the commission shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the compact that arise among party states and between party and nonparty states. 2. The commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes, as appropriate. 3. In the event the commission cannot resolve disputes among party states arising under this compact: (i) The party states may submit the issues in dispute to an arbitration panel, which will be comprised of individuals appointed by the compact administrator in each of the affected party states and an individual mutually agreed upon by the compact administrators of all the party states involved in the dispute. (ii) The decision of a majority of the arbitrators shall be final and binding. (d) Enforcement: 1. The commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this compact. 2. By majority vote, the commission may initiate legal action in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district in which the commission has its principal offices against a party state that is in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of this compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages.  In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorneys' fees. 3. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the commission.  The commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law. ARTICLE X. Effective date, withdrawal and amendment. (a) This compact shall become effective and binding on the earlier of the date of legislative enactment of this compact into law by no less than twenty-six (26) states or December 31, 2018.  All party states to this compact, that also were parties to the prior Nurse Licensure Compact, superseded by this compact, ("prior compact"), shall be deemed to have withdrawn from the prior compact within six (6) months after the effective date of this compact. (b) Each party state to this compact shall continue to recognize a nurse's multistate licensure privilege to practice in that party state issued under the prior compact until such party state has withdrawn from the prior compact. (c) Any party state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same.  A party state's withdrawal shall not take effect until six (6) months after enactment of the repealing statute. (d) A party state's withdrawal or termination shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing or terminated state's licensing board to report adverse actions and significant investigations occurring prior to the effective date of such withdrawal or termination. (e) Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or prevent any nurse licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a party state and a nonparty state that is made in accordance with the other provisions of this compact. (f) This compact may be amended by the party states.  No amendment to this compact shall become effective and binding upon the party states unless and until it is enacted into the laws of all party states. (g) Representatives of nonparty states to this compact shall be invited to participate in the activities of the commission, on a nonvoting basis, prior to the adoption of this compact by all states. ARTICLE XI. Construction and severability. This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this compact shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the Constitution of any party state or of the United States, or if the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.  If this compact shall be held to be contrary to the Constitution of any party state, this compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining party states and in full force and effect as to the party state affected as to all severable matters. SECTION 122.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2025.